STRENGTHENING  FORENSIC  SCIENCE
IN  THE  UNITED  STATES:  THE  ROLE
OF  THE  NATIONAL  INSTITUTE  OF
STANDARDS  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  ELEVENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MARCH  10,  2009

Serial No. 111–8

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

47–720PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2009

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chair

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
PETE  OLSON,  Texas

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
MARCIA  L.  FUDGE,  Ohio
BEN  R.  LUJA´ N,  New  Mexico
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York
PARKER  GRIFFITH,  Alabama
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
KATHLEEN  DAHLKEMPER,  Pennsylvania
ALAN  GRAYSON,  Florida
SUZANNE  M.  KOSMAS,  Florida
GARY  C.  PETERS,  Michigan
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

HON.  DAVID  WU,  Oregon,  Chair

DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
BEN  R.  LUJA´ N,  New  Mexico
PAUL  D.  TONKO,  New  York
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
GARY  C.  PETERS,  Michigan
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

MIKE  QUEAR  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

TRAVIS  HITE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

PIPER  LARGENT  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

VICTORIA  JOHNSTON  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

March  10,  2009

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  David  Wu,  Chair,  Subcommittee  on  Technology
and Innovation, Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Rep-
resentatives ...........................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Adrian  Smith,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Paul  C.  Broun,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  Peter  M.  Marone,  Director,  Virginia  Department  of  Forensic  Science
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Ms.  Carol  E.  Henderson,  Director,  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science,  Tech-
nology  and  the  Law;  Professor  of  Law,  Stetson  University  College  of  Law;
Past President, The American Academy of Forensic Sciences

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  John  W.  Hicks,  Director,  Office  of  Forensic  Services,  New  York  State
Division  of  Criminal  Justice  Services  (Ret.);  Former  Director,  FBI  Labora-
tory

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  James  C.  Upshaw  Downs,  Forensic  Pathologist/Consultant,  Coastal  Re-

gional Medical Examiner, Georgia Bureau of Investigation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Peter  J.  Neufeld,  Co-Founder  and  Co-Director,  The  Innocence  Project
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

5
5

6
6

7

7

8
10
14

14
17
19

20
22
23

24
26
31

32
34
53
54

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr. Peter M. Marone, Director, Virginia Department of Forensic Science ........
Ms.  Carol  E.  Henderson,  Director,  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science,  Tech-
nology  and  the  Law;  Professor  of  Law,  Stetson  University  College  of  Law;
Past President, The American Academy of Forensic Sciences .........................
Mr.  John  W.  Hicks,  Director,  Office  of  Forensic  Services,  New  York  State
Division  of  Criminal  Justice  Services  (Ret.);  Former  Director,  FBI  Labora-
tory ........................................................................................................................
Dr.  James  C.  Upshaw  Downs,  Forensic  Pathologist/Consultant,  Coastal  Re-
gional Medical Examiner, Georgia Bureau of Investigation .............................
Mr. Peter J. Neufeld, Co-Founder and Co-Director, The Innocence Project .......

Page

82

85

87

89
96

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Letter  to  Chair  David  Wu  and  Subcommittee  Members  from  Joseph  I.
Cassilly,  President,  National  District  Attorneys  Association,  dated  March
9, 2009 ...................................................................................................................

128

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

STRENGTHENING  FORENSIC  SCIENCE  IN  THE
UNITED  STATES:  THE  ROLE  OF  THE  NA-
TIONAL  INSTITUTE  OF  STANDARDS  AND
TECHNOLOGY

TUESDAY,  MARCH  10,  2009

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. David Wu [Chair
of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Strengthening Forensic Science
in the United States: The Role

of the National Institute of
Standards and Technology

TUESDAY, MARCH 10, 2009

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

I. Purpose

On  Tuesday,  March  10,  2009,  the  Subcommittee  on  Technology  and  Innovation
will  convene  a  hearing  to  review  the  scientific  and  technical  issues  raised  by  the
recently  released  National  Academies  report  Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the
United States: A Path Forward. The hearing will discuss issues related to the accu-
racy,  standards,  reliability,  and  validity  of  forensic  science,  as  well  as  how  the  ex-
pertise  of  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  in  forensics
related  research,  developing  standards  and  certified  test  methodologies,  and  per-
forming  laboratory  accreditation  may  be  leveraged  to  implement  some  of  the  rec-
ommendations in the report.

II. Witnesses
Mr. Pete Marone is the Director of Technical Services at the Virginia Department
of Forensic Science.
Ms.  Carol  Henderson  is  the  Director  of  the  National  Clearing  House  for  Science,
Technology  and  the  Law;  a  Professor  of  Law  at  Stetson  University  College  of  Law;
and the Past President at the American Academy of Forensic Sciences.
Mr.  John  Hicks  is  the  retired  Director  of  the  Office  of  Forensic  Services,
New  York  State  Division  of  Criminal  Justice  Services;  and  the  former  Di-
rector at the FBI Laboratory.
Mr. Peter J. Neufeld is  the  Co-Founder  and  Co-Director  of  the  Innocence  Project.
Dr. J.C. Upshaw Downs is the Coastal Regional Medical Examiner at the Georgia
Bureau of Investigation.

III. Issues and Concerns

Prompted by concerns over the reliability and variability of forensic evidence, the
National  Academy  of  Sciences  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic
Science  Community  recently  completed  a  study  on  the  status  of  the  Nation’s  crime
labs, Strengthening Forensic Science in the United States: A Path Forward. The com-
mittee  found  that  many  of  the  techniques  and  technologies  used  in  forensic  science
lack  rigorous  scientific  discipline.  In  addition,  the  committee  reported  a  lack  of
standard  accreditation  processes  for  individual  labs  and  the  technicians  who  collect
and process evidence.

The committee recommended that a new agency, separate from the legal and law
enforcement communities, be created to provide oversight to correct these inconsist-
encies which impact the accuracy, reliability, and validity of forensic evidence. Many
of the functions envisioned by the report committee for this new agency already are,
or  could  be,  performed  at  NIST.  These  activities  include  standards  setting,  the  cre-
ation of validated test methodologies, and the development of standard practices. In-
deed, the report recommends this new agency specifically work with NIST in several
areas.

The  report  committee  notes  that  on  two  fronts  the  forensic  disciplines  lack  con-
sistent science. The first concern is that different forensic disciplines vary in the de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

gree  to  which  they  are  based  on  a  well-tested,  rigorous  scientific  methodology.  For
instance,  whereas  the  methodology  for  fingerprint  identification  is  scientifically
proven, the analysis of other forensic evidence, like bite-mark comparisons, does not
follow  a  prescribed  and  scientifically  verified  methodology.  The  second  issue  with
consistency is the degree to which some disciplines rely on inexact interpretation to
reach  their  findings  and  report  their  conclusions.  This  is  evident  in  the  practice  of
identifying partial or smudged fingerprints, when practitioners rely on judgment, in-
stead  of  a  reliable  scientific  methodology,  which  can  introduce  human  error  and
bias. Furthermore, there is no consistent scale or nomenclature to report these types
of  findings.  For  example,  the  exact  same  finding  could  be  reported  as  ‘‘a  match’’  in
one jurisdiction or ‘‘consistent with’’ in another jurisdiction.

IV. Background

DNA  evidence  has  been  widely  used  in  the  legal  system  for  many  years.  DNA’s
accepted use in this capacity stems from the fact that it has been rigorously shown
to  identify,  with  a  high  degree  of  certainty,  a  connection  between  evidence  and  an
individual  of  interest.  This  certainty  can  be  traced  back  to  efforts  of  NIST  on  the
development of both the test methodologies for DNA analysis and the standard ref-
erence  materials  that  can  be  used  for  laboratory  as  well  as  test  certification.  There
are  other  common  techniques  used  by  forensic  scientists  such  as  fingerprint  anal-
ysis,  ballistic  tests,  hair  matching,  pattern  recognition,  and  paint  matching  that
could benefit from a robust research and development program. Many of these tech-
niques  based  on  observation,  experience,  and  reasoning  lack  validation  on  their  ac-
curacy and reliability. Because of these shortcomings, many of the forensic tests can
have high error rates. To resolve these issues, additional research and experimental
testing detailing the reliability of the methods is required.

Lack of Federal Standards

The forensic science community includes crime scene investigators, State and local
crime  laboratories,  medical  examiners,  private  forensic  laboratories,  and  law  en-
forcement identification units. They may use registries of information, databases for
matching,  or  reference  materials  for  comparisons  of  evidence.  The  registries  need  a
common interface to aid in training and accessibility for all users in the community.
The  databases  need  to  be  inter-operable  to  allow  for  communication  between  dif-
ferent  sources.  In  addition,  reference  materials  must  be  standardized  so  that  test
equipment  can  all  be  calibrated  to  an  accurate  and  reliable  level.  Currently  there
are no clear and consistent standards for the forensic community to apply the tools
available  to  them;  instead  there  are  many  different  methodologies  with  no  single
certification  method  for  practitioners.  Without  clear  and  measurable  standards  for
all  forensic  science  disciplines,  not  just  DNA  analysis,  it  is  impossible  to  assess
whether one organization is properly conducting analyses. In addition, it is difficult
to  ascertain  the  validity  of  a  specific  forensic  science  methodology.  The  report  rec-
ommends that standards need to be set for all facets of forensic science and a certifi-
cation program needs to be developed for both the practitioners and laboratories.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

Chair  WU.  Good  morning.  The  hearing  will  now  come  to  order.
I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s  hearing.  The  spur
for  this  hearing  was  the  release  of  a  recent  National  Academy  of
Sciences  report,  Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United
States:  A  Path  Forward.  This  report  makes  a  number  of  rec-
ommendations  on  how  to  improve  forensic  science  in  the  United
States  and  many  of  the  recommendations  ask  for  research  that
supports forensic science and for standards and accreditation to en-
sure  the  validity,  accuracy  and  reliability  of  forensic  science  test-
ing.

The  purpose  of  today’s  hearing  is  to  determine  whether  we  can
build  on  the  resources  and  expertise  at  the  National  Institute  of
Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  to  implement  some  of  the  re-
port’s  recommendations.  The  report  suggests  creating  an  entirely
new  department  to  govern  forensics  issues  and  calls  for  this  new
agency to work with NIST. Given our current economic climate and
other  constraints,  I  would  first  like  to  explore  how  we  can  build
upon  and  improve  existing  federal  capabilities  rather  than  trying
to create a whole new governmental structure. We have all learned
from the experience of creating the Department of Homeland Secu-
rity  that  legislatively  providing  for  a  new  agency  is  far  easier  and
far  different  than  from  executing  on  the  actual  implementation  of
the new agency.

I  fully  support  the  goal  of  the  report  to  improve  forensic  science
in  the  United  States.  The  popular  television  show,  ‘‘Crime  Scene
Investigation,’’ or CSI, has raised public awareness and expectation
of  the  role  of  forensic  science  in  helping  us  to  solve  crimes.  How-
ever,  the  show  depicts  the  practice  of  forensics  in  a  manner  that
is far different from the current state of technology or our method-
ology. I hope that this hearing is a first step in bringing reality into
better  alignment  with  the  high  expectations  created  by  our  enter-
tainment industry.

We  have  an  experienced  and  distinguished  panel  of  witnesses
today.  I  want  to  thank  each  of  you  for  taking  the  time  to  appear
before  the  Subcommittee  and  I  look  forward  to  hearing  your  views
and advice on how to move forward from here. We all want to sup-
port law enforcement and judicial process by providing the best fo-
rensic science base available.

Now  I  would  like  to  recognize  the  Ranking  Member  of  the  Sub-

committee, Representative Smith, for his opening statement.

[The prepared statement of Chair Wu follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIR DAVID WU

Good  morning.  I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s  hearing.  The  spur
for  this  hearing  was  the  release  of  a  recent  National  Academy  of  Sciences  report:
‘‘Strengthening Forensic Science in the United States: A Path Forward.’’ This report
makes  a  number  of  recommendations  on  how  to  improve  forensic  science  in  the
United States. Many of the recommendations ask for research that supports forensic
science and for standards and accreditation to ensure the validity, accuracy, and re-
liability of forensic science testing.

The  purpose  of  today’s  hearing  is  to  determine  whether  we  can  build  on  the  re-
sources and expertise at the National Institute of Standards and Technology to im-
plement some of the report’s recommendations. The report suggests creating an en-
tirely  new  department  to  govern  forensics  issues  and  calls  for  this  new  department
to work with NIST. Given the current economic climate I would like to explore how
we  can  build  upon  and  improve  existing  federal  capabilities  rather  than  trying  to
create  a  whole  new  government  structure.  We  have  all  learned  from  the  creation

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

of the Department of Homeland Security that legislating a new agency is far easier
than executing on the implementation of the new agency.

I  fully  support  the  goal  of  the  report  to  improve  forensic  science  in  the  United
States.  The  popular  television  show  ‘‘Crime  Scene  Investigation,’’  better  known  as
CSI,  has  raised  public  awareness  and  expectation  of  the  role  of  forensic  science  in
solving crimes; however, the show depicts the practice of forensics in a manner that
is  far  different  from  the  current  state  of  technology.  I  hope  this  hearing  is  a  first
step in moving from entertainment to reality.

We have an experienced and distinguished panel of witnesses today who all have
important and busy jobs. I want to thank them for taking the time to appear before
the  Subcommittee  today.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  their  views  and  advice  on  how
to move the process forward. We all want to support our law enforcement and judi-
cial processes by providing them with the best forensic science base possible.

Mr.  SMITH.  Mr.  Chair,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today
on  the  very  important  issue  of  forensic  science.  Many,  if  not  most,
of the issues we undertake in this subcommittee have direct impli-
cations  well  beyond  our  scientific  and  technological  enterprise.  Fo-
rensic science is no different but it is certainly of particular unique
importance in that it is a key factor in the fundamental functioning
of our justice system. This importance has only increased in recent
years  through  the  advancement  of  new  technologies  that  have  en-
abled  forensics  to  contribute  a  growing  amount  of  information  to
law  enforcement  investigations  as  well  as  courtroom  proceedings.
These advances undoubtedly improved our ability to not only iden-
tify  and  convict  the  guilty  but  also,  very  importantly,  exclude  the
innocent. However, as the National Academy of Sciences’ [NAS] re-
port on strengthening forensic science demonstrates, continued im-
provement  is  necessary  to  maximize  the  quality  of  and  our  cor-
responding confidence in forensic evidence that is used in the court-
room. The NAS report’s core finding, that many forensic disciplines
are in need of more rigorous scientific review to validate their accu-
racy and reliability, is very serious and requires the full and imme-
diate attention of Congress, the justice system and certainly the fo-
rensic science community.

But it is important to remember the absence of rigorous scientific
underpinning  in  many  forensic  disciplines  does  not  mean  these
methods are inaccurate or unreliable. Accordingly, I think it is im-
portant to recognize the enormous value forensic evidence provides
to  the  justice  system,  even  in  the  absence  of  full  scientific  valida-
tion,  and  accordingly  exercise  caution  to  ensure  we  are  not  overly
dismissive of forensic evidence.

The immediate focus of this hearing today, however, is to review
the scientific and technical recommendations of the NAS report and
discuss  how  they  can  best  be  addressed,  particularly  through  the
National Institute of Standards and Technology, which has the pro-
grams and expertise to be a key driver of improvements in forensic
science.

I  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  today,  and  I  look  forward

to a productive discussion.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Smith follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE ADRIAN SMITH

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today  on  the  very  important
issue  of  forensic  science.  Many  if  not  most  of  the  issues  we  undertake  in  this  sub-
committee  have  direct  implications  well  beyond  our  scientific  and  technological  en-
terprise. Forensic science is no different, but it is of particularly unique importance
in that it is a key factor in the fundamental functioning of our justice system.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

This  importance  has  only  increased  in  recent  years  through  the  advancement  of
new technologies that have enabled forensics to contribute a growing amount of in-
formation to law enforcement investigations as well as courtroom proceedings. These
advances have undoubtedly improved our ability to not only identify and convict the
guilty, but also exclude the innocent.

However,  as  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  report  on  strengthening  forensic
science  demonstrates,  continued  improvement  is  necessary  to  maximize  the  quality
of—and  our  corresponding  confidence  in—forensic  evidence  that  is  used  the  court-
room.

The NAS report’s core finding—that many forensic disciplines are in need of more
rigorous  scientific  review  to  validate  their  accuracy  and  reliability—is  very  serious,
and  requires  the  full  and  immediate  attention  of  Congress,  the  justice  system,  and
the forensic science community.

But  it  is  important  to  remember  the  absence  of  rigorous  scientific  underpinning
in  many  forensic  disciplines  does  not  mean  these  methods  are  inaccurate  or  unreli-
able;  it  simply  means  they  are  in  need  of  evaluation.  Accordingly,  I  think  it  is  im-
portant  to  recognize  the  enormous  value  forensic  evidence  provides  to  the  justice
system even in the absence of full scientific validation, and accordingly exercise cau-
tion to ensure we are not overly dismissive of forensic evidence.

The immediate focus of this hearing today, however, is to review the scientific and
technical recommendations of the NAS report and discuss how they can best be ad-
dressed,  particularly  through  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology,
which has the programs and expertise to be a key driver of improvements in foren-
sic science.

I  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here,  and  I  look  forward  to  a  productive  discus-

sion.

Mr. SMITH. One final item, Mr. Chair. I do have a letter from the
National  District  Attorneys’  Association,  and  with  unanimous  con-
sent I ask that it be included in the record. [See Appendix 2: Addi-
tional Material for the Record.]

Chair WU. Without objection, so ordered.
Mr. SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
Chair WU. Thank you, Mr. Smith.
If there are other Members who wish to submit additional open-
ing  statements,  your  statements  will  be  included  in  the  record  at
this point.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Today  we  will  discuss  issues  related  to  the  accuracy,  standards,  reliability,  and
validity  of  forensic  science  and  how  the  National  Institutes  of  Standards  and  Tech-
nology  can  play  a  role  in  developing  standards  and  certified  test  methodologies  re-
lated to forensic science.

According  to  Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  For-
ward, a study conducted by the National Academy of Sciences Committee on Identi-
fying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic  Science  Community,  many  of  the  techniques  and
technologies utilized in forensic science lack rigorous scientific discipline.

Furthermore,  this  study  also  found  that  individual  labs  and  the  technicians  who
collect  and  process  evidence  do  not  utilize  consistent  and  standard  accreditation
methods.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  more  from  our  witnesses  on  how  NIST  can  play  a  role

in the standardization of forensic science methodology.

I yield back.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Broun follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PAUL C. BROUN

Good  Morning.  I’d  like  to  thank  Chairman  Wu  and  Ranking  Member  Smith  for
hosting  this  important  hearing.  I’d  also  like  to  join  them  and  the  rest  of  my  col-
leagues in welcoming our esteemed guests. The National Academy of Sciences recent
report:  ‘‘Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,’’  set
forth  numerous  ideas  to  improve  the  forensic  sciences  including  upgrading  our  sys-
tems and organizational structures, better training, widespread adoption of uniform

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

and  enforceable  best  practices,  and  mandatory  certification  and  accreditation  pro-
grams.  These  are  all  reasonable  and  necessary  recommendations  which  would  go  a
long way toward improving forensic science in the United States and I applaud the
members of the National Academies for their diligence and hard work in assembling
this report as we look to improve the reliability and accuracy of forensic testing.

As a scientist, I value truth above all else. I believe a vital component of our judi-
cial system should be to provide a means of forensic testing that is beyond reproach
in  its  accuracy  and  is  uniform  in  its  application.  It  is  of  a  vital  national  interest
that  our  forensic  science  techniques  and  procedures  be  as  close  to  perfect  as  pos-
sible.  It’s  a  shame  that  forensic  evidence  has  been  misinterpreted  in  that  past  and
resulted  in  innocent  people  being  jailed  unjustly,  or  conversely  in  the  guilty  being
set free. So I stress that it is absolutely vital that we continue to commit resources
towards furthering forensics with specific goals of one day reaching 100 percent ac-
curacy and of broadening the applications for its use.

However, I must join with the Chairman in my skepticism of creating an entirely
new  department  to  oversee  this  venture.  Not  only  is  it  rarely  ever  a  good  idea  for
the Federal Government to create a new bureaucracy, as the Chairman has already
stated, but in my view it is unconstitutional to do so, as nowhere in the documents
our Founding Fathers penned do they afford Congress that power. Instead, I believe
that  we  should  look  to  individual  states  to  set  uniform  standards  for  use  within
their  borders,  or  expanding  the  resources  available  to  NIST  and  authorizing  them
to  formulate  and  set  new  standards  and  to  test  current  and  potential  forensic
science  techniques  which  may  be  even  more  beneficial  to  the  pursuit  of  truth  into
the future. Any move to federalize forensic science is a move to stifle scientific free-
dom and in its place adopt more government control.

I look forward to hearing testimony from these many fine scientists who have gra-
ciously come before us today and I hope they can help us move towards our mutual
goal  of  strengthening  forensic  science  and  its  applications  in  our  criminal  justice
system.

Thank you again for allowing me the time to speak today Mr. Chairman.
Chair WU. It is my pleasure to introduce our panel of witnesses.
Mr.  Pete  Marone  is  the  Director  of  Technical  Services  at  the  Vir-
ginia  Department  of  Forensic  Science.  Ms.  Carol  Henderson  is  the
Director of the National Clearinghouse for Science, Technology and
the Law. She is also a Professor of Law at Stetson University Col-
lege of Law and the Past President of the American Academy of Fo-
rensic Sciences. Mr. John Hicks is the retired Director of the Office
of  Forensic  Services  at  the  New  York  State  Division  of  Criminal
Justice Services and the former Director of the FBI Laboratory. Dr.
Jamie  Downs  is  the  Coastal  Regional  Medical  Examiner  at  the
Georgia Bureau of Investigation. And our final witness is Mr. Peter
Neufeld,  who  is  the  Co-Founder  and  Co-Director  of  the  Innocence
Project.

Mr. Marone, if you would like to proceed, you will each have five
minutes for your spoken testimony and your written testimony will
be  included  in  the  record.  When  you  complete  your  testimony—all
of  you  complete  your  testimony—we  will  begin  with  questions  and
each  Member  will  have  five  minutes  to  question  the  panel.  Mr.
Marone, please proceed.
STATEMENT OF MR. PETER M. MARONE, DIRECTOR, VIRGINIA

DEPARTMENT OF FORENSIC SCIENCE

Mr.  MARONE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  Ranking  Member  Smith.  It
is  certainly  a  pleasure,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  speak
to  this  committee.  My  name  is  Peter  Marone  and  I  have  gotten  a
promotion  since  then.  I  am  Director  of  the  Commonwealth  of  Vir-
ginia’s  Department  of  Forensic  Science  now  and  was  a  member  of
the committee identifying the needs of the forensic science commu-
nity.  Of  course,  this  was  a  study  that  NIJ  [National  Institute  of
Justice]  funded  at  the  request  of  the  Senate  Appropriations  Com-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

mittee  but  it  was  really  requested  quite  heavily  by  the  forensic
science community to make it happen.

In  the  testimony  today,  what  I  would  like  to  do  is  shorten  and
simplify  all  the  recommendations  of  the  committee  and  specify  or
spend  the  time  on  four  particular  issues  and  the  full  potential  of
the  program,  broken  into  scientific  and  technical  challenges  that
must be met in order for forensic science enterprise to reach its full
potential.  I  would  like  to  break  it  into  four  categories,  the  first
being funding, resources, if you will, research, standardization, and
education.

The  first  element  really  is  probably  one  of  the  most  important,
and  it  was  not  specifically  addressed  as  a  recommendation  by  the
committee,  and  that  is  the  resource  issue.  Although  we  didn’t  ad-
dress it as a particular criteria, it was very, very understood by the
committee that for the State and local laboratories there was a lack
of  resources,  whether  it  be  money,  staffing,  training  or  equipment
necessary to promote and maintain strong forensic science systems.
As  you  are  acutely  aware  right  now,  states  are  now  in  a  fiscal  cri-
sis. I would submit that laboratories and medical examiners’ offices
have  been  in  a  fiscal  crisis  for  a  number  of  years.  This  is  nothing
new for us. Further, the funding from the Federal Government has
really  been  focused  overwhelmingly  to  one  discipline,  and  that  is
DNA.  What  I  would  like  to  say  as  an  individual  is,  make  it  very
clear  that  we  are  asking  for  funding  for  the  full  breadth  of  the  fo-
rensic science disciplines but not to the exclusion of DNA. In other
words,  we  are  saying  very  clearly,  don’t  take  the  DNA  money  and
give  it  to  everybody  else,  keep  all  the  disciplines  funded  and  sup-
ported.  I  want  to  make  that  very,  very  clear  because  in  a  lot  of
issues that is a misunderstanding.

Under  the  category  of  research,  the  committee  determined  that
the forensic science disciplines need further research to provide the
proper  underlying  validation  for  some  of  the  methods  in  use  and
to  provide  the  basis  for  more  precise  statements  about  their  reli-
ability and precision. The report clearly states that there is a value
in many of the disciplines addressed that the forensic science com-
munity  itself  has  been  stating  for  more  than  a  decade.  In  order  to
accomplish this we need more funding for research and a stronger,
broader  research  base.  Disciplines  based  on  biological  or  chemical
analysis such as toxicology, drug analysis, some trace-evidence dis-
ciplines such as explosives, fire debris, paint and fiber analysis are
all well validated and shouldn’t be in the same category as the ex-
perience-based  disciplines  such  as  fingerprints,  firearms  and  tool
marks  and  other  pattern  recognition  types  of  analysis.  We  need
studies, for instance, that look on a large population of fingerprints
and tool marks just to qualify how many sources might share simi-
lar features. Similarly, we need more research on the issues of con-
text effect and examiner bias.

In  standardization,  for  example,  one  of  the  issues  was  that  lab-
oratories  need  to  be  mandatorily  accredited.  During  our  reviews,
we  found  that  there  are  approximately  400  laboratories—publicly
funded  laboratories  in  the  United  States,  but  320  of  them  are  al-
ready  accredited  so  it  is  not  like  the  laboratories  aren’t  espousing
this  idea,  and  the  same  thing  for  the  not-mandatory  certification.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

There  are  a  significant  number  of  individuals  who  are  voluntarily
being certified.

The  primary  conclusion  was  that  the  forensic  science  enterprise
doesn’t  have  a  unified  plan.  It  needs  strong,  fresh,  national  direc-
tion.  Strong  leadership  is  needed  to  adopt  and  promote  aggressive
long-term agenda to strengthen forensic science. Our report strong-
ly urges Congress to establish a new independent institute of foren-
sic science to lead the research efforts, establish and enforce stand-
ards for forensic science professionals, and oversee education. Now,
I understand that NIST [National Institute of Standards and Tech-
nology]  serves  that  purpose  to  a  certain  extent  and  we  all  agree
that NIST does serve a very important purpose. It does have exper-
tise  in  standardization  and  experience  in  a  number  of  those  types
of  issues  for  establishing  coherent  laboratory  practices  and  report-
ing  professionalism,  codes  of  ethics  and  so  forth.  What  NIST
doesn’t  have  is  all  the  package,  and  as  the  committee  reviewed  all
the existing entities, nobody has the global experience necessary to
complete  the  package,  to  give  all  the  planning.  There  are  bits  and
pieces  in  every  one  of  them,  nobody  has  that,  and  the  key  is  that
whatever  entity  this  is  has  to  be  something  that  is  new  in  the
sense  that  the  fear  is  if  you  put  it  in  an  existing  entity  or  under
an existing agency, they will tend to create the new entity in their
own  image  and  likeness,  if  you  will.  In  other  words,  they  will  con-
tinue  doing  things  the  way  they  do,  and  what  we  really  need  is
fresh thinking, new thoughts, new issues to be addressed.

I  will  finish  up  quite  quickly  here  now.  Mr.  Chair  and  Members
of the Committee, I would like to thank you for the opportunity to
come  here  today.  I  would  like  to  conclude  by  quoting  a  part  of  our
study which I believe is one of the most important statements and
findings  we  had.  ‘‘Numerous  professionals  in  the  forensic  science
community  and  the  medical  examiner  system  worked  for  years  to
achieve  excellence  in  their  fields,  aiming  to  follow  high  ethical
norms,  develop  sound  professional  standards,  ensure  accurate  re-
sults  in  their  practices  and  improve  the  processes  by  which  accu-
racy  is  determined.  Although  the  work  of  these  dedicated  profes-
sionals  has  resulted  in  significant  progress  in  the  forensic  science
disciplines  in  recent  decades,  major  challenges  still  face  the  foren-
sic science community.’’

I thank you for your time. I will be pleased to answer any ques-

tions you have.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Marone follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER M. MARONE

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  My  name  is  Pete
Marone.  I  am  Director  of  the  Commonwealth  of  Virginia’s  Department  of  Forensic
Sciences  and  a  member  of  the  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic
Science  Community  of  the  National  Research  Council.  The  Research  Council  is  the
operating arm of the National Academy of Sciences, National Academy of Engineer-
ing, and the Institute of Medicine of the National Academies, chartered by Congress
in  1863  to  advise  the  government  on  matters  of  science  and  technology.  Our  study
was sponsored by the National Institute of Justice at the request of the Senate Ap-
propriations Committee.

This  study,  as  you  know,  was  requested  by  Congress  at  the  urging  of  the  Crime
Lab  Community  itself.  The  charge  was  (1)  assess  the  present  and  future  resource
needs of the forensic science community, to include State and local crime labs, med-
ical  examiners,  and  coroners;  (2)  make  recommendations  for  maximizing  the  use  of
forensic technologies and techniques to solve crimes, investigate deaths, and protect

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

the public; (3) identify potential scientific advances that may assist law enforcement
in  using  forensic  technologies  and  techniques  to  protect  the  public;  (4)  make  rec-
ommendations  for  programs  that  will  increase  the  number  of  qualified  forensic  sci-
entists and medical examiners available to work in public crime laboratories; (5) dis-
seminate  best  practices  and  guidelines  concerning  the  collection  and  analysis  of  fo-
rensic  evidence  to  help  ensure  quality  and  consistency  in  the  use  of  forensic  tech-
nologies  and  techniques  to  solve  crimes,  investigate  deaths,  and  protect  the  public;
(6)  examine  the  role  of  the  forensic  community  in  the  homeland  security  mission;
(7)  [examine  the]  inter-operability  of  Automated  Fingerprint  Information  Systems;
and  (8)  examine  additional  issues  pertaining  to  forensic  science  as  determined  by
the Committee. The reason the community asked for this study was due to the fact
that the focus of the Federal Government has been on the single discipline of DNA.
The  community,  including  myself,  knew  that  the  other  disciplines  and  the  state  of
our  system  needed  to  have  further  resources  and  assistance  from  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment.  In  my  testimony  today  I  will  simplify,  due  to  time,  our  report—Strength-
ening Forensic Science in the United States: A Path Forward—into the scientific and
technical  challenges  that  must  be  met  in  order  for  the  forensic  science  enterprise
in the United States to operate to its full potential. Specifically, I will discuss them
in  four  classes  of  resources,  research,  standardization,  and  education,  as  these  are
the  primary  challenges  at  this  time.  The  report  found  that  some  of  this  work  has
already been begun by forensic scientists, but that additional effort and coordination
are needed to carry it through.

The  first  element  of  the  charge,  while  not  specifically  addressed  in  the  form  of
a recommendation, led to a clear committee understanding that in general, ‘‘for the
State  and  local  laboratories  there  has  been  a  lack  of  resources  (money,  staff,  train-
ing, and equipment) necessary to promote and maintain strong forensic science lab-
oratory systems.’’ As I know you are acutely aware, the states are in a fiscal crisis.
As  a  State  Crime  Lab  Director  I  know  that  this  has  in  fact  been  the  situation  for
some time. As such, the State and local Crime Labs and the Medical Examiner com-
munity have not been receiving the funds they need, but the case load has been in-
creasing exponentially. Further, the funding from the Federal Government has been
focused overwhelmingly on the discipline of DNA, which is not our largest caseload.
The  Congress  has  consistently  put  some  funding  in  for  the  other  disciplines  but  it
falls  far  short  of  what  is  necessary.  I  want  to  make  it  clear,  Mr.  Chairman,  that
this is at the root of many of our issues and, speaking as an individual, I am asking
Congress  to  please  put  funding  in  at  an  adequate  level  for  all  of  forensic  science,
not just a single discipline.

Under the category of research, the committee determined that some of the foren-
sic  science  disciplines  need  further  research  to  provide  what  the  scientific  commu-
nity commonly uses as the proper underlying validation for some of the methods in
common  use  and  to  provide  the  basis  for  more  precise  statements  about  their  reli-
ability and precision. Because a method has not been sufficiently validated does not
make it invalid. In order to accomplish this, we need more funding for research and
a  stronger,  broader  research  base.  The  disciplines  based  on  biological  or  chemical
analysis,  such  as  toxicology,  drug  analysis,  and  some  trace  evidence  sub-disciplines
such as explosives, fire debris, polymers to include paint and fiber analysis, are gen-
erally  well  validated  and  should  not  be  included  in  the  same  category  as  the  more
experience-based  disciplines,  such  as  fingerprints,  firearms  and  toolmarks,  and
other  pattern-recognition  types  of  analysis.  There  are  variations  within  this  latter
group;  for  example,  there  is  more  available  research  and  protocols  for  fingerprint
analysis than for bite marks. We need studies, for instance, that look at large popu-
lations  of  fingerprints  and  toolmarks  so  as  to  quantify  how  many  sources  might
share  similar  features.  In  addition  to  investigating  the  limits  of  the  techniques
themselves, research is also needed on the effects of context and examiner bias.

In  the  realm  of  standardization  and  education  our  report  raised  concerns  about
the  lack  of  mandatory  requirements  for  professional  certification  and  for  laboratory
accreditation  and  the  variability  in  the  way  forensic  science  results  are  reported  in
courts. I think it is critical to first understand that most in the forensic science com-
munity have already begun to move in the direction of accreditation; in fact the re-
cently published Census of Publicly Funded Crime Laboratories, 2005 stated that by
2005,  82  percent  of  the  public  laboratories  were  accredited.  That  number  is  even
higher  today.  But  more  can  be  done.  Our  report  calls  for  certification  that  is  based
on  written  examinations,  supervised  practice,  proficiency  testing,  and  adherence  to
a  code  of  professional  practice.  The  report  explicitly  calls  for  the  National  Institute
of Standards and Technology, NIST, in collaboration with the proposed National In-
stitute  of  Forensic  Science  [NIFS]  to  be  involved  in  setting  standards  for  certifi-
cation  and  accreditation  and  in  developing  protocols  and  best  practices  for  forensic
analysis,  using  existing  programs  as  a  basis.  Assisting  laboratories  which  have  not

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

yet been accredited is a lengthy process. Each policy and method must be reviewed
to  determine  if  it  is  in  compliance  and,  if  not,  what  must  be  done  to  bring  it  into
compliance. This process can take a few years. That is not to say that the work done
by the laboratory is suspect during the process, but that the standards and criteria
are quite specific.

Our  report’s  primary  conclusion  is  that  the  forensic  science  enterprise  does  not
have a unified plan and needs strong, fresh national direction. Strong leadership is
needed to adopt and promote an aggressive, long-term agenda to strengthen forensic
science.  Our  report  strongly  urges  Congress  to  establish  a  new,  independent  Na-
tional  Institute  of  Forensic  Science  to  lead  research  efforts,  establish  and  enforce
standards  for  forensic  science  professionals  and  laboratories,  and  oversee  education
standards. Our committee carefully considered whether such a governing body could
be  established  within  an  existing  agency,  and  determined  that  it  could  not.  While
we  recognize  the  difficulty  with  this  task,  we  believe  that  the  root  of  the  struggles
this community has is the lack of federal support and guidance.

However,  while  we  were  impressed  with  the  technical  abilities  of  three  NIST
staffers  who  briefed  our  committee,  and  in  fact  had  a  NIST  scientist  as  a  member
of our committee, we concluded that NIST does not have expertise in enough of the
essential  areas  to  play  the  governance  role  that  forensic  science  needs.  First,  while
NIST  has  a  strong  reputation  in  some  aspects  of  forensic  science,  it  would  not  be
seen  by  that  community  as  a  natural  leader.  In  large  part  that  is  because  the  con-
text in which forensic science operates is unique. For example, forensic science must
make  the  most  of  whatever  evidence  has  been  collected,  a  situation  that  is  not  al-
ways amenable to prescriptive standards. And the recommended new federal entity
must be sensitive to the interplay between forensic sciences and the criminal justice
system,  which  is  unfamiliar  territory  for  NIST.  Our  report  calls  on  the  new  entity
to lead an effort to remove public forensic laboratories from the administrative con-
trol  of  law  enforcement  agencies  or  prosecutors’  offices  or  be  autonomous  within
such  agencies.  That  is  likely  to  be  a  difficult  task,  one  that  requires  knowledge  of
relationships among those operations and between federal, State, and local jurisdic-
tions. It is a challenge to which NIST is not well suited.

As I already indicated, a key recommendation of our report is to build up the re-
search base and educational infrastructure that will enable forensic science to move
forward. NIST does not have much experience in establishing and running an extra-
mural  research  program,  and  its  ability  to  stimulate  new  academic  forensic  pro-
grams  and  strengthen  existing  ones  is  untested.  Another  key  requirement  is  to
strengthen  the  practices  of  forensic  science.  While  NIST  has  great  expertise  in  es-
tablishing  laboratory  standards,  it  has  not  previously  taken  on  a  task  similar  to
what  is  required  for  forensic  science:  establishing  a  coherent  set  of  standards  for
laboratory  practice,  reporting,  and  professionalism  (including  codes  of  ethics),  along
with  standards  and  practices  for  laboratory  accreditation  and  professional  certifi-
cation and incentives for their widespread adoption.

NIST does not have expertise in, and influence over, the medicolegal death inves-
tigation system, nor expertise in the issues that need to be addressed to strengthen
that system, a critical recommendation in our report.

However,  the  strongest  reason  for  establishing  a  new  independent  entity  is  that
it  could  then  be  established  according  to  the  vision  laid  out  in  our  report.  If  a  new
institute  is  established  as  an  arm  of  some  existing  entity,  that  entity  will  tend  to
design it according to its own existing knowledge and experience, with whatever bu-
reaucracy  or  biases  that  entails.  As  an  example  of  this  very  issue,  a  draft  copy  of
a  white  paper  from  NIST,  provided  to  me  by  the  staff  of  this  committee  regarding
the  establishment  of  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Science  within  NIST,  lists  a
number  of  actions  it  proposes  to  answer  the  recommendations  of  the  NAS  report.
However,  what  was  not  addressed  at  all  in  that  proposal  was  how  the  existing  ac-
creditation  programs  (both  for  laboratories  and  forensic  science  undergraduate  and
graduate  education  programs),  programs  for  certification  of  individuals,  and  the
technical  protocols  (although  not  mandatory)  that  are  already  in  place  through  the
various  scientific  working  groups  (SWGs)  and  in  use  by  many  laboratories,  would
serve as a basis for and be incorporated into the plan. There also was no indication
as  to  how  laboratories  would  be  supported  in  their  efforts  to  meet  these  standards.
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity
to  come  before  you  today.  I’d  like  to  conclude  by  quoting  a  part  of  our  study  which
I believe is one of the most important statements and findings we had:

‘‘Numerous professionals in the forensic science community and the medical ex-
aminer system have worked for years to achieve excellence in their fields, aim-
ing  to  follow  high  ethical  norms,  develop  sound  professional  standards,  ensure
accurate results in their practices, and improve the processes by which accuracy

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

is  determined.  Although  the  work  of  these  dedicated  professionals  has  resulted
in  significant  progress  in  the  forensic  science  disciplines  in  recent  decades,
major challenges still face the forensic science community.’’

Again,  thank  you  for  your  attention,  and  I  will  be  pleased  to  answer  questions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

BIOGRAPHY FOR PETER M. MARONE

B.S. Chemistry, University of Pittsburgh, 1970
M.S. Chemistry, University of Pittsburgh, 1971

Pete Marone began his forensic career at the Allegheny County Crime Laboratory
in  1971  and  remained  in  Pittsburgh  until  1978  when  he  accepted  a  position  with
the Virginia Bureau of Forensic Science. In 1998 he became the Central Laboratory
Director  with  the  Division.  On  February  1,  2007  he  was  appointed  Director  of  the
Virginia  Department  of  Forensic  Science.  He  is  a  member  of  the  American  Society
of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors  (ASCLD),  American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences,
Mid-Atlantic  Association  of  Forensic  Scientists,  Forensic  Science  Society,  and  the
International  Association  for  Chemical  Testing.  He  has  served  on  the  ASCLD  DNA
Credential  Review  Committee  and  as  the  chair  of  the  undergraduate  curriculum
committee  of  the  Technical  Working  Group  for  Forensic  Science  Training  and  Edu-
cation  (TWGED),  is  a  past  Chair  of  ASCLD–LAB  (Laboratory  Accreditation  Board).
He  is  a  member  of  the  Forensic  Education  Program  Accreditation  Commission
(FEPAC)  for  the  American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences,  and  served  on  the  Na-
tional  Academy  of  Sciences  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic
Science Community. He is currently Chair of the Consortium of Forensic Science Or-
ganizations (CFSO).

Chair WU. Thank you, Mr. Marone.
Ms. Henderson, please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  MS.  CAROL  E.  HENDERSON,  DIRECTOR,  NA-
TIONAL  CLEARINGHOUSE  FOR  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY  AND
THE  LAW;  PROFESSOR  OF  LAW,  STETSON  UNIVERSITY  COL-
LEGE  OF  LAW;  PAST  PRESIDENT,  THE  AMERICAN  ACADEMY
OF FORENSIC SCIENCES
Ms. HENDERSON. Thank you, Mr. Chair and Members of the Sub-
committee.  I  was  already  introduced  but  I  wanted  to  mention  that
as  the  Director  of  the  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science,  Tech-
nology and the Law, we have created the only searchable database
in  the  world  of  Raw  science  and  technology  information.  As  you
mentioned,  I  am  also  a  Professor  of  Law  and  the  immediate  Past
President  of  the  American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences,  and  in
fact,  two  of  the  officers  of  the  Academy  are  here  in  the  audience
today.

I was an Assistant United States Attorney with extensive experi-
ence;  I  was  also  a  founder  of  the  Florida  Innocence  Project;  and  I
have  more  than  20  years  of  involvement  in  teaching  and  scholarly
writing on the interface of science and law. I am well aware of the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

importance  of  forensic  science  to  the  justice  system  and  the  nexus
between science and law is critical to forensic science. We therefore
have to recognize that the forensic overhaul which has been desired
by the NAS [National Academy of Sciences] committee with exten-
sive  work,  and  I  did  go  to  four  of  the  five  hearings  that  they  had,
requires  a  collaboration  of  all  the  stakeholders:  attorneys  and
judges,  crime  laboratory  and  technical  personnel  and  the  civil  ex-
pert witnesses as well.

I  believe  we  have  really  been  presented  with  an  opportunity  to
make  forensic  science  serve  justice  even  more  reliably  and  effec-
tively. This is the time to build better forensic science, but we must
be realistic in regard to the urgency of acting now and not permit-
ting defects identified in the report to go unaddressed, yet we have
to  make  the  best  use  of  available  resources  and  go  forward  in  a
measured  and  considered  manner  that  creates  sound  and  lasting
systems. I am therefore recommending a three-step approach.

One  is  immediate  action  using  existing  federal  resources  to  ad-
dress  scientific  standards.  Two,  we  need  interim  action  which  will
evaluate strategic policy decisions and strategies and explore inno-
vative solutions. Vision is needed. And then a long-term goal of cre-
ating  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Sciences  [NIFS]  as  envi-
sioned by the [NAS] committee.

The urgent action, which I am going to go to first, is making the
best  use  of  our  existing  resources.  Many  of  the  issues  that  were
identified  in  the  report  concern  scientific  foundation  of  disciplines
and  subdisciplines  in  forensic  science.  The  concerns  range  from,
and  I  quote,  ‘‘Are  these  techniques  fundamentally  unsound’’  to,
while  there  is  a  body  of  evidence  that  the  techniques  are  of  value,
there is a lack of validation to the degree that has been established
in  the  introduction  of  DNA  testing.  There  is  an  existing  federal
agency  well  suited  to  the  task,  namely  the  National  Institute  of
Standards  and  Technology  [NIST].  This  is  where  we  can  begin.
NIST has a national role in promoting scientific standards and has
made  significant  contributions  to  the  core  science  in  several  areas
of forensic science, although not in all areas of forensic science.

Now  I  would  like  to  move  on  to  the  interim  action.  We  need  to
implement a program to address policy issues and focus on innova-
tive processes and these include, and I have to echo Pete, we need
research, much more of it. We need education, and it is not just for
the  people  who  are  in  the  crime  laboratories,  but  for  lawyers  and
judges.  We  need,  of  course,  to  continue  accreditation  and
credentialing.  We  cannot  be  bridged  with  a  Band-Aid,  and  I
brought  crime  scene  Band-Aids  to  show  you  all.  You  can  have  one
later. All right. But, it is true a Band-Aid is not going to solve this
problem,  but  a  bridge  will,  and  I  think  that  is  one  thing  that  we
have to look at. So these interim issues must be addressed, and in
fact,  notably,  I  have  to  tell  you,  there  are  very  few  papers  regard-
ing  forensic  science  policy  out  there,  and  that  is  something  else
that needs to be addressed as well. There is no established forensic
equivalent  to  think  tanks  like  the  Aspen  Institute,  and  my  objec-
tive in discussing these interim objectives with you is to emphasize
how important they are and the need for carefully thought out pol-
icy and strategic planning.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

The long-term action is to create a NIFS, and I am very familiar
with NIFS in Australia. It took them 20 years to get off the ground.
And I talked to Alistair Ross, who is now the interim director, who
was  the  original  director  there,  and  I  talked  to  him  last  night.
Many  of  the  recommendations  say  this  is  great  to  have  an  over-
sight  and  coordinating  body,  but  you  really  have  to  be  practical,
and I have to say, that is one thing: I am practical. This committee
knows  all  too  well  the  lengthy,  you  know,  consultative  processes
that  will  have  to  be  undertaken  if  the  government  chooses  to  pur-
sue  creating  a  NIFS  in  the  United  States.  The  process  will  not  be
instant and will, as with the interim issues discussed above, benefit
from careful analysis of policy, strategic planning and implementa-
tion factors.

All  right.  So  now  I  would  like  to  talk  about  the  overhaul,  which
is  what  was  recommended  in  the  NAS  report,  and  these  are  more
general  considerations  based  on  my  personal  experience  both  as  a
law  professor,  a  federal  prosecutor  and  the  Past  President  of  the
American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences  [AAFC],  although  as  I
mentioned, I am not here as a spokesperson for the Academy, only
the  president  or  the  president-elect  can  speak.  The  lack  of  aca-
demic  freedom  in  research  and  development  results  in  a  stifling  of
forensic  science.  As  long  as  the  overwhelming  body  of  forensic
science  does  not  challenge  itself  or  respond  to  the  voices  of  all  its
stakeholders,  especially  the  legal  community  which  is  a  primary
stakeholder, we won’t move forward. I do have great hope, though,
for  forensic  science.  In  fact,  my  theme  while  I  was  the  President
[of AAFS] was, Forensic Science: Envisioning and Creating the Fu-
ture.  AAFS,  I  have  to  tell  you,  has  recognized  education,
credentialing  accreditation,  and  we  actually  raised  more  than
$300,000  last  year  for  forensic  science  research  because  I  knew,
and  I  think  all  of  us  knew,  it  was  a  priority.  And  we  have  really
welcomed  the  NAS  report,  and  under  President  Tom  Bohan,  who
is  in  the  audience  here,  we  will  continue  to  champion  changes  to
the forensic landscape.

So  how  do  we  make  significant  changes?  We  can  draw  an  anal-
ogy  with  the  race  to  the  Moon.  The  Space  Age  had  catastrophes
just like forensic science, but its successes came because there was
a  stretching,  but  achievable  goal  and  scientists  and  engineers  at
NASA  could  apply  themselves  to  delivering  successful  outcomes.
Give  forensic  science  the  same  target  and  we  will  see  even  more
progress than has been achieved so far. Challenging the status quo
is as important as a unified commitment to a clear set of objectives
and a strategic plan. We must identify innovative approaches. It is
very  key  to  be  strategic.  Innovation  is  a  cultural  issue  as  much  as
one of the infrastructure and a case can be illustrated by compari-
son  to  the  medical  model  of  education  and  research.  Medical
schools  in  top-tier  universities  act  as  centers  of  excellence  and  a
second  opinion  is  allowed,  in  fact  expected.  By  contract,  forensic
science sometimes responds defensively to criticism and regards re-
quests for a second opinion as a slight and not as a tool to encour-
age  interaction  with  stakeholders.  I  have  to  say,  Representative
Gordon,  the  Chair  of  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology,  has  reminded  us  that  scientific  progress  occurs  when  we
foster the open exchange of ideas and information. That is excellent

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

advice  and  could  form  the  basis  of  a  goal  of  collaboration  between
all  our  stakeholders,  and  President  Obama  has  also  pledged  to
place  science  at  the  top  of  the  national  agenda  commitment,  and
that is something we in forensic science embrace.

I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  ad-

dress you and your serious consideration of the report.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Henderson follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CAROL E. HENDERSON

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee:

My  name  is  Carol  Henderson.  I  am  the  Director  of  the  National  Clearinghouse
for  Science  Technology  and  the  Law  (NCSTL),  which  is  a  program  of  the  National
Institute  of  Justice.  Through  my  leadership  of  NCSTL,  I  have  been  responsible  for
creating  the  only  searchable  database  on  science,  technology  and  law  information
in  the  world.  I  am  a  Professor  of  Law  at  Stetson  University  College  of  Law,  and
the immediate Past President of the American Academy of Forensic Sciences. As an
Assistant United States Attorney with extensive experience, a founder of the Florida
Innocence  Project,  and  more  than  twenty  years  of  involvement  in  teaching  and
scholarly  writing  on  the  interface  between  science  and  law,  I  am  well  aware  of  the
importance of forensic science to the justice system. The nexus between science and
law  is  critical  to  forensic  science.  We  therefore  have  to  recognize  that  the  ‘‘forensic
overhaul’’  desired  by  the  NAS  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic
Sciences  Community  requires  the  collaboration  of  all  stakeholders:  attorneys  and
judges, crime laboratory and technical personnel, and civil expert witnesses.

We  have  been  presented  with  an  opportunity  to  make  forensic  science  serve  jus-
tice  even  more  reliably  and  effectively.  This  is  the  time  to  build  better  ‘‘forensic
science.’’  However,  we  must  be  realistic  in  regard  to  the  urgency  of  acting  now  and
not permitting defects identified in the report to go unaddressed, yet make the best
use  of  available  resources  and  go  forward  in  a  measured  and  considered  manner
that creates sound and lasting systems.

I am therefore recommending a three-step approach:

standards;

• immediate  action  that  uses  existing  federal  resources  to  address  scientific
• interim  action  to  evaluate  strategic  policy  directions  and  strategies  and  ex-
• a  long-term  goal  of  creating  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Sciences  (NIFS)
as envisioned by the NAS Committee on Identifying the Needs of the Forensic
Sciences Community.

plore innovative solutions;

Urgent Action: Making the best use of existing resources:

Many of the issues identified in the report concern the scientific foundation of dis-
ciplines  and  sub-disciplines  in  forensic  science.  The  concerns  range  from  ‘‘are  these
techniques  fundamentally  unsound’’  to  ‘‘while  there  is  a  body  of  evidence  that  the
techniques  are  of  value,  there  is  a  lack  of  validation  to  the  degree  that  has  been
established in the introduction of DNA testing.’’

There  is  an  existing  federal  agency  well-suited  to  the  task,  namely  the  National
Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST).  NIST  has  a  national  role  in  pro-
moting  scientific  standards,  and  has  made  significant  contributions  to  the  core
science in several areas of forensic science. Its successes include advancement of the
fundamental  science  of  forensic  DNA  testing,  fundamental  work  on  AFIS  systems,
and major contributions to firearms comparisons. These bring together areas defined
at various points in the NAS report as being the new scientific gold standard of fo-
rensic  testing  (DNA)  and  areas  that  are  badly  in  need  of  fundamental  research  to
provide  a  valid  scientific  basis  to  support  decades  of  technical  experience
(fingerprinting and firearms/tool mark examination). NIST also has a well-deserved
reputation for independence—a recurring concern of the NAS panel.

Interim Action: Implement a program to address policy issues and focus on

innovative processes:

The  corollary  to  the  need  for  rapid  action  and  using  existing  resources  such  as
NIST  to  address  scientific  standards,  is  that  the  wider  issues  such  as  those  of  the
independence  of  crime  laboratories  and  encouraging  education,  research,  accredita-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

tion  and  credentialing,  require  very  careful  development  and  consideration.  For  ex-
ample,  more  than  90  percent  of  the  Nation’s  crime  laboratories  are  housed  in  law
enforcement agencies. Any effort to change that will have major budgetary and oper-
ational consequences. We need to be certain that such action is founded in fact and
that  the  change  will  produce  the  benefits  expected.  The  very  fact  that  more  than
90  percent  of  the  Nation’s  crime  laboratories  are  administered  from  within  law  en-
forcement  agencies  means  that  sophisticated  models  and  analysis  will  be  needed  to
prove the case.

Accreditation  has  already  been  addressed  in  the  forensic  community.  There  are
established programs that provide accreditation to international standards and that
have been accepted by the great majority of forensic science service laboratories, and
indeed, as is recognized in the report, some states require their forensic science lab-
oratories  to  be  accredited.  There  are  also  existing  certification  programs  in  the  fo-
rensic  community,  but  there  are  no  mandatory  requirements  and  the  response  of
public  and  private  laboratories  has  been  sketchy.  The  courts  also  have  a  vital  say,
with their role as gatekeepers of admissibility. The whole question of federal, State
and local recognition, creation and funding of registration bodies, and the definition
of  meaningful  certification  standards  is  another  case  where  a  considered  policy  re-
view  is  required  to  prevent  waste  of  resources  and  miss-steps  in  implementation.
The  report  identified  shortcomings  in  research,  education,  and  standards  of  prac-
tice in the Nation’s crime labs. In-depth research and analysis of options leading to
strategic  policy  and  implementation  plans  is  needed.  The  infrastructure  to  address
the absence of a national research agenda in forensic science does not exist; the gap
between  service  standards  and  high  quality  and  life-long  education  cannot  be
bridged with a band-aid; and realization of the committee’s recommendation to cre-
ate a National Institute of Forensic Science (NIFS) as an independent oversight and
coordinating body is a long-term issue.

These interim issues must be addressed, notably papers regarding forensic science
policy  are  marked  by  their  absence.  There  is  no  established  forensic  equivalent  to
think  tanks  like  the  Aspen  Institute,  for  example.  My  objective  in  discussing  these
interim objectives with you is to emphasize their importance and the need for care-
fully thought-out policy and strategic planning.

Long-term  action:  Create  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Science  (NIFS):
Many  of  the  recommendations  of  the  NAS  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs
of  the  Forensic  Sciences  Community  center  on  NIFS  as  an  oversight  and  coordi-
nating  body,  and  defer  action  to  NIFS.  However,  it  took  more  than  20  years  from
articulation  of  the  concept  before  there  was  an  operational  NIFS  in  Australia.  This
committee  knows  only  too  well  the  lengthy  consultative  processes  that  will  have  to
be  undertaken  if  the  Government  chooses  to  pursue  creating  a  NIFS  in  the  United
States. The process will not be instant and will, as with the interim issues discussed
above,  benefit  from  careful  analysis  of  strategic  policy  and  implementation  factors,
leading to a policy and implementation plan.

The focus of the make-over

I would like to turn now to more general considerations based on my personal ex-
perience  as  a  law  professor,  federal  prosecutor  and  Past  President  of  the  American
Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences  (AAFS).  There  is  a  tendency  for  crime  laboratory  ad-
ministration  to  be  conservative,  and  its  ability  to  foster  communication,  collabora-
tion and innovation probably suffers—as alluded to in the report—from the absence
of  a  meaningful  university  presence  in  forensic  science.  The  lack  of  academic  free-
dom  in  research  and  development  results  in  stifling  of  forensic  science.  As  long  as
the overwhelming body of forensic science does not challenge itself or respond to the
voices  of  all  its  stakeholders,  especially  the  legal  community  which  is  its  primary
stakeholder, we will not move forward.

I have great hope for the future of forensic science. In fact, my theme while I was
President  of  the  AAFS  was  ‘‘Forensic  Science:  Envisioning  and  Creating  the  Fu-
ture.’’  AAFS  has  recognized  the  importance  of  education  and  credentialing  by  cre-
ating a Forensic Science Programs Education Committee and the Forensic Speciali-
ties  Accreditation  Board  to  review  the  quality  of  forensic  education  programs  and
assess boards or organizations that certify individual forensic scientists or other spe-
cialists.  The  Forensic  Sciences  Foundation  during  my  presidency  of  AAFS  raised
more  than  $300,000  to  support  research.  AAFS  has  welcomed  the  NAS  report  and
under President Tom Bohan will continue to champion changes to the forensic land-
scape.

These  initiatives  are  a  start,  but  how  can  we  make  the  significant  changes  that
are needed? We can draw an analogy with the race to the Moon. The space age had

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

its catastrophes just like forensic science, but its successes came because there was
a  stretching  but  achievable  goal  and  the  scientists  and  engineers  at  NASA  could
apply  themselves  to  delivering  successful  outcomes.  Give  forensic  science  the  same
target and we will see even more progress than has been achieved so far. Challenge
to the status quo is as important as a unified commitment to a clear set of objectives
and a strategic plan.

Identifying  innovative  approaches  is  therefore  a  key  strategic  issue:  forensic
science will not be made better by providing increased funds to do more of the same
things  that  have  led  it  to  where  it  is.  ‘‘Innovation’’  is  a  cultural  issue  as  much  as
one  of  infrastructure  and  the  case  can  be  illustrated  by  comparison  to  the  medical
model of education, research and service delivery. Medical schools in top tier univer-
sities  act  as  centers  of  excellence  that  truly  advance  medical  science,  including  the
critical  role  of  transition  from  student  to  resident  to  faculty,  with  an  on-going  com-
mitment  to  professional  development  and  research.  The  ‘‘second  opinion’’  is  a  nat-
ural and accepted part of medical practice. Centers of excellence attract independent
and  critical  minds,  ever  seeking  to  find  new  and  better  diagnostic  and  therapeutic
tools. By contrast, forensic science sometimes responds defensively to criticisms and
regards  requests  for  a  ‘‘second  opinion’’  as  a  slight  and  not  as  a  tool  to  encourage
interaction with stakeholders.

Rep.  Bart  Gordon,  the  Chairman  of  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology,  has  reminded  us  that  ‘‘Scientific  progress  occurs  when  we  foster  the  open
exchange  of  ideas  and  information.’’  That  is  excellent  advice  and  could  form  the
basis  of  a  goal  of  ‘‘Collaboration  between  all  stakeholders  to  build,  by  2014,  a  solid
foundation  from  which  reliable  scientific  and  technologic  services  can  be  provided
to  the  whole  of  the  justice  system.’’  President  Obama  has  pledged  to  place  science
at  top  of  the  national  agenda,  a  commitment  that  we  in  forensic  science  embrace.

Summary:

In closing, I thank the Committee for the opportunity to address you and for your
serious  consideration  of  the  report  of  the  NAS  Committee  on  Identifying  the  Needs
of  the  Forensic  Sciences  Community.  As  we  move  forward  we  have  to  be  conscious
of the need for action, tempered by awareness of the current economic situation and
by  the  importance  of  responding  to  the  opportunity  given  to  us  by  the  NAS  report
in  a  way  that  will  result  in  lasting  and  effective  solutions.  To  that  end,  I  have  rec-
ommended a three-stage approach:

• Immediate  action  that  uses  existing  federal  resources  to  address  scientific

standards

• Interim action to evaluate strategic policy directions and strategies, and ex-

plore innovative solutions to areas such as education and research, and

• Long-term action to create a National Institute of Forensic Science (NIFS).

BIOGRAPHY FOR CAROL E. HENDERSON

• Professional affiliations:

Science and Technology Law Section

• Past President, American Academy of Forensic Sciences
• Co-Chair  Future  of  Evidence  Committee,  American  Bar  Association
• Vice-Chair  Scientific  Evidence  Committee,  American  Bar  Association
• Member,  International  Association  of  Chiefs  of  Police  Forensic  Com-

Science and Technology Law Section

mittee.

• Founding  director  of  the  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science,  Technology  and
the  Law  (NCSTL).  Professor  Henderson  planned  and  managed  its  develop-
ment, which includes the only comprehensive, searchable database of science,
technology and law in the world. (www.ncstl.org). NCSTL is the most effective
source  of  information  on  science  and  the  law,  with  hits  from  128  countries.
NCSTL  also  produces  symposia,  conducts  community  acceptance  panels  on
topics  such  as  less  lethal  technologies  and  produces  bibliographies  on  science
and technology issues.
• Recognized  as  an  international  authority  on  science  and  law,  Professor  Hen-
derson  has  presented  more  than  250  lectures  and  workshops  to  thousands  of
forensic scientists, attorneys, judges, law enforcement and military personnel
worldwide  on  the  topics  of  scientific  evidence,  courtroom  testimony,  and  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

fessional  responsibility.  She  has  lectured  in  Argentina,  Australia,  Canada,
Finland, Germany, Hong Kong, Italy, Japan, Scotland, Spain and Taiwan.

• Professor  Henderson  has  more  than  fifty  publications  on  scientific  evidence,
law  and  ethics.  She  is  an  editor  of  the  Encyclopedia  of  Forensic  and  Legal
Medicine (2005), which received the Minty Prize from the British Medical As-
sociation.  Her  latest  book,  the  5th  edition  of  Scientific  Evidence  in  Civil  and
Criminal  Cases  was  published  in  2008.  She  serves  on  the  editorial  boards  of
the  Journal  of  Forensic  Sciences,  the  Journal  of  Clinical  Forensic  Medicine,
and the Forensic Science, Medicine and Pathology Journal. She also serves on
numerous working groups for the National Institute of Justice.

• Professor  Henderson  has  appeared  in  both  the  popular  and  professional
media, including National Public Radio, Fox National News, CBS ‘‘48 Hours,’’
The John Walsh Show, Montel, TruTV, Court TV, the American Bar Associa-
tion Journal and Lawyers Weekly USA.

• Professor Henderson received her J.D. degree from The National Law Center,
George  Washington  University  in  1980.  Prior  to  receiving  her  J.D.,  she
worked  for  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Prisons  and  the  Department  of  Justice
Criminal  Division.  She  began  her  legal  career  as  an  Assistant  United  States
Attorney in Washington, D.C.

Chair WU. Thank you, Ms. Henderson.
Mr. Hicks, please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  JOHN  W.  HICKS,  DIRECTOR,  OFFICE  OF
FORENSIC SERVICES, NEW YORK STATE DIVISION OF CRIMI-
NAL  JUSTICE  SERVICES  (RET.);  FORMER  DIRECTOR,  FBI
LABORATORY
Mr.  HICKS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee. Thank you for the opportunity to be here to provide my
perspectives on this whole study today.

As  Mr.  Marone  did,  I  tried  to  group  the  13  recommendations  of
the  National  Academy  of  Sciences’  study  into  four  categories.  My
categories are very similar to his, the first category being methods
development and standardization. I think this is probably the most
critical  area  where  the  needs  are  severe  right  now.  The  other  cat-
egory, laboratory accreditation and quality assurance, the third cat-
egory,  research  and  training,  and  the  fourth,  resource  require-
ments,  and  those  latter  three  categories  Congress  has  already  un-
dertaken  a  number  of  initiatives  that  have  helped  the  laboratories
considerably  under  the  DNA  backlog  programs  and  the  Paul
Coverdale  Forensic  Science  Improvement  Program.  In  my  experi-
ence  working  with  New  York  State  over  the  last  eight  years,  we
had  22  laboratories  operating  within  that  state,  and  I  can  tell  you
that each of these laboratories benefits substantially from that, and
relies on those funds to continue to improve their programs and op-
erations.  They  are  critical  programs  and  I  would  hope  that  they
would be continued.

Of  course,  the  confidence  in  DNA  technology  was  brought  about
in large part because the underlying developmental work that was
done.  We  were  fortunate  at  the  time  that  work  took  place  that  it
was a brand-new technology. It was quickly recognized, the signifi-
cance and importance of the technology, for forensic science and so
we had many agencies come together. The FBI, the National Insti-
tute  of  Justice  and  NIST  [National  Institute  of  Standards  and
Technology],  among  those  agencies  working  with  commissions  and
others around the country spent an enormous number of hours try-
ing  to  work  and  address  the  various  implementation  issues.  It

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

wasn’t  efficient  but  it  did  seem  to  get  us  to  the  right  place  in  the
end.

Of  course,  the  National  Academy  committee  expressed  concerns,
as  Mr.  Marone  pointed  out,  with  a  lot  of  pattern  recognition  types
of  things:  firearms  identification,  fingerprint  matching,  and  so
forth.  I  think  it  is  significant  to  note  that  NIST  has  played  an  im-
portant role in those functions. They did a big study not only with
respect  to  DNA  technology,  but  did  a  huge  study  with  respect  to
the  Automated  Fingerprint  Identification  System,  which  helped  to
identify  the  standards  to  help  the  system  work  more  efficiently.
And  of  course,  that  is  a  system  relied  upon  every  minute  of  every
day  by  every  police  department  in  the  country  to  carry  out  its
work.  They  also  performed  a  very  helpful  study  with  respect  to  a
firearms database system to capture fired ammunition components
and  the  image  data  from  the  markings  on  those  bullets  and  data,
and  that  has  resulted  in  what  is  now  called  the  NIBIN,  National
Integrated  Ballistics  Identification  Network,  and  it  is  used  widely
by  firearms  examiners  around  the  country.  It  is  a  good  training
tool  to  help  begin  to  maybe  generate  leads  in  ongoing  investiga-
tions.  So  NIST  has  played  an  important  role  in  those  two.  Of
course,  with  respect  to  toxicology  and  chemistry  and  general  ana-
lytical  services,  NIST  routinely  provides  standards  that  are  used
for  traceability  and  quality  control  purposes  when  in  those  oper-
ations.

From  my  perspective,  I  think  an  expanded  role  for  NIST  rep-
resents  the  most  effective  and  efficient  way  to  bring  about  needed
improvements in the forensics community. It would bring focus and
it would draw on their core competencies, which of course relate to
standards  development  and  validation  of  work.  I  suspect  there  is
a lot of work out there that if brought together—existing work out
there  brought  together  and  sort  of  examined  closely  under  great
scrutiny,  some  NIST  studies  put  together  to  round  out  the  avail-
able  data,  I  suspect  that  many  of  the  troublesome  questions  that
the  Academy  report  found  might  be  addressed  fairly  quickly
through an organization like NIST.

It  would  be  helpful,  of  course,  for  NIST  to—I  think  the  DNA
model, while not necessarily all that efficient, did draw on collabo-
ration  between  federal  agencies  that  have  some  competencies  in
this area and had connections with the community. I think it would
be  very  important  of  course  for  NIST  to  expand  its  relationship
with  the  forensic  community.  One  of  the  things  that  has  evolved
over the last few years has been what are called scientific working
groups.  And  these  are  typically  experts  in  different  disciplines
brought  together  to  share  their  concerns  and  questions  and  issues
that  come  up  and  it  has  been  a  very  productive  way  to  help  pro-
mote  standards.  In  fact,  many  of  those  groups  have  defined  their
own—started  putting  together  information  that  helps  define  what
the  operating  standards  and  procedures  should  be  for  their  dis-
ciplines.  What  would  be  helpful  is  to  expose  these  data  to  some
good, heavy, rigorous scientific scrutiny as well.

So  I  think  I  will  conclude  with  that.  As  I  said,  my  perspective
is  that  NIST  provides  an  opportunity  here  to  really  help  in  the
area which I think is the greatest need, and that is focusing on the
standards development and the standardization aspects.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hicks follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN W. HICKS

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity
to  appear  before  you  today  and  to  offer  my  perspective  on  the  findings  and  rec-
ommendations  found  in  the  recently  released  report  of  the  National  Academy  of
Sciences  (NAS),  Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  For-
ward.  The  Academy  was  given  a  broad  charge  to  assess  the  state  of  forensic  prac-
tices across the country and to make recommendations for improvement. In addition
to traditional forensic laboratory services, the scope of its review included functions
of medical examiners and coroners in determining cause and manner of death.

The recommendations found in the NAS report fall into four broad categories:
(1)  methods  development  and  standardization;  (2)  laboratory  accreditation  and
quality  assurance;  (3)  research  and  training;  and  (4)  resource  needs.  As  described
briefly below, a number of congressional initiatives over the past few years have di-
rected  much  needed  attention  to  resource  needs  and  to  forensic  laboratory  quality
improvement  issues,  including  laboratory  accreditation  and  staff  training.  It  is  rec-
ommended that support for these initiatives be continued. It is clear, however, that
additional steps are needed to address critical concerns related to methods develop-
ment and validation, especially for forensic disciplines other than DNA analysis.

With regard to the forensic use of DNA technology, Congress has authorized a se-
ries  of  programs  that  provide  resources  needed  to  meet  the  unprecedented  demand
for  testing  services.  These  programs  are  administered  by  the  National  Institute  of
Justice  and  are  intended  to  help  eliminate  testing  backlogs  and  reduce  case  turn-
around times, to provide defendants with access to post-conviction DNA testing, and
to  help  assure  that  the  technology  is  used  effectively  to  identify  missing  persons.
With  regard  to  ‘‘non-DNA’’  forensic  laboratory  services  and  medical  examiners,
legislation  was  enacted  in  2000  which  created  the  Paul  Coverdell  Forensic  Science
Improvement Program which awards grants to states and units of local government
to help improve the quality and timeliness of forensic science and medical examiner
services.  Among  other  things,  the  Coverdell  program  calls  for  laboratory  accredita-
tion  by  recognized  accrediting  bodies  and  provides  for  staffing  and  training  needs.
To  assure  transparency  in  laboratory  operations,  especially  when  problems  may  be
indicated,  Coverdell  also  requires  that  there  be  an  independent  entity  with  author-
ity  to  investigate  allegations  of  malfeasance  or  misconduct  by  laboratory  personnel.
While  working  in  New  York  State,  it  has  been  my  experience  that  these  programs
have  been  effective  in  bringing  needed  improvements  to  the  22  State  and  local  fo-
rensic  laboratories  across  the  State.  It  is  strongly  recommended  that  support  for
these programs be continued and expanded.

In  the  Senate  report  that  led  to  the  NAS  study,  and  in  the  NAS  report  itself,  fo-
rensic  DNA  technology  was  set  apart  from  other  forensic  disciplines  in  terms  of
what is known of the robustness of the underlying research and the methods valida-
tion work that was conducted to support its applications in the criminal justice sys-
tem. The confidence in forensic DNA technology is the result of the considerable ef-
forts of scores of scientists in the public and private sectors, working with academic
researchers  and  forensic  science  practitioners,  to  assess,  validate  and  optimize  the
various  DNA  testing  methods  in  use  today.  A  national  Technical  Working  Group
was  formed  at  the  outset  to  facilitate  communication  among  forensic  practitioners
and  help  advance  the  technology  in  a  coordinated  way.  The  Technical  Working
Group  on  DNA  Analysis  Methods  (TWGDAM)  was  specifically  cited  in  the  DNA
Identification  Act  of  1994  which  authorized  CODIS,  the  national  DNA  Database.
This effort was driven by Congressional leaders and agency administrators who rec-
ognized  the  importance  and  potential  of  this  emerging  technology  as  an  identifica-
tion  tool  to  solve  crimes  and  assure  justice  in  the  courts.  High  level  support  and
direction  was  essential  to  maintain  a  focus  that  would  assure  the  standardized
methods  necessary  for  data  compatibility  to  enable  the  mutual  sharing  of  informa-
tion. Key federal agencies that contributed to the development and validation of fo-
rensic  DNA  technology  include  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation  (FBI),  the  Na-
tional  Institute  of  Justice  (NIJ)  and  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Tech-
nology (NIST).

The  NAS  Committee  expressed  concern  over  the  apparent  lack  of  systematic  re-
search  to  validate  the  basic  premises  and  techniques  for  forensic  disciplines  that
have  been  in  practice  since  before  the  emergence  of  DNA  technology.  Disciplines
which  drew  particular  attention  in  their  report  are  those  that  rely,  in  large  part,
on  pattern  recognition  techniques  such  as  those  used  in  the  examination  of  finger-
prints;  firearms  and  fired  ammunition  components;  tool  marks;  and  handwriting,
among  others.  For  these  and  other  ‘‘non-DNA’’  forensic  techniques  that  are  widely

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

used  today,  it  would  be  helpful  to  identify  and  gather  existing  empirical  studies,  to
conduct other studies as deemed necessary to update or supplement these data, and
to  put  the  information  in  a  form  that  is  readily  disseminated  within  the  relevant
forensic  and  scientific  communities.  Based  on  these  studies,  appropriate  standards
should be developed or updated to assure the use of uniform and scientifically vali-
dated examination techniques by forensic practitioners. These appear to be areas of
study  for  which  the  core  competencies  found  in  NIST  are  particularly  well  suited.
While  perhaps  best  known  for  its  work  in  industry,  NIST  has  been  actively  in-
volved with elements in the forensic community over the past decade and has made
important  contributions  working  collaboratively  with  other  federal  agencies,  indus-
try  and  academia.  For  example,  the  agency  undertook  a  number  of  inter-laboratory
and  other  studies  pertaining  to  individual  markers  used  in  DNA  identification
which have helped guide the successful development and forensic application of this
revolutionary  technology.  The  results  of  these  efforts  are  in  daily  use  in  public  and
private forensic DNA laboratories and NIST scientists have presented their work in
academic courses in order to prepare the next generation of forensic scientists. They
have  also  provided  in-service  training  sessions  and  in  addition,  seminars  at  profes-
sional meetings across the country.

NIST  has  also  performed  studies  designed  to  validate  and  improve  the  perform-
ance  of  large  data  systems  used  in  criminal  justice  applications  such  as  the  Auto-
mated  Fingerprint  Identification  System  (AFIS),  a  vital  system  in  continuous  use
by law enforcement and other agencies to resolve personal identification issues, and
the  National  Integrated  Ballistics  Identification  Network  (NIBIN)  which  correlates
imaged data from bullets and cartridge casings recovered during the course of crimi-
nal  investigations.  NIST  provides  standard  reference  materials  for  use  by  labora-
tories  in  private  industry  as  well  as  public  laboratories  (including  forensic  labora-
tories). As new technologies continue to emerge with potential applications in foren-
sic  laboratories,  NIST  is  uniquely  positioned  to  facilitate  communications  between
the  forensic  community  and  private  industry  to  assure  the  timely  and  appropriate
development  and  production  of  laboratory  equipment,  reagents  and  other  supplies
needed for implementing new techniques.

An  expanded  role  for  NIST  represents  the  most  effective  and  efficient  way  to
bring  about  needed  improvements  in  the  forensic  science  community  and  to  assure
appropriate  focus  in  the  development  of  new  technology  opportunities  that  emerge
in the future. The activities described above, and others that can be cited by officials
from  NIST,  clearly  demonstrate  the  agency’s  unique  competencies  which  can  be
brought to bear more widely in the forensic community not only to validate current
methods  and  practices,  but  also  to  define  a  structure  which  can  guide  a  long-term
process  of  continuous  improvement.  The  DNA  experience  provides  a  useful  model
and a framework upon which to build. This framework includes working with other
federal agencies such as the FBI and NIJ, and engaging established Scientific Work-
ing  Groups  for  specific  forensic  disciplines.  If  charged  with  this  role  by  Congress,
it would be expected that NIST would establish a coordinating body to provide over-
sight and direction to the effort. This body might include officials from the criminal
justice  and  crime  laboratory  communities,  key  professional  associations,  and  estab-
lished  accrediting  organizations  such  as  the  American  Society  of  Crime  Laboratory
Directors—Laboratory  Accreditation  Board  (ASCLD/LAB)  and  the  American  Board
of Forensic Toxicology (ABFT).

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN W. HICKS

From May 2000 to January 2008, Mr. Hicks was the Director of the Office of Fo-
rensic  Services,  New  York  State  (NYS)  Division  of  Criminal  Justice  Services.  Re-
sponsibilities  of  the  Office  include  oversight  of  the  State  DNA  database  and  pro-
viding  staff  support  to  the  NYS  Commission  on  Forensic  Science.  The  Commission
sets  mandatory  accreditation  standards  for  22  State  and  local  forensic  laboratories
operating in New York (eight of which perform forensic DNA analysis) and monitors
laboratory  compliance.  The  Office  of  Forensic  Services  also  facilitates  specialized
technical training for laboratory and law enforcement personnel, and participates in
the administration of federal and State grants to the laboratories.

Mr.  Hicks  was  a  Special  Agent  with  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation  (FBI)
from 1969 to 1994 and served for much of his career in various technical and admin-
istrative  positions  in  the  Laboratory  Division.  He  held  the  position  of  Assistant  Di-
rector  in  charge  of  the  FBI  Laboratory  from  1989  to  1994.  In  1994,  Mr.  Hicks  be-
came  Deputy  Director  of  the  Alabama  Department  of  Forensic  Sciences  and  was
charged,  among  other  responsibilities,  with  establishing  the  DNA  Databank  pro-
gram for the state.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Mr.  Hicks  has  been  actively  involved  in  the  development  of  national  standards
and supporting State and federal legislation for the use of DNA technology in crimi-
nal  justice  applications.  He  was  appointed  by  Governors  Pataki  and  Spitzer  to  the
NYS Commission on Forensic Science, is a member of the American Academy of Fo-
rensic  Sciences  and  the  American  Society  of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors.  He  is  a
former board member of the National DNA Advisory Board. Mr. Hicks holds a Bach-
elor’s  Degree  in  Chemistry  from  Arkansas  State  University  and  a  Master’s  Degree
in  Public  Administration  from  the  University  of  Southern  California.  He  completed
the  Program  for  Senior  Managers  in  Government  at  the  John  F.  Kennedy  School
of  Government,  Harvard  University,  and  the  FBI  Executive  Development  Institute.

Chair WU. Thank you very much, Mr. Hicks.
Dr. Downs, please proceed.

STATEMENT OF DR. JAMES C. UPSHAW DOWNS, FORENSIC PA-
THOLOGIST/CONSULTANT,  COASTAL  REGIONAL  MEDICAL
EXAMINER, GEORGIA BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION
Dr.  DOWNS.  Chair  Wu,  distinguished  Committee  Members,  it  is
indeed  an  honor  and  a  privilege  to  be  before  you  today.  I  speak
today  as  a  GBI  [Georgia  Bureau  of  Investigation]  employee,  a
board-certified forensic pathologist, and former Director of the Ala-
bama Department of Forensic Sciences, where I saw firsthand a lab
system  go  from  square  one  to  full  accreditation  while  facing  a
crushing  backlog.  Most  importantly,  I  speak  as  a  son  who  lost  a
mother suddenly and had to wait for answers, and when those an-
swers came it left many in my family with more questions than sol-
ace.

I  think  the  take-home  lesson  from  the  NRC  [National  Research
Council]  report  is  nothing  we  didn’t  already  know.  For  years  we
had  seen  the  initially  maligned  discipline  of  forensic  DNA  identi-
fication  benefit  from  a  focused  look  at  the  potential  and  the  short-
comings  of  the  science.  Although  some  had  been  skeptical,  espe-
cially at first, the end result was wide acceptance of the reliability
and the validity of DNA science. We within the rest of the forensic
system  eagerly  sought  an  independent  assessment  of  where  we  all
stood.  The  NRC  report  is,  as  Paul  Harvey  would  say,  ‘‘the  rest  of
the  story’’:  overall,  we  are  doing  well  but  there  is  some  room  for
improvement.

Of  the  recommendations  in  the  report,  there  is  little  but  agree-
ment on almost everything. Most involved in the process feel stand-
ardization  of  reports  and  terminology,  research  into  underlying
principles  and  validity,  addressing  potential  bias  and  error,  estab-
lishment  of  testable  metrics,  proficiency  testing,  accreditation,  cer-
tification,  quality  assurance,  ethics,  enhanced  forensic  education,
and  database  inter-operability  are  all  good  things.  The  question
today is how NIST might fit into the forensics picture.

Certainly I don’t think anybody would doubt the technical merits
of  NIST  and  their  track  record  of  unparalleled  success  in  regards
to  analytical  laboratory  standards.  Their  greatest  strength  lies  in
accuracy  and  precision—the  metrics  of  testing.  The  NRC  specifi-
cally reaches out, as it should, to NIST to partner in relevant areas
where such measurement and testing are key considerations. Thus,
in  areas  like  standardization,  research,  underlying  principles,  va-
lidity, potential bias and error, et cetera, NIST can, and should, be
involved.  However,  the  day-to-day  application  of  forensic  testing
means  working  with  less-than-optimal  and  highly  variable  case-
specific evidence and trying to obtain the best possible test results,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

then  reporting  those  findings  to  the  appropriate  entities.  NIST  is
primarily a laboratory science body which does not fit well into the
NRC  call  for  significant  research  in  the  entirety  of  the  forensics
realm.  The  NIST  excellence  in  laboratory  standards  and  metrics
does  not  translate  well  into  the  larger  issues  of  accreditation  and
certification,  practitioner  professionalism,  or  administrative  areas.
Nor,  quite  honestly,  is  there  likely  to  be  buy-in  from  the  forensic
practitioners  if  they  [NIST]  did  become  more  involved.  We  already
have  accreditation  and  certification.  We  have  standard  operating
procedures  in  place.  I  don’t  think  we  need  to  reinvent  the  wheel.
Another concern that I have is, unfortunately, I think that NIST
lacks  an  established  history  with  regards  to  the  complexities  and
intricacies  of  interactions  of  law  enforcement,  legal,  and  govern-
mental  entities  so  vital  to  the  effectiveness  of  the  forensic  system
as  a  whole.  A  related  question  would  be:  exactly  under  what
branch of government is there a best fit for forensics? An important
point here is while we may be scientists, those who use our reports
are  oftentimes  not.  They  are  judges,  prosecutors,  defense  counsel,
police,  sheriffs,  and  civilians.  They  all  share  one  key  concern:  they
want  an  accurate,  reliable  answer  and  they  want  it  quickly.  These
customers  have  different,  sometimes  not  entirely  interrelated
needs.  Does  the  investigative  aspect  of  law  enforcement  needs  or
the  adversarial  tenor  of  the  court  determine  how  a  case  is  to  be
analyzed? Unfortunately, questions are far easier than answers.
this  report  called 

for
professionalization  of  forensics,  specifically  death  investigation,  be-
fore,  through  the  National  Academies.  The  last  time  in  2003,  but
also  a  little  further  back—in  1928  and  again  in  1932.  Perhaps  it
isn’t  surprising  to  see  that  change  is  slow  to  come.  After  all,  what
is  80  years  that  we  have  been  waiting  compared  to  an  office,  spe-
cifically  the  coroner,  that  dates  to  the  900s  and  was  reformed  in
1194. Those who live in the past are destined to stay there. I think
the NRC was wise in recognizing that none of their goals, however
well intentioned, can come about overnight. There are serious chal-
lenges, both jurisdictional and legal, to overcome.

The  same  NRC 

that  conducted 

Independence  is  also  an  important  consideration.  Within  my
agency,  we  are  operationally  independent,  as  it  should  be,  and  as
the  text  of  the  NRC  report  clearly  defines.  I  have  testified  many
times  before  from  the  stand  that  I  am  neither  pro-prosecution  nor
pro-defense, I am pro-truth. I don’t have a dog in the fight. The ad-
versaries in the courtroom are the attorneys. I am their guest.

In  closing,  I  think  the  path  forward  for  all  forensic  scientists  as
outlined in the National Academy of Sciences’ report is best served
by  that  old  adage,  ‘‘good  enough  seldom  is.’’  The  American  people
deserve  better,  and  I  think  perhaps  Sir  William  Gladstone  best
summed  it  up:  ‘‘Show  me  the  manner  in  which  a  nation  cares  for
its  dead  and  I  will  measure  with  mathematical  exactness  the  ten-
der mercies of its people, their respect for the laws of the land and
their loyalty to high ideas.’’

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair  and  Committee  Members.  I  would  be

happy to answer any questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Downs follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES C, UPSHAW DOWNS

Chairman  Wu  and  distinguished  Committee  Members,  it  is  indeed  an  honor  and
a privilege to appear before you today. As the lone Medical Examiner and death in-
vestigation  professional  among  the  witnesses,  I  believe  I  offer  a  unique  perspective
on  several  of  the  issues  raised  in  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)’s  report.  I
speak  here  today  as  a  practitioner,  a  board-certified  Forensic  Pathologist,  and  a
member of several professional organizations (including The National Association of
Medical  Examiners  (NAME)1 and  The  American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences
(AAFS).2 I  do  not  speak  for  these  organizations  but  their  views  have  certainly
helped shape my opinions. I speak as someone who has seen the pinnacles of inves-
tigative success the present system has to offer and one who has seen shameful mis-
takes.  Most  importantly,  I  speak  as  a  concerned  citizen  who  genuinely  desires  the
improvements  the  forensic  sciences  and  all  those  who  use  those  services  deserve.  I
speak as a son who lost a mother suddenly and had to wait for answers—and when
those answers came, it left many in my family with more questions than solace. For
my  father,  he  experienced  the  same  fate  a  generation  earlier  when  his  mother  had
no examination conducted as a lay investigator deemed it ‘‘unnecessary.’’

I was asked to review the scientific and technical issues raised by the NRC Report
on  Forensic  Sciences  and  how  the  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology
might  fit  into  that  picture.  I  should  like  to  address  my  remarks  primarily  to  the
discipline  of  Forensic  Pathology  and  medicolegal  death  investigation  (see  rec-
ommendation  #11),  which  I  see  as  a  microcosm  of  the  issues  involving  the  forensic
Sciences  as  a  whole.  I  think  that  perhaps  Sir  William  Gladstone  best  summed  it
up:  ‘‘Show  me  the  manner  in  which  a  nation  cares  for  its  dead  and  I  will  measure
with  mathematical  exactness  the  tender  mercies  of  its  people,  their  respect  for  the
laws of the land, and their loyalty to high ideals.’’

The  focus  of  the  entire  ‘‘status  of  forensics’’  to  me  comes  down  to  uniformity  and
best practices (see NRC recommendation #2). A different quality of death investiga-
tion should not depend on where one has the misfortune of dying. Surviving family
members and the courts should not be forced to wait because a motor vehicle crash
victim  didn’t  quite  make  it  over  the  State  line  to  a  better  jurisdiction.  In  order  to
ensure  that  all  forensic  autopsies  are  created  equal,  NAME  developed  and  imple-
mented  Forensic  Autopsy  Performance  Standards  in  2006.3 Experienced  practi-
tioners  formulated  guidelines  that  were  carefully  considered  and  adopted  by  the
membership  at  large.  The  intent  was  to  create  a  procedure  whereby  the  technical
aspects of the performance of the forensic autopsy were consistent from jurisdiction
to jurisdiction in order to guarantee a quality product. Are there very real and very
serious  problems  when  best  practices  are  not  followed?  One  need  only  look  at  re-
cent4,5 events  regarding  autopsies  by  un-boarded,  non-Forensic  Pathologist  exam-
iners  to  see  the  consequences.  Truly  those  who  do  not  learn  from  the  mistakes  of
the past are destined to repeat them.

When Forensic Medicine is practiced as it should be—thoughtfully, completely, ac-
curately,  and  impartially—everyone  benefits.  The  scientific  foundation  of  medicine
is  unquestioned.  Medicine  fought  some  battles  similar  to  those  pointed  out  in  The
NRC report at the same point in the last century with end result being a revolution

1 The National Association of Medical Examiners (NAME) is the national professional organi-
zation of physician medical examiners, medical death investigators and death investigation sys-
tem administrators who perform the official duties of the medicolegal investigation of deaths of
public interest in the United States. NAME was founded in 1966 with the dual purposes of fos-
tering  the  professional  growth  of  physician  death  investigators  and  disseminating  the  profes-
sional  and  technical  information  vital  to  the  continuing  improvement  of  the  medical  investiga-
tion of violent, suspicious and unusual deaths. Growing from a small nucleus of concerned physi-
cians, NAME has expanded its scope to include physician medical examiners and coroners, med-
ical  death  investigators  and  medicolegal  system  administrators  from  throughout  the  United
States and other countries.

2 The American Academy of Forensic Sciences is a multi-disciplinary professional organization
that  provides  leadership  to  advance  science  and  its  application  to  the  legal  system.  The  objec-
tives of the Academy are to promote education, foster research, improve practice, and encourage
collaboration in the forensic sciences.

3 Forensic 

Autopsy 

Performance 

Standards, 

http://thename.org/index.php?option=

com¥docman&task=cat¥view&gid=45&Itemid=26

4 CSI:  Mississippi,  A  case  study 

www.reason.com/news/show/122458.html

in  expert  testimony  gone  horribly  wrong,  http://

5 Reason’s  Reporting  on  Steven  Hayne  and  Mississippi’s  Criminal  Forensics  System,  http://

www.reason.com/news/show/131242.html

6 The  Flexner  Report  and  the  Standardization  of  American  Medical  Education,  http://

jama.ama-assn.org/cgi/content/full/291/17/2139

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

in medical education and practice.6,7 The net result was enhanced confidence in how
the science was applied. The other forensic disciplines are on a similar road to ours
but  at  several  different  points  on  their  journeys.  I  think  that,  in  general,  the  sci-
entific  underpinnings  are  there  but  certainly  the  disciplines  would  benefit  from  a
more formal structured review. Look at it this way, a race car driver can be incred-
ibly proficient on the track. The net result of the NRC report is that the same racing
champion  now  has  to  go  back  and  get  a  driver’s  license  to  document  that  they  can
in fact do what they already do so well.

All the efforts to improve medicolegal death investigation are designed to enhance
service delivery to those who rely on the results of the forensic autopsy. In addition
to the obvious impact Forensic Pathology has on the justice system, Medical Exam-
iners have important and sometimes under-recognized duties in public health, med-
ical research, and homeland security/mass disaster preparedness. Recognition of po-
tentially infectious diseases from the performance of the autopsy may assist to mini-
mize  illness  and  death.  Injuries  found  at  autopsy  were  a  large  part  of  the  develop-
ment of automotive seatbelts and airbags. By studying sudden deaths, certain com-
monalities may be found and medical science advanced. Our understanding of many
deaths,  including  those  resulting  from  violence,  can  protect  the  living,  for  example
by  identifying  inherited  diseases  or  dangerous  drug  combinations.  In  the  arena  of
disaster  preparedness,  the  Medical  Examiner  is  responsible  for  the  medical  inves-
tigation in mass fatality incidents, including identification of victims and the deter-
mination of the cause and manner of death—the Medical Examiner makes the ulti-
mate  determination  if  a  death  was,  in  fact,  a  homicide.  Another  area  in  which  the
Medical  Examiner’s  contributions  may  not  be  fully  appreciated  is  one  of  the  most
significant—as  ‘‘family  physicians  to  the  bereaved’’  and  providing  closure  to  untold
numbers of surviving family members.

Quality is a goal, not a destination; as such one of the hallmarks of any good lab
is  CQI—continuous  quality  improvement.  NAME  concurs  with  the  NRC  (see  rec-
ommendation #2) that such quality is essential. As part of the NAME accreditation,
an office has to have a quality assurance program. Benchmarks of that quality were
demanded by the NRC report—certification and accreditation.

As  physicians,  Medical  Examiners  are  well  familiar  with  the  necessities  of  per-
sonal qualification, to include licensure and medical specialty board certification. In
1933,  American  Board  of  Medical  Specialties  (ABMS)  began  medical  specialty  cer-
tification. Their motto says it all: ‘‘Higher standards. Better care.’’

by at least one ABMS Member Board.

• Nearly 85 percent of all licensed physicians in the United States are certified
• Certification  by  an  ABMS  Member  Board  is  widely  recognized  as  the  gold
standard in assessing physician qualification. Health care institutions, insur-
ers, physicians and patients use ABMS Member Board certification status as
an essential tool to judge that a physician has the knowledge, experience and
skills to provide quality health care within a given specialty.8

Pathologists  have  been  certified  in  the  sub-specialty  of  Forensic  Pathology  by  the
ABMS for the past 50 yrs. NAME will only recognize a physician as a Forensic Pa-
thologist if they are certified in Forensic Pathology by the ABMS. Of the full mem-
bers  of  NAME,  ∼85  percent  have  their  specialty  boards  and  ∼75  percent  have  their
sub-specialty boards.9

Just as we believe individuals should have certain basic credentials, so too should
lab  systems.  NAME  pioneered  the  accreditation  of  medicolegal  death  investigation
systems, commencing formally in 1975. It has accredited offices in cities all over the
United  States  (such  Atlanta,  Miami,  Los  Angeles,  and  Houston);  in  State  systems
(New  Mexico  and  Georgia),  and  other  nations  (Singapore).  We  do  have  a  way  to  go
yet,  at  present,  only  49  Medical  examiner  Offices/systems  are  accredited  with  an-
other 11 in progress.10 Regardless, the recommendation that ‘‘All medical examiner
offices should be accredited’’ 11 is a good one. In addition, targeting limited available
funds (especially given the present budget constraints) is a good carrot to encourage

7Flexner  Report  . . .  Birth  Of  Modern  Medical  Education,  http://www.medicinenet.com/

8 ABMS  FACT  SHEET,  http://www.abms.org/News¥and¥Events/Media¥Newsroom/pdf/

script/main/art.asp?articlekey=8795

ABMS¥Fact¥sheet.pdf

9 R. Hanzlick & V. Weedn/National Association of Medical Examiners
10 National Association of Medical Examiners
11 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

12 Ibid.
13 Ibid.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

compliance:  ‘‘All  federal  funding  should  be  restricted  to  accredited  offices  . . .  or
[those] that demonstrate significant and measurable progress in achieving accredita-
tion within prescribed deadlines.’’ 12

Forensic pathologists are strong proponents of education and research. In addition
to  attaining  basic  qualifications,  in  order  to  maintain  licensure  physicians  are  re-
quired  to  undergo  continuing  education,  attaining  a  specific  number  of  hours  of
training  annually  (another  general  NRC  recommendation).  NAME  holds  two  meet-
ings each year and the AAFS one in order to provide the latest forensic medical ad-
vances  to  attendees  from  all  medical  specialties.  The  American  Journal  of  Forensic
Medicine  and  Pathology,  the  official  publication  of  NAME  is  the  oldest  professional
publication  dedicated  exclusively  to  the  science  of  medicolegal  death  investigation.
The  AAFS’  Journal  of  Forensic  Sciences  is  a  multi-disciplinary  which  includes  pa-
thology/biology.  These  and  other  specialty  journals  present  the  latest  advances  in
the  field,  however,  sorely  needed  ongoing  research  has  been  difficult  to  fund.  I  am
personally  involved  in  studies  in  the  field  of  child  abuse  and  have  to  rely  on  the
generosity of one of my community’s non-profit hospitals to conduct tests that would
otherwise go undone. The NRC call ‘‘. . . to support research, education, and train-
ing  in  forensic  pathology  . . .’’ 13 must  be  heeded  if  we  are  to  keep  pace  with  the
ever  advancing  field  of  clinical  medicine  and  other  scientific  disciplines.  Only  by
making  Forensic  Pathology  a  continuously  intellectually  challenging  discipline  can
we  attract  the  best  and  brightest  to  the  field  in  order  to  make  that  promise  of  a
brighter  future  a  reality.  Guidance  is  needed,  as  indicated  in  the  recommendation
that a medicolegal death investigation Scientific Working Group (SWG) to ‘‘. . . de-
velop  and  promote  standards  for  best  practices,  administration,  staffing,  education,
training,  and  continuing  education  for  competent  death  scene  investigation  and
postmortem  examinations,’’ 14 to  include  new  technologies.  Directed  group  efforts
have  produced  vital  information  to  provide  high  quality  death  investigation  at
‘‘every  scene,  every  time.’’ 15 Similarly,  training  curricula  targeted  to  the  most  dif-
ficult of death scenes, those involving infants16 have sought uniformity to the inves-
tigation of these tragic cases.

One  of  the  more  controversial  among  the  NRC  findings  would  be  the  conversion
to  a  nation-wide  Medical  Examiner  system,  replacing  the  existing  political  office  of
coroner  present  in  many  jurisdictions.  Professionalization  death  investigation  has
been proposed by the same National Academies—most recently in 2003 through the
Institute  of  Medicine,17 but  also  a  little  further  back  by  the  in  192818 and  again  in
1932.19 Perhaps  it  isn’t  surprising  to  see  that  change  is  slow  to  come,  after  all
what’s  80  years  against  an  elected  office  dating  to  the  900’s  and  which  made  its
comeback  in  1194!20 Those  who  live  in  the  past  are  destined  to  remain  there.  In
that context, ‘‘the goal of replacing and eventually eliminating existing coroner sys-
tems’’ 21 can be seen as an attempt to improve a presently ‘‘adequately’’ functioning
system.  We  must  recognize  that  the  mission  of  the  medicolegal  investigation  of
death has changed over the years. What used to be considered primarily a function
of  the  justice  system  (be  it  criminal  or  civil)  is  now  much,  much  more:  ‘‘The  role
of  medical  examiners  and  coroners  has  evolved  . . .  to  a  broader  involvement  that
now significantly benefits the public safety, medical, and public health communities.
It is foreseeable that the public health role of medical examiners and coroners may
continue  to  grow  and  that,  perhaps  in  the  not  too  distant  future,  public  health  im-
pact will surpass criminal justice as the major focus of medicolegal death investiga-

12 Ibid.
13 Ibid.
14 Ibid.
15 Death  Investigation:  A  guide  for  the  Scene  Investigator,  http://www.ncjrs.org/pdffiles/

16 Sudden,  unexplained  Infant  death  Investigation  Curriculum  Guide,  http://www.cdc.gov/

167568.pdf

SIDS/PDF/508SUIDIGuidelinesSingles.pdf

17 National Research Council. Bulletin of the National Research Council, No. 64: The Coroner

and the Medical Examiner. Washington DC: National Research Council;1928.

18 Institute of Medicine. Medicolegal Death Investigation System: Workshop Summary. Wash-

ington DC: National Academy of Sciences; 2003.

19 National  Research  Council.  Bulletin  of  the  National  Research  Council,  No.  87:  Possibilities
and  Need  for  Development  of  Legal  Medicine  in  the  United  States.  Washington  DC:  National
Research Council; 1932.

20 CROWNER:  Origins  of  the  Office  of  Coroner,  Prof.  Bernard  Knight,  CBE,  http://

www.britannia.com/history/coroner1.html

21 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

tion in the United States.’’ 22 We can do better, but in order to do so, we must first
understand the issue.

Typically death investigation is handled at the State or usually local level. No two
systems  are  the  same,  even  though  many  are  similar.  Of  the  3,137  U.S.  counties,
roughly one-third (960) are true Medical Examiner counties without Coroners. These
fall  into  four  basic  models:  true  State  Medical  Examiner  (19  states—697  counties),
pure  County  Medical  Examiner  (two  states—98  counties),  pure  District  (Regional)
Medical Examiner (one state—67 counties), and sporadic (mixed) Medical Examiner
(14 states—98 counties).23 One problem is terminology—for example some states use
the  term  ‘‘medical  examiner’’  but  do  not  require  that  person  to  be  a  pathologist.  In
short,  in  order  to  fix  this  one  part  of  the  overall  ‘‘forensic  system,’’  significant  re-
structuring of operations and local, State, and federal laws would be required.

In  common  usage,  the  terms  Medical  Examiner  and  Coroner  are  used  inter-
changeably  by  many.  In  reality,  there  is  a  world  of  difference.  A  Medical  Examiner
in  the  purest  sense  is  a  physician,  who  after  completing  medical  school  continues
training  four  or  five  more  years  in  the  field  of  General  (also  known  as  ‘‘Hospital’’)
Pathology.  Following  that,  are  one  to  two  years  of  specialized  subject  matter  train-
ing  in  Forensic  pathology.  Following  that  are  an  intensive  three  day  written  and
practical board examination in General Pathology followed by a one-day exam in Fo-
rensic  Pathology.  Compare  that  with  the  basic  qualifications  of  the  coroner,  which
are  election  to  the  office,  often  without  any  medical  background  or  training  at  all.
Their  medical  education  is  either  on-the-job  or  yearly  seminars  on  selected  topics.
I  ask  you—should  the  unfortunate  instance  arise,  whom  would  you  prefer  perform
this  most  important  medicolegal  examination  on  your  loved  one  and  then  to  testify
about it in court? Who should be in charge of that death investigation system? With
all  due  respect  and  with  no  offense  intended,  I  do  not  believe  a  cab  driver  should
be directing brain surgery. NAME agrees with the NRC that ‘‘All medicolegal autop-
sies  should  be  performed  or  supervised  by  a  board  certified  forensic  pathologist.’’ 24
As  of  now,  there  are  approximately  245  titular  or  de  facto  chief  medical  examiners
in  the  U.S.  In  reality,  only ∼160  of  those  meet  NAME’s  definition  of  a  Forensic  Pa-
thologist.25 There are only ∼400 active, full-time practicing Forensic Pathologists in
the U.S.26 In 2008 at the 126 Medical schools in the U.S. and 8,589 Medical Train-
ing  Programs  (representing  141  specialties)  and  18,372  new  medical  students,  only
37 new physicians entered the field of Forensic Pathology.27

Personally,  I  have  worked  with  some  excellent  coroners  who  were  dedicated  and
diligent. I suggest we not throw the baby out with the bath water. It is obvious that
there  insufficient  Medical  Examiners  now  and  for  the  near-term  future  to  simply
flip  a  switch  off  on  the  Coroner  system.  Working  with  appropriate  stakeholders,  I
would  propose  we  roll  the  present  functions  of  the  traditional  County  Coroner  into
those  of  the  Medical  Examiner’s  office  and  utilize  these  already  functioning  profes-
sionals as lay investigators within that Medical Examiner system. This has the ad-
vantage  of  reduced  costs  and  more  rapid  implementation.  Obviously,  those  directly
involved would have to have buy-in.

In order to achieve the goal of timely delivery of the highest quality forensic serv-
ice  to  our  citizens,  we  must  have  sufficient  resources  to  make  sure  it  happens.  We
must  increase  the  numbers  of  trained  Forensic  Pathologists  (and  all  other  forensic
practitioners)  and  strive  for  uniformity  in  the  process  of  death  investigation.  Esti-
mates  indicate  that  twice  the  existing  number  of  Forensic  Pathologists  would  be
needed to fully staff a true Medical Examiner system across the entire country. The
NRC  indicated  that  ‘‘Congress  should  appropriate  resources  to  . . .  support  re-
search,  education,  and  training  in  forensic  pathology.’’ 28 If  we  want  more  people  in
the  field,  we  need  to  recruit  them  early  and  retain  them.  Toward  that  end,  the  re-
port made a bold proposal, that ‘‘. . . medical student loan forgiveness and/or fellow-
ship  support,  should  be  made  available  to  pathology  residents  who  choose  forensic
pathology  as  their  specialty.’’ 29 As  someone  over  twenty  one  years  out  of  medical
school  and  with  my  oldest  child  graduating  college  and  my  second  starting,  I  am

22 Medical examiners, coroners, & public health: a review & update, Arch Path Lab Med. 2006

Sep; 130(9):1274–82.

23 R. Hanzlick & V. Weedn/National Association of Medical Examiners
24 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

25 R. Hanzlick & V. Weedn/National Association of Medical Examiners
26 Ibid.
27 R.  Hanzlick,  AAFS  Pathology/Biology  Annual  Luncheon,  from  JAMA,  September  10,  2008.
28 Ibid.
29 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

proud  to  report  that  they  have  no  outstanding  student  loans—but  that  their  father
could say the same!

In  addition  to  the  staffing  issues,  conversion  to  a  nationwide  Medical  Examiner
system will be expensive, as will be implementation of all the ‘‘forensics system’’ im-
provements called for by the NRC. ‘‘Funds are needed to build regional medical ex-
aminer offices, secure necessary equipment, improve administration, and ensure the
education,  training,  and  staffing  of  medical  examiner  offices.  Funding  could  also  be
used  to  help  current  medical  examiner  systems  modernize  their  facilities  to  meet
current Centers for Disease Control and Prevention-recommended autopsy safety re-
quirements.’’ 30 As the panel’s charge did not include budgetary issues, the inconven-
ient ‘‘how to pay for it’’ was left out of the mix.

Independence  is  also  an  important  consideration.  As  my  regular  job  falls  under
the  umbrella  of  a  law  enforcement  agency  (the  Georgia  Bureau  of  Investigation),
some might see that I have a pro-police bias. In reality, as I have testified from the
stand  many  times  before,  I  am  neither  pro-prosecution  nor  pro-defense;  I  am  pro-
truth.  Within  my  agency,  we  are  operationally  independent,  as  it  should  be.  I  have
worked  in  four  different  models  of  death  investigation  administration:  private  con-
tractor,  university  employee,  independent  State  agency,  and  law  enforcement  agen-
cy.  I  have  found  the  best  support  I  have  ever  had  in  the  latter  system.  That  those
within  law  enforcement  (as  in  the  courts)  would  be  interested  in  the  results  of  my
examinations  is  hardly  surprising.  Truth  be  told,  I  have  never  dealt  with  any  law
enforcement officer who wanted me to force a call or modify an opinion to suit some
clandestine  purpose.  Quite  the  contrary,  my  experience  has  been  that  those  police
agencies who rely on my reports to determine if a case should be further scrutinized
are  understaffed  and  underfunded  and  are  looking  for  guidance  into  how  to  best
manage their own scarce investigative resources.

As for the science, an important distinction should be made between conventional
science  and  forensic  science.  Ultimately,  in  the  latter  case  the  data  must  be  avail-
able  for  courtroom  presentation.  As  such,  what  might  be  considered  intra-discipli-
nary differences of opinion in the interpretation of test results take on a whole new
light.  The  objective  forensic  observer  must  not  only  perform  the  testing  neutrally
but must also report it likewise. Australia has already established (and revised five
times) Guidelines for Expert Witnesses in Proceedings in the Federal Court of Aus-
tralia.31 The  intent  is  to  make  the  expert  an  impartial  finder  of  scientific  fact  and
to  impartially  report  those  findings  and  their  resultant  opinions  to  the  court.  I  be-
lieve  that  impartiality  and  fairness  are  essential,  test  results  should  be  just  that—
good or bad for whichever side, they should be solidly based and then should be ad-
mitted  as  a  matter  of  course  in  accordance  with  procedures.  I  remember  the  day
when  DNA  evidence  was  challenged  almost  incessantly  and  now  a  case  is  almost
deemed  questionable  if  there  isn’t  DNA  evidence.  The  good  folks  at  the  Innocence
Project have show first-hand how valuable good forensic evidence can be—for either
side in our adversarial legal system.

The  NRC  was  wise  in  recognizing  that  none  of  their  goals,  however  well-inten-
tioned,  can  come  about  overnight.  We  have  serious  jurisdictional  and  legal  chal-
lenges  to  overcome.  ‘‘This  requirement  should  take  effect  within  a  timeframe  to  be
established  . . .,  following  consultation  with  governing  State  institutions.’’ 32 It
might  be  tempting  to  find  a  quick  fix  to  the  issue  of  oversight  for  the  forensic
sciences  by  placing  it  under  existing  entity.  I  do  not  believe  that  is  in  the  spirit  of
what the NAS report called for:

‘‘The forensic science system, encompassing both research and practice, has seri-
ous problems that can only be addressed by a national commitment to overhaul
the current structure that supports the forensic science community in this coun-
try. This can only be done with effective leadership at the highest levels of both
Federal and State governments, pursuant to national standards, and with a sig-
nificant  infusion  of  federal  funds  . . ..  What  is  needed  to  support  and  oversee
the  forensic  science  community  is  a  new,  strong,  and  independent  entity  that
could take on the tasks that would be assigned to it in a manner that is as ob-
jective  and  free  of  bias  as  possible-one  with  no  ties  to  the  past  and  with  the
authority and resources to implement a fresh agenda.’’ 33

I  do  not  think  it  in  our  best  interests  to  try  to  ‘‘add  on’’  to  an  existing  structure,
with  its  own  extant  biases  and  entrenched  operational  protocols.  Such  an  institu-

30 Ibid.
31 http://www.fedcourt.gov.au/how/prac¥direction.html
32 Ibid.
33 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

tionalized mindset would not seem to provide us the optimal chance to create a bet-
ter  way.  The  NRC  report  called  for  a  new,  independent  entity  for  a  reason—past
experience. We have an opportunity to learn from past mistakes and to emulate our
successes  as  we  move  forward.  If  we  are  to  take  home  the  messages  of  this  NAS
report,  we  should  not  cherry  pick  what  we  want  to  hear  and  disregard  the  parts
we  think  we  might  do  better  without.  This  is  one  of  those  rare  times  in  life  where
we  have  the  opportunity  to  get  it  right  from  the  start  as  we  follow  a  new,  better
path armed with the experiences that will ensure our best chances for success.

As  for  an  independent  model,  there  exists  an  independent  National  Institute  of

Forensic Science (NIFS)34 in Australia. The NIFS core functions include:35

science services;

• Sponsor and support research in forensic science;
• Advise  on  and  assist  with  the  development  and  coordination  of  forensic
• Gather and exchange forensic information;
• Support, coordinate and conduct training programs in forensic science; and
• Conduct relevant quality assurance programs.

Additional present and future activities of NIFS include:36

• Raising the profile of forensic science; and
• Constructive and accountable resource management.

Created in 1991 as a National Common Police Service, the agency governance in-
cludes a Board of Control (comprised of three Police Commissioners, three Forensic
Laboratory  Directors,  and  a  distinguished  University  Provost)  and  a  Panel  of  Advi-
sors (scientists, police, legal practitioners, and medical practitioners). The multi-dis-
ciplinary  nature  of  their  directorate  should  not  be  missed,  particularly  the  law  en-
forcement  and  legal  communities  shoulder-to-shoulder  with  the  scientific  and  med-
ical; ‘‘. . . diversity makes for a rich tapestry, and we must understand that all the
threads  of  the  tapestry  are  equal  in  value  no  matter  what  their  color.’’ 37 I  am  not
well-acquainted with the existing NIFS but it certainly does sound as though it ad-
dresses  many  of  the  issues  brought  up  in  the  NRC  report.  I  suggest  we  might  well
benefit  from  more  detailed  analysis  of  this  existing  model  as  we  venture  to  build
our better mouse trap.

As  for  the  National  Institute  of  Science  and  Technology  (NIST)  specifically,  I  feel
that there are their continued efforts to improve forensics will remain beneficial. In
fact,  the  NRC  report  calls  for  their  involvement  in  setting  accreditation  and  certifi-
cation  standards.38 While  NIST  clearly  has  a  demonstrated  record  of  unsurpassed
technical in many scientific areas, it lacks an established history with regard to the
complexities and intricacies of the interaction of law enforcement, legal, and govern-
mental  issues  so  vital  to  operations  within  the  forensics  environment.  The  day-to-
day application of forensics means working with less than optimal evidence and try-
ing to obtain the best possible result, then reporting to the appropriate entities. The
NIST expertise in laboratory standards does not translate well into the larger issues
of  accreditation  &  certification  implementation,  practitioner  professionalism  and
ethics,  or  administrative  areas.  Nor,  quite  honestly,  is  there  likely  to  be  an  easy
buy-in from the forensics system as a whole given the shortcomings enumerated.

I look forward to working with all those with a sincere interest in providing time-
ly  delivery  of  the  highest  quality  forensic  science  services  to  all.  With  continued  ef-
fort, the NAS report is a significant step in that direction. In closing, I believe that
the  Path  Forward  for  forensic  sciences,  as  outlined  in  the  national  Academy  of
Sciences  report  is  best  served  by  that  old  adage,  ‘‘good  enough  seldom  is.’’  The
American people deserve better.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES C. UPSHAW DOWNS

James  Claude  Upshaw  (‘‘Jamie’’)  Downs,  M.D.,  is  coastal  Georgia’s  first  Regional

Medical Examiner.

He  has  been  continuously  employed  as  a  Medical  Examiner  since  1989  and  was
Alabama’s State Forensics Director and Chief Medical Examiner from 1998 to 2002.
Dr.  Downs  has  lectured  extensively  in  the  field  of  forensic  pathology  and  has  pre-

34 http://www.nifs.com.au/
35 http://www.nifs.com.au/NIFS/NIFS¥frame.html?about.asp&1
36 Ibid.
37 Maya Angelou
38 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  The  National  Acad-

emies Press, Washington, D.C., February 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

sented  at  numerous  national  and  international  meetings  in  the  fields  of  anatomic
and  forensic  pathology.  He  is  a  consultant  to  the  FBI  Behavioral  Science  Unit  in
Quantico,  Virginia,  having  authored  four  chapters  in  their  manual  on  Managing
Death  Investigation  and  was  primary  author  of  the  FBI’s  acclaimed  Forensic  Inves-
tigator’s  Trauma  Atlas.  He  has  authored  several  books  and  chapters  in  the  field  of
forensic  pathology  and  child  abuse,  including  Abusive  Head  Trauma  in  Infants  and
Children:  A  Medical,  Legal  &  Forensic  Reference  with  CD–ROM  and  Child  Fatality
Review:  A  Clinical  Guide  and  A  Color  Atlas  (in  press).  He  has  lectured  regularly
at the National Forensic Academy and at the FBI’s National Academy. Areas of spe-
cial  interest  include  child  abuse  and  police  use  of  force.  Professional  activities  have
included service on numerous professional boards and committees.

He  has  testified  in  numerous  State  and  federal  courts,  as  well  as  before  commit-

tees of the United States Senate and House of Representatives.

Dr. Downs is on the Board of Advisors for the Law Enforcement Innovation Cen-
ter  at  the  University  of  Tennessee,  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  National  Associa-
tion  of  Medical  Examiners,  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  Consortium  of  Forensic
Science  Organizations  (Vice  Chair),  and  the  National  Forensic  Science  Technology
Center.  He  also  serves  on  the  Forensic  Committee  of  the  International  Association
of Chiefs of Police.

Chair WU. Thank you very much, Dr. Downs.
Mr. Neufeld, please proceed.

STATEMENT OF MR. PETER J. NEUFELD, CO-FOUNDER AND

CO-DIRECTOR, THE INNOCENCE PROJECT

Mr.  NEUFELD.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chair  and  Members  of  the
Committee.  My  name  is  Peter  Neufeld.  I  am  the  Co-Founder  and
Co-Director  of  the  Innocence  Project,  and  certainly  I  will  be  the
first  to  admit,  if  it  wasn’t  for  DNA,  I  wouldn’t  be  here  and  there
would  be  no  Innocence  Project  because  it  was  DNA  that  was  re-
sponsible  for  the  exoneration  of  233  men  and  women  in  this  coun-
try  who  were  wrongly  convicted.  Unfortunately,  our  research  into
these  cases  suggests  that  50  percent  of  them  were  wrongly  con-
victed  because  of  the  use  of  either  an  unvalidated  or  improper  fo-
rensic science testimony at their original trials, and it is our famili-
arity  with  DNA  which  leads  me  to  take  issue  with  some  of  the  re-
marks made by some of the other speakers.

The  underlying  success  and  virtue  of  DNA  and  its  robustness
does not come primarily from the fact that the FBI or NIJ or NIST
worked  on  tweaking  it  to  make  it  more  user  friendly  in  the  crime
labs in America. The underlying robustness of DNA comes from the
fact that for 20 years before it was ever used in a courtroom, DNA
was being broadly researched—applied research, basic research, for
research  laboratories,  for  medical  applications  of  DNA,  and  that  is
the  uniqueness  of  DNA,  if  you  will,  with  respect  to  these  other  fo-
rensic disciplines that come under such harsh criticism in the NAS
report,  that  these  other  disciplines  were  created  first  and  foremost
for  law  enforcement  and  so  they  never  went  through  that  kind  of
basic or applied research that DNA enjoyed.

And for our clients, our exonerees, the findings of the NAS report
are not a total surprise. We knew about this anecdotally but fortu-
nately it was the NAS report that looked at it methodically and sci-
entifically and arrived at the conclusions that are reached. And one
of the key conclusions that are reached is that ‘‘With the exception
of nuclear DNA analysis, however, no forensic method has been rig-
orously shown to have the capacity to consistently, and with a high
degree  of  certainty,  demonstrate  a  connection  between  evidence
and  a  specific  individual  or  source.’’  That  is  the  finding  of  the  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

port,  and  to  us,  that  is  not  a  surprise  because  so  many  of  our  cli-
ents were convicted because of less than reliable, or less than vali-
dated,  forensic  science.  I  hold  out  Kennedy  Brewer  as  an  example.
He  is  mentioned  in  the  written  testimony.  Kennedy  Brewer  was
convicted  because  a  bite  mark  expert  in  Mississippi  said  insect
marks  on  this  little  three-year-old  girl’s  body  were  not  only  bite
marks but were bite marks that came from Kennedy Brewer to the
exclusion of everybody on the planet. Years later, even though this
man was sentenced to death for a crime he didn’t convict, DNA on
the  semen  recovered  from  her  not  only  exonerated  him  but  identi-
fied the real perpetrator, a man named Justin Albert Johnson. And
the  sad  thing  in  this  case  is  that  18  months  earlier  another  three-
year-old girl was killed in the same community and once again the
same bite mark expert said that someone named Lavon Brooks was
responsible  for  those  bite  marks  and  therefore  must  have  been  re-
sponsible  for  that  murder.  Justin  Albert  Johnson  was  nearly  sus-
pect  in  that  other  case,  but  because  of  the  bite  mark  evidence  ev-
erybody ignored Mr. Johnson and focused on the wrong person.

Every  time  the  police  department  or  the  forensic  scientists  focus
on  the  wrong  person,  the  real  bad  guy  is  still  out  there,  as  in  this
case,  committing  other  horrible  crimes.  In  this  case,  it  was  a  rape
and  murder  of  a  three-year-old  girl.  What  we  found  in  the  230  ex-
onerations  are  100  instances  where  the  real  perpetrator  was  ulti-
mately  identified  and  during  those  intervening  years  the  real  per-
petrator  committed  many  serious  murders  and  violent  rapes.  So
when  we  are  talking  about  making  reforms  here,  we  are  talking
about  not  only  helping  the  wrongly  convicted,  we  are  helping  im-
prove public safety for all Americans. And when people say oh, this
is  old  science,  they  should  know  that  we  tried  to  do  an  informal
survey  here  and  we  found  out  that  there  are  still  200  to  300  of
these bite mark experts in the last four to five years who were tes-
tifying in these kinds of cases. Look at Brendan Mayfield and look
at  the  language  in  this  report  on  fingerprint  examination,  and
what  it  says  in  the  report  is  that  the  ACE–V  [Analysis,  Compari-
son,  Evaluation,  and  Verification]  does  not  guard  against  bias,  is
too  broad  to  ensure  repeatability  and  transparency,  and  does  not
guarantee  that  two  analysts  following  it  will  obtain  the  same  re-
sults.  Well,  no  wonder  two  FBI  agents  in  the  Brendan  Mayfield
case swore on affidavits that they were 100 percent certain that the
fingerprints  on  the  bombing  device  bag  in  Madrid  came  from  this
attorney named Mayfield but they were 100 percent wrong.

The  problem  is,  when  you  look  at  the  language  in  the  NAS  re-
port,  if  you  were  not  looking  at  forensic  science  but  instead  you
were  looking  at  medicine,  you  would  outlaw  those  products  or  you
would  pull  them  from  the  shelf,  but  historically  we  have  always
had  this  double  standard  for  forensic  science  on  the  one  hand  and
medical  science  on  the  other,  and  that  is  what  the  NAS  report  set
out  to  address,  to  treat  it  with  the  same  kind  of  rigor,  and  wher-
ever you decide to place this thing, Mr. Chair and Members of the
Committee, the key principles are there has to be an aggressive re-
search agenda, something that has always been lacking in forensic
science. There has to be an oversight entity concerned with validity
and reliability, something that has always been lacking in forensic
science.  There  has  to  be  some  government  oversight  of  quality  as-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

surance, of accreditation, of certification. If those recommendations
are implemented, you will have science-based prosecutions, you will
have fewer wrongful convictions and you will have a robust forensic
science  industry  that  becomes  an  incubator  for  innovation  and
technology, not just in the United States but throughout the world.
Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Neufeld follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF PETER J. NEUFELD

Thank  you  Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  My  name  is  Peter  Neufeld  and  I  am  the  Co-Director  of  the  Innocence
Project,  affiliated  with  the  Cardozo  School  of  Law,  which  Co-Director  Barry  C.
Scheck  and  I  founded  in  1992.  The  project  is  a  national  litigation  and  public  policy
organization  dedicated  to  exonerating  wrongfully  convicted  people  through  DNA
testing  and  reforming  the  criminal  justice  system  to  prevent  future  miscarriages  of
justice.

Without  the  development  of  DNA  testing,  there  would  be  no  Innocence  Project;
233  factually  innocent  Americans  would  remain  behind  bars,  and  17  of  those  233
could  have  been  executed.  Our  research  into  the  causes  of  wrongful  conviction  re-
veals that police and prosecutors’ reliance on unvalidated and/or improper forensics
was the second greatest contributing factor to those wrongful convictions. Our anal-
ysis  regarding  wrongful  convictions  involving  unvalidated  or  improper  forensic
science  that  were  later  overturned  through  DNA  testing  is  attached  to  this  testi-
mony.

Given what those DNA exonerations have taught us about the shortcomings of fo-
rensic  science,  the  Innocence  Project  is  extremely  thankful  to  Congress  for  author-
izing  and  appropriating  funds  to  establish  the  National  Academies  of  Science  Com-
mittee  on  Identifying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic  Science  Community.  By  convening
some  of  the  very  best  minds  in  the  Nation  to  focus  on  the  needs  and  shortcomings
of  forensic  practice  and  how  to  remedy  them,  the  Nation  has  been  provided  with
both an alarm regarding the serious shortcomings that exist regarding forensic evi-
dence, and a roadmap to addressing the major improvements in the forensic system
necessary to ensure the most accurate evidence—and therefore justice—possible.

I  am  also  extremely  pleased  to  participate  in  this  hearing  reviewing  the  rec-
ommendations and conclusions of the National Academies’ report Strengthening Fo-
rensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward.  Thank  you  for  the  invitation
to testify before you today.

While  the  Innocence  Project  is  known  for  its  association  with  DNA  evidence,  we
are forever cognizant of the importance of non-DNA forensic evidence to determina-
tions of justice. Our criminal justice system relies heavily on non-DNA forensic tech-
niques.  The  Bureau  of  Justice  Statistics’  2005  Census  of  Publicly  Funded  Forensic
Crime Laboratories reported that new lab requests for DNA work consist of only ap-
proximately three percent of all of all new requests for lab work.

As  our  review  of  DNA  exonerations  shows,  unvalidated  and  improper  forensics
contributed to approximately 50 percent of wrongful convictions overturned by DNA
testing. In the DNA exonerations alone, we have had wrongful convictions based on
unvalidated  or  misapplied  serological  analysis,  microscopic  hair  comparisons,  bite
mark  comparisons,  shoe  print  comparisons,  fingerprint  comparisons,1 forensic  geol-
ogy  (soil  comparison),  fiber  comparison,  voice  comparison,  and  fingernail  compari-
son,2 among  the  many  forensic  disciplines  that  have  produced  these  tragic  mis-
carriages of justice in our courts. There have even been a few innocents whose con-
victions relied, in part, on shoddy DNA testing in the early years of its forensic ap-
plication. It comes as no surprise to us that the NAS concluded: ‘‘With the exception
of  nuclear  DNA  analysis,  however,  no  forensic  method  has  been  rigorously  shown
to  have  the  capacity  to  consistently,  and  with  a  high  degree  of  certainty,  dem-
onstrate  a  connection  between  evidence  and  a  specific  individual  or  source.’’ 3 The
overarching problem has been that all too frequently, these other forensic disciplines
have been improperly relied upon to connect our innocent clients to crime scene evi-
dence.

1 Garrett and Neufeld, Virginia Law Review, Vol. 95, No. 1, March 2009, p. 8.
2 Ibid., p. 13.
3 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  Committee  on  Identi-
fying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic  Science  Community,  The  National  Academies  Press  (2009),  p.
5–5.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

Just  as  DNA  exonerations  reveal  inherent  shortcomings  in  other  forensic  dis-
ciplines, the evolution and regulation of DNA in the forensic setting (from basic re-
search  to  crime  lab  and  to  casework)  contrast  starkly  with  the  near  total  absence
of validation and demonstrable reproducibility for many other forensic technologies.
Long before there was a national forensic DNA testing program, the National Insti-
tutes of Health (NIH) and others funded and conducted extensive and relevant basic
research and followed it with applied research. Scientists appreciated the challenge
of transferring the technology from research lab to clinical lab and from clinical lab
to  crime  lab.  The  forensic  methods  were  validated  for  case  work,  and  individual
crime  labs  further  validated  the  kits  and  protocols  for  use  in  their  own  laboratory
settings.

In  contrast  to  DNA,  the  vast  majority  of  non-DNA  forensic  assays,  which  have
often  been  erroneously  used  to  suggest  an  individual  match,  have  never  been  sub-
jected to basic scientific research or federal review. Moreover, as pointed out by the
NAS,  neither  the  FBI  nor  the  National  Institute  of  Justice  have,  over  the  years,
‘‘recognized, let alone articulated, a need for change or a vision for achieving it. Nei-
ther has full confidence of the larger forensic science community. And because both
are  part  of  a  prosecutorial  department  of  the  government,  they  could  be  subject  to
subtle contextual biases that should not be allowed to undercut the power of forensic
science.’’ 4 Without  a  push  for  vigorous  adherence  to  the  scientific  method,  innocent
people  have  gone  to  prison  or  death  row  while  the  real  perpetrators  remained  at
liberty to commit other violent crimes.

The NAS report references several of the forensic disciplines which have gone un-

regulated and without proper validation and reliability:

• Hair Comparisons:

‘‘No  scientifically  accepted  statistics  exist  about  the  frequency  with  which
particular  characteristics  of  hair  are  distributed  in  the  population.  There  ap-
pear  to  be  no  uniform  standards  on  the  number  of  features  on  which  hairs
must  agree  before  an  examiner  may  declare  a  ‘‘match.’’ 5 The  report  notes
that  along  with  the  imprecision  of  microscopic  hair  analysis,  the  ‘‘problem  of
using  imprecise  reporting  terminology  such  as  ‘associated  with,’  which  is  not
clearly defined and which can be misunderstood to imply individualization.’’ 6
The committee found no scientific support for the use of hair comparisons for
individualization  in  the  absence  of  nuclear  DNA.  Microscopy  and  mtDNA
analysis  can  be  used  in  tandem  and  may  add  to  one  another’s  value  for
classifying a common source, but no studies have been performed specifically
to quantify the reliability of their joint use.’’ 7

Jimmy Bromgard spent  14.5  years  in  prison  for  the  rape  of  an  eight-year-old  girl
that  he  did  not  commit.  The  semen  found  at  the  crime  scene  could  not  be  typed,
so  the  forensic  case  against  Bromgard  came  down  to  the  hairs  found  at  the  crime
scene. The forensic expert, Arnold Melnikoff, a hair examiner and Laboratory Man-
ager  of  the  State  crime  lab  in  Montana,  testified  that  the  head  and  pubic  hairs
found  at  the  scene  were  indistinguishable  from  Bromgard’s  hair  samples.  He
claimed that there was a one in 100 chance of a head hair ‘‘matching’’ an individual,
and  a  one  in  100  chance  of  a  pubic  hair  ‘‘matching’’—and  then  he  multiplied  these
statistics  to  say  that  there  was  less  than  a  one  in  10,000  chance  that  the  hairs  did
not  belong  to  Bromgard.  This  damning  testimony  was  also  fraudulent:  there  has
never been a standard by which to statistically match hairs through microscopic in-
spection. The criminalist took the impressive numbers out of thin air.

• Bite mark Comparisons:

‘‘Although the methods of collection of bite mark evidence are relatively non-
controversial,  there  is  considerable  dispute  about  the  value  and  reliability  of
the collected data for interpretation. Some of the key areas of dispute include
the accuracy of human skin as a reliable registration material for bite marks,
the uniqueness of human dentition, the techniques used for analysis, and the
role of examiner bias . . .. Although the majority of forensic odontologists are
satisfied that bite marks can demonstrate sufficient detail for positive identi-
fication,  no  scientific  studies  support  this  assessment,  and  no  large  popu-
lation  studies  have  been  conducted.  In  numerous  instances,  experts  diverge
widely in their evaluations of the same bite mark evidence, which has led to
questioning  of  the  value  and  scientific  objectivity  of  such  evidence  . . ..  Bite

4 Ibid., p. S–12.
5 Ibid., p. 5–25.
6 Ibid., p. 5–26.
7 Ibid., p. 5–26.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

mark  testimony  has  been  criticized  basically  on  the  same  grounds  as  testi-
mony  by  questioned  document  examiners  and  microscopic  hair  examiners.
The  committee  received  no  evidence  of  an  existing  scientific  basis  for  identi-
fying an individual to the exclusion of all others.’’ 8

Kennedy  Brewer  spent  seven  years  on  death  row  in  Mississippi  for  the  murder
of  a  three-year-old  girl  that  he  did  not  commit.  An  independent  examiner,  forensic
odontologist,  Dr.  Michael  West,  analyzed  several  marks  on  the  child’s  body  that  he
testified  were  bite  marks  inflicted  by  Brewer,  and  then  only  by  his  top  two  teeth.
West  said  that  ‘‘within  reasonable  medical  certainty,’’  Brewer’s  teeth  caused  the
marks,  and  then  explained  that  ‘‘reasonable  medical  certainty’’  meant  that  Brewer
was  the  source  of  the  marks.  The  ‘‘bite  marks’’  turned  out  to  be  caused  by  insects
in  the  pond  where  the  girl’s  body  was  discovered  and  by  the  natural  sloughing  of
skin a body experiences when left in the water for several days.

• Fingerprint Comparisons:
‘‘ACE–V provides a broadly state framework for conducting friction ridge anal-
yses. However, this framework is not specific enough to qualify as a validated
method  for  this  type  of  analysis.  ACE–V  does  not  guard  against  bias;  is  too
broad  to  ensure  repeatability  and  transparency;  and  does  not  guarantee  that
two  analysts  following  it  will  obtain  the  same  results.9 Errors  can  occur  with
any judgment-based method, especially when the factors that lead to the ulti-
mate judgment are not documented.10 As was the case for friction ridge anal-
ysis  and  in  contrast  to  the  case  for  DNA  analysis,  the  specific  features  to  be
examined  and  compared  between  toolmarks  cannot  be  stipulated  a  priori.’’ 11
Although not a DNA exoneration, Brandon Mayfield’s case was referred to in the
NAS  Committee’s  report  as,  ‘‘surely  signal  caution  against  simple,  and  unverified,
assumptions  about  the  reliability  of  fingerprint  evidence.’’ 12 Brandon  Mayfield  was
arrested as a material witness in the Madrid Bombings of March 2004. Several FBI
fingerprint experts ‘‘matched’’ his print to fingerprints lifted from a plastic bag con-
taining  explosive  material  found  at  the  crime  scene.  Mayfield,  a  Portland  Oregon
lawyer,  who  had  converted  to  Islam  and  married  an  Arab  woman,  had  his  prints
in  the  national  database  because  years  earlier  he  had  served  in  the  U.S.  armed
forces. Mayfield’s print was one of 20 prints returned from a search of the national
Automated  Fingerprint  Identification  System  (AFIS)  as  being  very  similar  to  the
crime  scene  print.  Following  a  further  visual  inspection  of  the  20  prints,  two  FBI
fingerprint  experts  swore  in  affidavits  that  they  were  100  percent  certain  that  the
crime  scene  prints  belonged  to  Mayfield.  When  the  Spanish  police  ultimately  ar-
rested  the  real  source  of  the  fingerprint,  the  FBI  initially  defended  their  ‘‘mistake’’
as  the  result  of  poor  digital  image.  Obviously,  the  two  FBI  experts  could  not  have
been  100  percent  certain  if  the  image  was  poor.  Several  major  investigations  fol-
lowed,  including  one  conducted  by  the  Inspector  General  of  the  Department  of  Jus-
tice.13

The  NAS  report  revealed  similar  lapses  in  validation  and  inappropriate  associa-

tions in several other forensic disciplines:

• Shoe Print Comparisons:

‘‘[I]t  is  difficult  to  avoid  biases  in  experience-based  judgments,  especially  in
the  absence  of  a  feedback  mechanism  to  correct  an  erroneous  judgment.14
[C]ritical  questions  that  should  be  addressed  include  the  persistence  of  indi-
vidual  characteristics,  the  rarity  of  certain  characteristic  types,  and  the  ap-
propriate statistical standards to apply to the significance of individual char-
acteristics.’’ 15

• Fiber Comparisons:

‘‘Fiber  examiners  agree,  however,  that  none  of  these  characteristics  is  suit-
able  for  individualizing  fibers  (associating  a  fiber  form  a  crime  scene  with
one,  and  only  one,  source)  and  that  fiber  evidence  can  be  used  only  to  asso-
ciate a given fiber with a class of fibers.’’ 16

8 Ibid., p. 5–37.
9 Ibid., p. 5–12.
10 Ibid., p. 5–13.
11 Ibid., p. 5–21.
12 Ibid., p. 3–16.
13 Ibid.,  footnotes  75  and  76,  which  indicated  that  contextual  bias  and  confirmation  bias

played an important role in the misidentification.

14 Ibid., p. 5–17.
15 Ibid., p. 5–18.
16 Ibid., p. 5–26.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

• Other  Pattern/Impression  Evidence:  Fingernail  Comparison,  Voice

Comparison, Forensic Geology:
‘‘Although  one  might  argue  that  those  who  perform  the  work  in  laboratories
that conduct hundreds or thousands of evaluations of impression evidence de-
velop  useful  experience  and  judgment  . . .  the  community  simply  does  not
have enough data about the natural variability of those less frequent impres-
sions,  absent  the  presence  of  a  clear  deformity  or  scar,  to  infer  whether  the
observed  degree  of  similarity  is  significant.17 Also,  little  if  any  research  has
been done to address rare impression evidence. Much more research on these
matters is needed.’’ 18

The  aforementioned  disciplines  all  require  further  validation.  The  Innocence
Project agrees with the NAS report regarding what is needed: ‘‘(1) information about
whether or not the method can discriminate the hypothesis from an alternative, and
(2)  assessment  of  the  sources  of  error  and  their  consequences  on  the  decisions  re-
turned by the method.’’ 19

It  is  critical  that  we  all  understand  the  real  world  consequences  of  the  forensic
problems  I  and  the  NAS  have  discussed.  These  were  not  incidents  reflective  of  one
bad actor, or one wayward jurisdiction; our review of the Nation’s DNA exonerations
showed  that  seventy-two  forensic  analysts  from  52  different  labs,  across  25  states
had provided testimony that was inappropriate and/or significantly exaggerated the
probative value of the evidence before the fact finder in either reports or live court-
room  testimony.  According  to  the  NAS  Forensic  Committee’s  report,  the  short-
comings in education, training, certification, accreditation, and standards for testing
and  testifying  that  contributed  to  wrongful  convictions  in  those  cases  threaten  the
integrity of forensic results across virtually all non-DNA forensics.

It  is  important  to  recognize  that  these  233  individuals  represent  just  the  tip  of
the  iceberg.  In  the  vast  majority  of  cases  DNA  is  simply  useless  to  indicate  inno-
cence  or  guilt—in  fact,  DNA  is  estimated  to  be  probative  in  only  10  percent  of  all
murder cases, and a far lower percentage of all criminal cases. What’s more, in most
cases  where  convicted  people  seek  our  representation  to  use  post-conviction  DNA
testing  to  prove  their  innocence,  we  don’t  have  the  opportunity  to  conduct  a  DNA
test  because  the  biological  evidence  has  either  been  lost  or  destroyed.  And  in  some
cases, when we have the evidence and testing it can prove innocence, the state sim-
ply refuses to allow the test that can indicate the truth.

DNA testing has become the gold standard in forensics because it is science-based
and  tested.  It  was  discovered  through  basic  research  and  later  applied  to  clinical
DNA  diagnostics,  developing  under  the  same  scrutiny  given  to  medical  devices.  So
when  it  entered  the  courtroom,  there  was  already  a  tremendous  body  of  literature
in  highly  respected  scientific  journals,  amassed  over  a  number  of  years,  to  support
and  validate  its  accuracy.  Subsequently,  the  National  Research  Council  twice  con-
vened  some  of  the  top  scientists  from  leading  research  universities  to  discuss  not
only  the  scientific  application  of  DNA  in  courts,  but  also  to  validate  the  statistical
implications of the data that was produced.

Non-DNA  forensic  assays  have  not  been  scientifically  validated,  and  there  is  no
formal  apparatus  in  place  to  do  so  for  developing  forensic  technology.  Though  the
technology  has  changed  over  time,  the  sources  of  human  error,  misinterpretation,
and misconduct have not. Most of the assays used in law enforcement have no other
application;  they  were  developed  for  the  purpose  of  investigation,  prosecution  and
conviction  and  took  on  a  life  of  their  own  without  being  subjected  to  the  rigors  of
the  scientific  process.  Essentially,  the  assays  were  simply  accepted  as  accurate.
Many of these forensic disciplines—some of which are experience-based rather than
data-based—went  online  with  little  or  no  scientific  validation  and  inadequate  as-
sessments of their robustness and reliability. No entity comparable to the Food and
Drug  Administration  ever  scrutinized  the  forensic  devices  and  assays,  nor  were
crime  laboratories  subject  to  mandatory  accreditation  and  forensic  service  practi-
tioners subject to certification. Enforceable parameters for interpretation of data, re-
port writing, and courtroom testimony have also never been developed.

While  there  is  research  and  work  that  establishes  what  needs  to  be  done  to  im-
prove  various  forensic  practices,  the  fact  is  that  no  existing  government  entity,  nor
the  forensics  community  itself,  has  been  able  to  sufficiently  muster  the  resources
nor focus the attention necessary to use the existing information as a launching pad
to  comprehensively  improve  the  integrity  of  non-DNA  forensic  evidence.  The  NAS
report is the first step—and a tremendous one—toward fully establishing and acting

17 Ibid., p. 5–17.
18 Ibid., p. 5–18.
19 Ibid., p. 4–2.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

upon  what  we  already  know.  From  the  perspective  of  justice  and  public  safety,  it
is  tragic  that  it  has  taken  this  long  to  act  on  the  desperate  need  to  improve  the
quality  of  forensic  evidence.  Given  the  clear  and  comprehensive  message  delivered
by the NAS on this subject, further delay would be unconscionable.

The  report  calls  for  Congress  to  act,  strongly  and  swiftly.  This  is  because  as  I
speak, many of these assays and technologies are being used in investigations, pros-
ecutions and convictions daily everywhere in this country, despite their potential to
mislead  police,  prosecutors,  judges  and  juries  away  from  the  real  perpetrators  of
crime.  Although  the  conventional  wisdom  once  stated  that  a  sound  defense  and
cross-examination  would  enable  courts  to  properly  assess  the  strength  of  forensic
evidence,  the  Report  unequivocally  states  and  the  post-conviction  DNA  exoneration
cases  clearly  demonstrate  that  scientific  understanding  of  judges,  juries,  defense
lawyers and prosecutors is wholly insufficient to substitute for true scientific evalua-
tion  and  methodology.  It  is  beyond  the  capability  of  judges  and  juries  to  accurately
assess  the  minutiae  of  the  fundamentals  of  science  behind  each  of  the  various  spe-
cific  forensic  assays  in  order  to  determine  the  truth  in  various  cases,  and  it  is  an
unfair  and  dangerous  burden  for  us  to  place  on  their  shoulders.  Indeed,  the  NAS
report  deems  that  ‘‘judicial  review,  by  itself,  will  not  cure  the  infirmities  of  the  fo-
rensic science community.’’ 20

It  is  absolutely  clear—and  essential—that  the  validity  of  forensic  techniques  be
established  ‘‘upstream’’  of  the  court,  before  any  particular  piece  of  evidence  is  con-
sidered  in  the  adjudicative  process.  For  our  justice  system  to  work  properly,  stand-
ards  must  be  developed  and  quality  must  be  assured  before  the  evidence  is  pre-
sented  to  the  courts—or  even  before  police  seek  to  consider  the  probative  value  of
such  testing  for  determining  the  course  of  their  investigations.  There  is  simply  no
substitute  for  requiring  the  application  of  the  scientific  method  to  each  forensic
assay or technology, as well as parameters for report writing and proper testimony,
as part of the formal system of vetting the scientific evidence we allow in the court-
room.

The  Innocence  Project  whole-heartedly  supports  the  primary  recommendation  of
the  National  Academy  of  Sciences’  report  to  create  a  federal  National  Institute  of
Forensic  Sciences.  We  believe  that  federal  oversight  body  must  conduct  research
into  the  scientific  validity  and  reliability  of  forensic  disciplines  and  set  standards
for  their  use  in  the  courtroom.  A  federal  entity  is  needed  to  ensure  that  we  don’t
have 50 states operating under 50 definitions of ‘‘science’’; forensic science in Amer-
ica  needs  one  standard  of  science  so  we  can  have  one  standard  for  justice.  As  Con-
gress  considers  the  establishment  of  such  an  agency,  there  are  several  principles
that it should adhere to.

First, the National Institute of Forensic Sciences should focus on three critical pri-
orities:  (1)  basic  research,  (2)  assessment  of  validity  and  reliability,  and  (3)  quality
assurance, accreditation, and certification. This body should identify research needs,
establish priorities, and precisely design criteria for identifying the validity and reli-
ability  of  various  extant  and  developing  forensic  assays  and  technologies.  Then,
using  the  data  generated  by  research,  this  entity  should  then  undertake  a  com-
prehensive  assessment  of  the  validity  and  reliability  of  each  assay  and  technology
to develop standards by which the practitioners must adhere and under which their
reporting  and  court  room  testimony  must  operate.  Given  NIST’s  reputation  as  a
highly respected and admired standard-setting agency, as well as its history of em-
ploying  Nobel  prize-winning  scientists  who  conduct  superb  research  and  translate
basic  science  to  applied  commercial  standards  and  its  tradition  of  objective,  inde-
pendent,  science-grounded  work,  we  agree  with  the  NAS  report  that  NIST  would
make a sensible partner for setting those standards. The Innocence Project also be-
lieves  strongly  that  this  body  must  play  a  central  role  in  accreditation  and  certifi-
cation.  Laboratories  that  seek  accreditation  must  have  quality  controls  and  quality
assurance programs to ensure their forensic product is ready for the courtroom. In-
dividual  practitioners  must  meet  certain  training  and  education  requirements,  con-
tinuing education, proficiency testing, and parameters for data interpretation, report
writing and testimony.

Second,  to  ensure  this  agency’s  objectivity  and  scientific  integrity,  and  to  prevent
any  real  or  perceived  institutional  biases  or  conflicts  of  interest,  it  is  paramount
that  NIFS  be  a  non-partisan,  independent  agency,  with  its  basic  and  applied  re-
search  products  and  standards  grounded  in  the  best  traditions  of  the  scientific
method.  We  agree  with  the  NAS  report  that  ‘‘Governance  must  be  strong  enough—
and  independent  enough—to  identify  the  limitations  of  forensic  science  methodolo-

20 Ibid., p. 3–20.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

gies  and  must  be  well  connected  with  the  Nation’s  scientific  research  base  in  order
to affect meaningful advances in forensic science practices.’’ 21

Third,  this  entity  will  coordinate  all  existing  and  future  federal  functions,  pro-

grams, and research related to the forensic sciences and forensic evidence.

Fourth, in order for this entity to be successful, forensic oversight must be obliga-
tory and an effective mechanism of enforcement of these standards must exist. After
having  been  given  the  proper  direction  and  opportunity  to  comply,  noncompliant
laboratories  or  practitioners  should  lose  their  ability  to  participate  in  the  business.
These corrective actions can be overseen in conjunction with other government agen-
cies;  however  enforcement  powers  must  be  under  the  command  and  control  of  the
NIFS.

Fifth,  this  entity  must  be  a  permanent  program  in  order  to  ensure  ongoing  eval-
uation  and  review  of  current  and  developing  forensic  science  techniques,  tech-
nologies,  assays,  and  devices;  and  continued  government  leadership,  both  publicly
and  through  private  industry,  in  the  research  and  development  of  improved  tech-
nology with an eye toward future economic investments that benefit the public good
and the administration of justice.

Finally, Congress must allocate adequate resources to the NIFS so that it can un-
dertake  its  critical  work  quickly,  effectively,  and  completely,  and  so  its  mandates
can be executed in full.

Our  work  has  shown  the  catastrophic  consequences  of  such  a  lack  of  research,
standards,  and  oversight.  It  is  clear  that  the  Nation’s  forensic  science  community
is  ready  and  willing  to  work  with  the  Federal  Government,  law  enforcement,  and
other scientists to ensure a brighter future for forensic science. Science-based foren-
sic  standards  and  oversight  will  increase  the  accuracy  of  criminal  investigations,
strengthen  criminal  prosecutions,  protect  the  innocent  and  the  victims,  and  enable
law enforcement to consistently focus its resources not on innocent suspects, but on
the  true  perpetrators  of  crimes.  For  as  the  Nation’s  post-conviction  DNA  exonera-
tions have proven all too clearly, when the system is focused on an innocent suspect,
defendant or convict, the real perpetrator remains free to commit other crimes.22

The investment of time, effort and resources necessary to deliver us from our false
reliance  on  some  forensic  assays  will  pay  tremendous  dividends  in  terms  of  time,
effort and resources not wasted by virtue of this false reliance. In short, it will make
criminal  investigations,  prosecutions  and  convictions  more  accurate,  and  our  public
more safe—and perhaps most importantly, justice more assured.

We  have  been  directed  toward  an  irrefutable  and  unprecedented  opportunity  to
significantly improve the administration of criminal justice in the United States. By
evaluating and strengthening forensic science techniques with the strong, well-fund-
ed,  and  well-staffed  entity  we  described,  we  can  create  a  formal  system  to  ensure
that criminal justice is accurately conducted and justly performed. The research and
development of both existing and new forensic disciplines will create new industries
and jobs in the U.S., just as the development of DNA technologies and their applica-
tions has done. With your support, we will not only significantly enhance the quality
of justice in the United States, but we will also minimize the possibility that trage-
dies like that endured by the Nation’s 233 (and counting) exonerees and their fami-
lies will needlessly be repeated time and again.

21 Ibid., p. 2–19.
22 In  the  wake  DNA  exonerations  of  the  wrongfully  convicted,  that  same  DNA  analysis  has

enabled us to identify 100 of the true suspects and/or perpetrators of those crimes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

BIOGRAPHY FOR PETER J. NEUFELD

Peter  Neufeld  co-founded  and  co-directs  The  Innocence  Project,  an  independent
non-profit affiliated with the Benjamin N. Cardozo School of Law. He is also a part-
ner in the civil rights law firm Cochran Neufeld & Scheck, LLP.

The  Innocence  Project  began  in  1992  as  a  clinical  program  with  the  single  focus
of  exonerating  the  wrongfully  convicted.  In  April,  2007,  the  Project  celebrated  the
200th  post  conviction  DNA  exoneration.  The  work  has  expanded  to  bring  sub-
stantive  reform  to  the  system  responsible  for  unjust  imprisonment,  with  particular
attention to improving eyewitness identification procedures, requiring the recording
of police interrogations, and enhancing the reliability of forensic science. The Project

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

has  also  contributed  to  a  significant  shift  in  the  national  debate  on  the  death  pen-
alty. Entrenched positions predicated on politics and morality have given way to an
emerging  consensus  on  the  relationship  between  erroneous  outcomes  and  irrevers-
ible punishment.

Peter’s law firm represents victims of constitutional violations in which the cases
have the potential to produce institutional reform. The firm’s clients have included:
• Abner  Louima,  the  Haitian-American  tortured  by  police  officers  in  a  precinct
bathroom.  The  civil  case  was  the  first  in  the  Nation  to  hold  a  police  union
accountable for acts of brutality inflicted by its members.

• Two of the four young black and latino athletes wounded by New Jersey State
troopers  for  the  crime  of  ‘‘DWB’’—driving  while  black.  The  case  became  in-
strumental in raising the Nation’s consciousness about racial profiling.

• Thomas  Pizzuto,  who  entered  Nassau  County  Jail  on  a  90-day  sentence  for
a Vehicle & Traffic Law violation but received a death sentence at the hands
of  correction  officers.  His  death  precipitated  a  federal  investigation  that  led
to a Department of Justice consent decree to implement much needed reform
at the county jail.

Peter  has  litigated  and  taught  extensively  in  both  the  ‘‘hard’’  and  behavioral  fo-
rensic sciences. Before co-founding the Innocence Project at Cardozo Law School, he
taught  trial  advocacy  at  Fordham  University  Law  School  and  was  a  staff  attorney
with  the  Legal  Aid  Society  of  New  York.  For  the  last  decade  he  has  served  on  the
New  York  State  Commission  on  Forensic  Science,  with  responsibility  for  regulating
all  State  and  local  crime  laboratories.  He  has  published  more  than  a  dozen  articles
on  science  and  law,  and  is  the  co-author,  along  with  Jim  Dwyer  and  Barry  Scheck
of the book entitled Actual Innocence: When Justice Goes Wrong And How To Make
It Right.

A  1972  graduate  of  the  University  of  Wisconsin,  Peter  Neufeld  received  his  law
degree  in  1975  from  New  York  University  School  of  Law.  You  can  read  about  the
Innocence Project at www.innocenceproject.org.

DISCUSSION

Chair WU. Thank you very, Mr. Neufeld.
Before  we  get—we  are  now  in  the  question  and  comment  period
of  the  hearing,  and  the  Chair  first  recognizes  himself  for  five  min-
utes.

Before  we  get  to  other  crucial  issues  like  level  of  support,  level
of  funding,  whether  to  create  a  new  independent  agency  or  to  per-
haps  approach  that  in  a  different  way,  and  transition  issues,  it
seems to me there may be some disagreement or at least difference
in  emphasis  among  the  witnesses  about  the  current  state  of  foren-
sic  science.  When  I  hit  my  first  memo  on  this  topic,  I  have  to  say
that  I  was  a  little  bit  stunned.  One  of  the  sentences  in  that  memo
said  with  the  exception  of  DNA  matching,  the  commonly  used  fo-
rensic  tests  such  as  fingerprint  analysis,  ballistic  testing,  hair
matching,  pattern  recognition  and  paint  matching  are  based  more
on  workers’  experience  than  on  rigorous  scientific  protocols.  And  I
had  the  same  reaction  to  that  sentence  that  I  did  when  I  was  vis-
iting  my  local  medical  school  and  they  were  discussing  evidence-
based medicine. I had a very brief exposure to medical school in my
training days and my first reaction was, gee, I thought all the stuff
you  all  did  was  evidence-based.  It  took  me  a  while  to  understand
evidence-based  medicine  and  what  they  were  getting  at.  Perhaps
the panel for our edification could discuss with me, or with us, your
concerns  about  whether  there  is  a  sound  scientific  basis  for  many
of  the  tests  that  we  commonly  rely  on  in  our  forensic  testing,  and
I  don’t  know  if  we  want  to  go  from  right  to  left,  left  to  right,  or
whether any of you want to proceed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

Mr. Neufeld, forgive me. I am reverting to my old Germanic past.

I pronounced your name Neufeld.

Mr. NEUFELD. I appreciate it actually. Thank you. Very few peo-

ple do but that is the right pronunciation.

I am not a scientist and I am not——
Chair WU. Your microphone.
Mr. NEUFELD. I am not a scientist and I am not the best person
to  answer  your  question,  but  these  individuals  who  are  on  this
panel  all  have,  obviously,  their  own  subjective  experience  and  also
their own special disciplines in the case of some of them which they
may or may not wish to defend. The point of the National Academy
report,  however,  is  it  is  a  blue-ribbon  body  of  some  of  the  best
minds,  not  just  in  the  forensic  science  community  but  in  the  hard
sciences  as  opposed  to,  you  know,  in  the  basic  sciences,  which  are
not represented in this panel right now before you with the excep-
tion of the eminent physician who is sitting to my right. And what
I  will  say  is,  it  was  their  conclusion  that  it  was  lacking  and  we
can’t  simply  ignore  that  conclusion  that  is  based  on  a  two-year
study that they did.

Chair  WU.  Well,  realizing  that  you  are  not  a  scientist,  perhaps
we  can  come  back  to  you  at  some  point  and  you  could  address  ei-
ther examples or analytically what would be different if there were
a scientific basis to some of the forensic work that we do.

Dr. Downs, would you care to address this issue? Does this make

a difference or does it not, or is there a problem here?

Dr.  DOWNS.  Mr.  Chair,  I  think  it  is  a  great  question  and  your
model of evidence-based medicine I think is dead on. In fact, in my
written  comments  I  address  the  whole  source  of  that,  which  was
the Flexner Report from back at the turn of the last century.

Chair WU. And the question here is whether we are at a similar
inflection  point  for,  if  you  will,  a  slightly  different  profession  just
as  the  Flexner  Report  and  the  reforms  of  American  medical  edu-
cation  made  a  significant  difference.  Is  there  a  need  to  do  some-
thing that dramatic in this field at this point in time?

Dr.  DOWNS.  I  think  for  the  sake  of  public  competence  that—the
analogy  I  use  is  a  racecar  driver.  They  can  win  championships  on
the  track.  They  have  to  go  back  now  and  get  their  driver’s  license
and  prove  that  they  can  do  what  we  already  know  they  can  do
very,  very  well,  and  I  think  there  is  good  science  behind  all  of  the
testing  that  we  do.  The  problem  is,  we  kind  of  got  ahead  of  it  and
we  never  went  back,  because  as  Mr.  Neufeld  correctly  points  out,
it  came  through  a  different  venue.  It  came  through  law  enforce-
ment  and  the  courts  never  asked  us  for  that  scientific  basis  as  a
starting point. We know it works.

Chair  WU.  That  analogy  is  very  helpful  but  walk  me  through
with  some  specificity.  What  kind  of  difference  would  it  make  if  we
were  to  bring  scientific  or  analytical  rigor,  if  you  will,  rather  than
the  contrasts  with  experiential  work  that  we  perhaps—the  experi-
ential approach with which we have brought to this in the past.

Dr.  DOWNS.  How  does  one  make  a  call  on  a  fingerprint?  How
many  specific  points  in  a  fingerprint  are  required  to  call  that  a
match? In the past that has been based purely on experience; when
the  examiner  reaches  a  certain  comfort  level,  they  make  the  call.
We  don’t  have  a  way  or  metric  to  say  it  takes  ten  points  of  identi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

point?

fication,  twenty  points.  So  there’s  no  ‘‘scientific  basis’’  for  where
that line is, and if we are to apply the standards like we do in med-
icine to say okay, we have these test results, therefore we can with
confidence make this call, that is I think what we are trying to get
to.

Chair  WU.  Do  any  of  the  other  witnesses  want  to  address  this

Mr. Marone.
Mr.  MARONE.  Mr.  Chair,  I  think  to  say  we  need  additional  re-
search  is  the  key,  additional  research.  What  has  happened  in  the
past has—research has been done at any number of levels, usually
by  the  practitioners,  the  people  working  in  the  field,  whether  it  be
for  firearms  identification  or  fingerprints,  and  I  will  use  firearms
examination  as  the  first  example.  There  have  been  a  number,  lit-
erally  probably  hundreds  of  studies  where  individuals  have  taken
ten  sequentially  manufactured  barrels  to  see  just  how  close  they
looked before we do anything to them and can we still differentiate
them  even  though  they  have  come  off  the  assembly  line  one  after
the other. But the key is, those studies haven’t been broad enough
or have looked at enough issues, statistically analyzed. Maybe they
didn’t  answer  all  the  questions  that  an  individual  would  want  and
so we need to take those same kind of studies, broaden them, make
sure that all the questions, issues variables are answered, and that
would give you the scientific basis. So a lot of the work is out there,
it just hasn’t answered all the questions. But what I can say is, of
all  the  work  that  has  been  done,  all  the  research  that  has  been
done  in  fingerprinting,  all  the  research  that  has  been  done  in  fire-
arms  identification,  nothing  has  led  anyone  to  believe  that  it  isn’t
proper,  that  it  can’t  be  done,  which  if  you  are  going  to  truly  look
at  it  scientifically,  that  is  a  two-edged  sword.  Just  because  there
isn’t full validation, you can’t jump to the conclusion that it is em-
pirically wrong when you do have some research that indicates that
there  is  some,  you  just  need  more  work.  So  I  think  that  is  where
we are.

There  is  a  lot  of  research  that  has  been  done.  A  lot  of  it  hasn’t
been published in technical notes and so forth, and it needs to come
up to that same level of rigor in peer-review journals, and so forth,
so  that  everyone  can  look  at  it,  try  to  reproduce  it,  and  so  forth.
So that I think is the issue that we need to make the research that
has  been  done  more  broad  based  and  more  really  attuned  to  what
exactly the question is.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  Mr.  Chair,  can  I  respond  to  that  for  one  second?

Because I do disagree.

Chair  WU.  Yes,  a  response  here,  and  then  I  intend  to  return  to
this  issue  because  it  is  a  core  issue,  but  I  am  a  few  minutes  over
my time. With Mr. Smith’s forbearance, go ahead.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  My  understanding  of  the  scientific  method,  and  I
am  not  an  expert  in  it,  I  don’t  have  a  post-doc  in  it,  is  the  burden
is  on  the  proponent  of  any  scientific  hypothesis  to  prove  that  it  is
right.  It  is  not  our  burden  to  show  that  what  they  are  doing  is
wrong,  okay?  They  have  to  make  out  sufficient  basis  to  dem-
onstrate  that  something  has  been  scientifically  validated.  That  is
number  one.  Number  two,  in  response  to  what  Dr.  Downs  said,
could  you  imagine  in  a  medical  context,  because  he  was  talking

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

about  fingerprints,  if  ten  different  examiners  looked  at  the  same
cells and had ten different definitions as to whether they were sim-
ply  abnormal  as  opposed  to  malignant?  How  could  we  have  con-
fidence  in  medicine  if  we  had  that  range  of  opinion?  It  wouldn’t
work in medicine. It can’t work in forensic science.

Chair  WU.  Well,  Mr.  Neufeld,  I  may  not  have  a  full  under-
standing  of  medicine  science  but  my  impression  is  that  with  guid-
ance  from  other  sources  that  actually  is  what  happens  in  imaging,
that  is,  you  see  a  pattern  of  shadows  and  light  and,  you  know,
based  on  10,  100,  1,000  reads,  you  develop  patterns  and  they  be-
come  more  analytically  accurate  with  additional  data  but  ulti-
mately it is a match against that background.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  But  you  wouldn’t  expect  that  there  would  be  20
different  opinions  on  the  same  data  looked  at  by  20  different  ana-
lysts, okay, and that is the difference that I am talking about.

Chair WU. That is absolutely correct. You would not hope for 20

different opinions.

Mr. NEUFELD. Right.
Chair  WU.  But  you  might  get  two  very  different  opinions  from

two different readers.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  I  understand  that,  and  the  third  point  of  this  is
as  follows.  You  know,  what  you  did  have  in  medicine  at  the  early
part of the 20th century was a commitment to sort of revolutionize
and  transform  medicine  in  this  country.  You  had  the  creation  of
the National Institutes of Health [NIH] with a very, very ambitious
research  agenda,  and  we  have  never  had  anything—I  am  not  even
talking  about  trying  to  do  something  as  complex  as  that  or  as
grand  as  that,  but  you  have  never  had  a  kind  of  freestanding  re-
search  agenda  for  forensic  science,  not  just  to  validate  that  which
is  already  out  there,  if  it  indeed  can  be  validated,  but  also  to  en-
courage, okay, as I am sure this committee is concerned with, that
kind  of  incubator  for  new  technology,  for  new  forensic  science.
What is going to be the next DNA, the next truth machine that we
can  build  the  industry  out  that  will  be  very  successful,  not  only  in
helping  forensic  science  but  also  in  helping  commerce  and  export-
ing  it?  You  know,  we  want  a  research  agenda  that  can  do  all  of
those things and it is sorely lacking at this point.

Chair  WU.  We  will  return  to  this  issue,  and  I  will  be  asking

tougher questions of the other perspective on this.

Mr. Smith.
Mr. SMITH. If you are on a roll, go ahead.
Chair  WU.  Well,  I  think  that  given  the  presence  of  other  Mem-
bers  here,  we  want  to  get  a  round  in  the  interest  of  fairness.  Mr.
Smith, please proceed. I am reining myself in.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
For all of the witnesses, the entire panel here, if you wish to re-
spond, certainly there are a lot of technical recommendations in the
report. What would stand out to you as the highest priority, if you
wouldn’t mind, starting with Mr. Marone?

Mr.  MARONE.  I  don’t  think  you  have  a  single  highest  priority.
They are very much leveled, if you will. If you look at establishing
maybe  a  priority  based  on  what  can  be  attained  first,  not  easiest,
but with least problematic issues, moving on the accreditation and
certification, certification of individuals and accreditation of labora-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

tories.  Those  are  two  already  vibrant,  rigorous  programs  that  are
out  there  and  can  achieve  significant  gains  in  the  community.  The
certification  for  the  individuals  and  the  accreditation  because  even
though  I  said  that,  you  know,  almost  85,  90  percent  of  the  labora-
tories  are  already  accredited,  one  of  the  other  issues  that  is  out
there is the other service providers. This is the ID section in a po-
lice  department  where  they  do  fingerprint  comparison,  you  know.
There is not that much accreditation or certification out there, cer-
tification to a certain extent, but there is not that much accredita-
tion  out  there.  So  by  taking  that  first  along  with—and  then  edu-
cation  and  somewhere  in  there  you  have  to  put  in  resources  be-
cause  we  can  train  individuals,  we  can  certify  the  individuals,  but
if they don’t have the equipment or the people to provide the anal-
ysis at the other end, then we are at mixed purposes.

So  your  question,  I  am  not  trying  to  go  around  the  circle,  is  we
kind of need them all and they are separate lines that can be done
in  parallel,  the  accreditation,  the  resources.  Laboratories  are  just
up  to  their  eyeballs  in  casework.  We  have  got  to  fix  that,  and  it
is  not  a  quick  fix,  well,  we  give  them  a  whole  bunch  of  money  for
overtime,  or  we  outsource  to  provide  laboratories  or  so  forth  be-
cause  that  only  fixes  it  now  and  then  two  years  from  now  we  are
right back in the same situation. So the resource issues, the accred-
itation  and  certification  goes  a  long  way  towards  a  lot  of  these
other issues as far as competency, effectiveness of the analysis and
so  forth.  You  look  at  a  lot  of  the  recommendations  and  they  can
really  be  subsumed  into  one,  all  the  quality  control  issues  into  ac-
creditation and certification. Those all can be covered by those pro-
grams so I would place those first and then education and certainly
resources. You pick which one you want to do first.

Mr. SMITH. Any estimate of cost?
Mr. MARONE. If I had that answer, I wouldn’t be here right now
speaking  in  the  capacity  I  am.  I  would  probably,  you  know,  have
a  global  conglomerate  answering  that  question  to  everybody.  You
know, we look at what has happened in DNA and the modest, rel-
atively  modest  now,  amount  of  money  that  has  gone  to  DNA  anal-
ysis  in  the  five  years  that  it  has  been.  We  have  seen  tremendous
progress  as  far  as  capacity  enhancement  and  backlog  reduction,
and  really  let  us  not  worry  about  how  much  actually  was  in  the
appropriations,  how  much  money  made  it  to  the  laboratories,  and
it was probably $50 million, maybe $60 million a year, and yet we
saw  progress.  It  is  still  not  enough  but  we  saw  progress.  So  mul-
tiply that by all the other disciplines.

You  know,  I  hesitate  to  throw  a  figure  out  because  then  some-
body  runs  with  it,  you  know,  and  everybody  is  throwing  out  tril-
lions of dollars now. I don’t think we have any idea what this cost
may be. Certainly accreditation, several million dollars for accredi-
tation,  anywhere  between  $5  million  and  $50  million  to  make  ac-
creditation happen, and that is not counting the cost from the lab-
oratory’s  perspective,  the  time  that  they  must  spend  preparing  for
that. The same thing for certification. We have no—I have no idea
how many—how much it might cost but, you know, it is a large fig-
ure,  if  that  helps  you.  You  know,  we  batted  that  around  the  com-
mittee  and  it  is  like  there  is  no  way  to  do  that.  You  have  to  first
find  out  what  the  issues  are  before  you  can  figure  out  what  it  is

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

going to cost, what the numbers are, and we have yet to define the
number  of  service  providers  outside  forensic  laboratories,  how
many PD ID [Police Department Identification] units are there and
so forth.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you. Anyone else?
Ms.  HENDERSON.  Yes.  I  think  what  we  really  need  to  do  is  do  a
strategic plan and I think this is—my learned colleague at the end
of the table and on this end of the table as well. One of the things
that  we  need  to  do  is,  what  are  our  priorities,  and  I  think  that  is
the  key.  You  know,  the  NAS  committee  listed  things,  they  have
recommendations,  but  there  is  no  strategic  plan  put  forth,  and  I
think  that  is  very  critical,  and  also  I  have  to  say  with  Peter,  re-
search  is  critical.  If  we  don’t  know  what  is  going  on  in  all  the  dif-
ferent  disciplines,  and  this  is  what  is  interesting  about  forensic
science. We are a multidisciplinary group. We are not like anything
else. We are not like medicine, although we have, you know, foren-
sic pathologists like Jamie with us, but we have so many different
diverse  groups  within  forensic  science.  But  a  lot  of  research  could
be done and in fact that is where you take the institutions, for ex-
ample.  You  could  use  universities  and  work  in  conjunction  with
laboratories because the laboratories are taxed. They are overtaxed
with many things that they have to do, and I think Pete is correct.
We  don’t  know  how  much  money  this  is  going  to  cost.  We  have  to
take  a  look—what  is  in  existence,  and  that  is  why  I  said  let  us
start  with  some  immediate  action  like  what  can  we  do  with  exist-
ing things that are in place like accreditation and like certification
programs.  There  are  quite  a  few  of  them.  And  then  work  from
there  to  improve,  identify  the  research  priorities  and  then  move
forward. I think that would be practical, which is one of the things
in this economy we need to do.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you.
Dr. Downs.
Dr. DOWNS. I think I agree with what my predecessors have said.
I  would  also  say  I  think  that  as  a  practical  matter,  given  that  the
courts  are  relying  on  this  fingerprint  evidence  and  firearms  evi-
dence,  for  example,  and  the  other  pattern  evidence,  that  we  have
to  validate  that  science  for  those  purposes,  for  courtroom  purposes
because  that  evidence  is  already  ‘‘in  process’’  and  we  have  people
waiting  for  trial.  We  need  to  address  that  issue,  I  think,  as  one  of
those initial priorities.

Mr. SMITH. Mr. Hicks.
Mr.  HICKS.  I  would  just  like  to  voice  my  agreement  to  all  that
has  been  said  here  so  far.  I  think  it  is—the  elements  are  there  to
draw  upon,  you  know,  to  enhance  and  to  help  address  some  of  the
critical questions that have been raised. I suspect much of that in-
formation  is  already  there.  It  just  needs  to  be  put  into  a  package
and  appropriate  form  and  then  subjected  to  scientific  scrutiny.
That would be helpful for the courts. But it ought to be recognized,
I  think,  the  context  of  how  some  of  these  now-called  sciences
evolved,  fingerprints  and  firearms  identification,  fiber  identifica-
tion, things like that. I mean, this was all investigative techniques.
These were undertaken to try to help bring some information about
a criminal event that has taken place.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

So  one  of  the  first  roles  that  the  crime  laboratories  initially  had
to face was just simply identifying the white powdery substance as
a  controlled  substance  meeting  the  critical  element  of  the  law,  so
that  of  course  involved  in  chemists  being  hired  at  the  laboratory.
But prior to that, the question of trying to reconstruct the criminal
event  and  trying  to  then  test  what  can  be  observed  at  the  crime
scene  based—test  that  against  the  statements  of  witnesses  that
may  be  there  and  again  trying  to  assess  and  reconstruct  just  ex-
actly  what  took  place  before  it  is  then  decided  whether  there  are
any charges to be brought and how that would proceed in court.

So consequently, a lot of the development, particularly of the pat-
tern-type  recognition,  the  observation-type  techniques,  such  as  fin-
gerprints,  such  as  firearms  identification,  other  things  like  that,
evolved  in  police  departments  probably  from  investigative  per-
sonnel and not so much scientists and then—but in my estimation,
through  the  years,  through  organizations—forensic  science  organi-
zations  as  these  individual  techniques  have  evolved,  the  agencies
had brought in people with scientific backgrounds as they have rec-
ognized  that  need.  They  probably  were  surprised  when  they  first
arrived  at  the  level  of  sort  of  scientific  underpinnings  there  and  I
think  there  has  been  a  lot  of  work  done  by  a  lot  of  people  to  try
to  address  and  assure  themselves  that  they  were  offering  opinions
confidently in their individual cases. So that is where I think again
NIST  would  have  the—again  as  a  short-term,  efficient,  quick  kind
of response kind of a thing, they have the capacity to look at infor-
mation  that  has  been  developed,  identify  where  the  gaps  are  and,
where  additional  information  is  needed,  and  might  be  able  to  try
to  more  aggressively  and  quickly  and  directly  address  some  of  the
most critical comments found in the report.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  It  has  been  said  that  for  a  lot  of  these  disciplines
that there was plenty of scientific data out there, we just didn’t col-
lect it. One of the specific requests that was made by the National
Academy  of  Sciences  during  the  time  period  that  they  had  this
committee  up  and  running,  and  they  had  public  sessions  was  they
invited  people  to  come  in  and  actually  produce  the  scientific  data
that  folks  were  referring  to.  And  I  will  just  use  this  as  one  small
example. Under the odontology section on bite marks, they reached
a  conclusion,  ‘‘The  committee  received  no  evidence  of  an  existing
scientific  basis  for  identifying  an  individual  to  the  exclusion  of  all
others.’’ There is another report I read which——

Chair WU. I am sorry, Mr. Neufeld. What methodology were you

referring to there?

Mr. NEUFELD. The odontology, bite marks section, for illustrative
purposes.  There  was  a  lot  of  talk  in  the  report  that  a  lot  of  these
problems  were  known  about  back  in  1999  when  NIJ  did  a  study,
and  another  report  that  was  done  in  1995  and  one  done  in  2003,
and  I  think  it  is  shortsighted  if  we  simply  believe  that  we  can
quickly  deal  with  a  couple  of  these  problems  and  then  things  will
be  okay.  When  I  read  this  report,  the  one  thing  I  walk  away  with
is  that  it  won’t  be  okay,  that  in  fact  what  they  are  saying  is  be-
cause  no  one  has  ever  demonstrated  the  will  or  the  vision  to  do
these  things  before,  that  you  really  do  need  a  single  entity,  which
they  call  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Science,  that  can  coordi-
nate all these objectives. Yes, once that is up and running they can

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

prioritize, they can decide that, for instance, some of the disciplines
that  Mr.  Hicks  and  Dr.  Downs  were  referring  to  are  the  ones  that
need  to  be  addressed  first.  But  you  still  need  this  national  entity
that can look at the financial needs, for instance, of all the various
crime laboratories that Pete Marone was talking about.

One  of  the  fundamental  problems  we  have  seen  in  forensic
science,  and  I  don’t  think  there  will  be  any  disagreement  in  this
panel, is there has been kind of a balkanization of forensic science
in  America  so  people  have  to  go  to  20  different  pots,  people  have
to  deal  with  20  different  organizations,  and  it  would  be  much  bet-
ter if there was a single entity that could coordinate all of this and
it could create its own priorities for research, for giving out the fed-
eral  money,  for  doing  all  those  things  that  you  would  expect  to  do
if this is to be a science-based undertaking.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you very much.
Chair WU. Thank you very much.
The gentlelady from Maryland, Representative Edwards.
Ms.  EDWARDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  thank  you  to  the
panel. I would say I do look forward to at some point in the future
hearing  directly  from  NIST  about  some  of  the  analyses  and  rec-
ommendations  and  the  way  that  they  believe  they  can  play  a  con-
tinued  role  in  the  good  work  that  they  are  doing  out  in  the  fourth
Congressional District in Maryland.

To  Mr.  Neufeld,  I  really  appreciate—and  I  have  been  pro-
nouncing your name apparently wrong since 1992, but I appreciate
the  work  that  you  have  done.  I  had  the  great  fortune  when  I  was
at  the  Arca  Foundation  of  being  able  to  support  some  of  the  work
of  the  Innocence  Project  and  all  the  projects  around  the  country
looking  at  DNA  and  obviously  other  evidence  that  resulted  in  peo-
ple  being  wrongfully  convicted,  particularly  of  capital  crimes  and
serving  life  terms  and  facing  execution,  and  I  just  think  that  the
work  that  you  have  done  with  this  new  technology  has  been  an
amazing  revelation  into  our  criminal  justice  system  and  the  way
that it sometimes can fail people who sometimes are of little means
and don’t have the ability to defend themselves, so thank you very
much.

I  have  a  question  really  that  relates  to  funding,  and  while  you
may  not  be  able  to  project  the  amount  of  resources  that  it  would
take  to  do  this  work,  I  wonder  if  any  of  you  have  any  estimates
across the federal landscape of the amount of resources that are al-
ready  being  spent  in  forensic  sciences  and  technology.  Because  I
think  with  a  lot  of  things,  we  are  not  always  in  a  position  here  in
Congress  of  creating  a  new  agency  because  we  have  a  new  field,
and that in itself could be very expensive and maybe not even very
productive. I look at the work, for example, around climate change
that  is  actually  taking  place  across—which  has  a  number  of  dif-
ferent kinds of disciplines contributing to the field and taking place
across  many  different  agencies  and  now  with  some  greater  coordi-
nation  out  of  the  White  House  and  so  I  wonder  if  you  could  com-
ment about a way that we can—and particularly Ms. Henderson—
about  the  way  that  we  can  look  at  the  work  that  is  in  front  of  us
and the recommendations which I think are important, but that we
can use some existing resources or build on those capacities rather
than creating a separate federal agency.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Ms. HENDERSON. Well, I think if we look at what is existing and
then we would have to look, of course, at the latest legislation that
is out there but, if you have to look at different entities, it is going
to be NIST, it is going to be NIJ. There are forensic capacities that
are  being  utilized  in  the  Department  of  Defense  [DOD].  There  is
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  See,  that  is  the  thing.  As
Peter pointed out, there are many little pockets out there with dif-
ferent  resources,  and  in  fact  sometimes  there  is—and  this  goes
back  to  what  Pete  said  too.  There  is  research  that  is  being  done
that we in the forensic community are not privy to because it is in
Department  of  Defense  or  something  and  that  is  not  out  for  peer
review,  for  example.  So  I  think  if  we  look—and  I  think,  Pete,  you
had mentioned something about that in the new economic stimulus
package. There is between $4 billion and $5 billion. Is that correct?
Ms.  EDWARDS.  But  do  you  have  an  idea  across  federal  agencies
of  the  resources?  Maybe  that  is  something  that  we  need  to  figure
out  to  get  a  better  handle  on.  Whether  the  resources  that  you  are
talking  about  that  would  be  used,  perhaps,  even  to  create  a  new
agency already in existence, and maybe there is a way to figure out
a  coordinating  role  among  these  agencies,  even  the  ones  that  are
out  of  our  hands  in  some  ways  like  Department  of  Defense  or
Homeland Security.

The other question sort of goes not so much to the funding levels,
but  what  type  of  coordination  do  you  think  is  necessary  even
across,  you  know,  the  ones  that  we  know  about,  FBI,  NIJ,  NIST?
Ms.  HENDERSON.  Well,  I  would  like  to  talk  about  that  because
when  I  was  the  President  of  the  Academy,  one  of  my  sub-themes
was  collaboration,  and  sometimes  there  isn’t  as  much  as  we  would
hope for in the forensic science community, but I think now we are
all  saying  we  must  all  work  together.  I  mean,  this  is  a  diverse
panel if you look at us and we have come to the table, so to speak,
because  it  is  of  such  concern  both  for  the  justice  system,  and  I  am
saying  both  the  criminal  and  the  civil  justice  system.  So  I  think
what we have to do is identify all the resources that are available.
We all want to make sure that justice, both civil and criminal, are
successful, and we cannot do that unless we identify what is avail-
able  now.  Don’t  duplicate  efforts.  I  think  that  is  a  waste  of  every-
one’s  time.  And  we  have  to  be  cognizant  of  what  our  economy  is
looking  like  these  days.  I  mean,  we  cannot  ignore  that  and  we  are
suffering  across  the  board  here  whether  we  are  in  education,  the
Innocence Project, in a crime laboratory, you know, pathology work,
all of that.

So  I  would  say  the  first  thing  probably  to  do  is  to  identify  the
pots  of  money,  who  is  working  on  it  and  then  can  we  bring  people
to  the  table.  I  don’t  know  whether,  you  know,  people  have  to  be
dragged  kicking  and  screaming  or  not.  I  am  hoping  not,  since  I
think we are all trying to collaborate at this point.

Ms. EDWARDS. My time is up, and I think this is something that
we  actually  do  need  to  explore  and  then  we  can  look  at  the  set  of
short-term recommendations that we could follow through on right
away even though we may not be able to quite reach the long-term
yet. Thank you, Mr. Chair.

Chair WU. Thank you.
The gentleman from Georgia, Mr. Broun.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

Mr. BROUN. I thank the Chair.
Let  me  give  you  a  little  background  about  me.  I  am  a  physician
from Georgia and so Dr. Downs might be able to understand what
I  say.  If  you  all  need  some  interpretation,  he  will  be  glad  to  do
that, I am sure.

Mr.  Marone  said  that  NIST  does  not  have  all  the  package,  and
I  am  concerned.  I  would  like  to  see  a  show  of  hands,  please.  Some
of  you  seem  to  be  promoting  a  new  National  Bureau  of  Forensic
Science or new agency. Who of you all’s group are proposing a new
national bureau? Would you please raise your hands? Okay. Three,
four, one not. Okay. Of the four that are proposing a new national
bureau, why not in the private sector? Why not in the states? Why
can’t  this  be  done?  Because  I  am  as  a  scientist  seeking  truth  all
the  time.  When  I  graduated  from  medical  school,  the  Medical  Col-
lege of Georgia in Augusta, I was taught things as being absolutely
true. Three or 4 years later, through continuing medical education,
I  found  the  opposite  is  true,  and  I  can  give  you  many  examples  of
that, and that is true with all of science and we have to have peer
review and we have to have the independence that Ms. Henderson
was  describing,  and  having  that  independence  is  extremely  impor-
tant  as  far  as  I  am  concerned  to  make  sure  that  we  don’t  convict
people who are not guilty. I want to put the guilty folks in jail and
make them pay for their crimes and I want to make sure that peo-
ple not guilty are exonerated if they are charged.

So  why  not  do  this  in  the  private  sector?  We  have  got  two  com-
peting  forces  here,  the  district  attorneys,  the  prosecutors  on  one
hand,  the  defense  attorneys  on  the  other  with  a  lot  of  money  in-
volved  on  both  sides  at  the  local  and  State  level.  Why  not  allow
market  forces  to  develop  this  kind  of  scientific  inquiry  to  find  the
truth and the new truth as it develops? Mr. Hicks?

Mr.  HICKS.  Well,  I  think  the—again,  because  this  is  driven  typi-
cally  by  the  D.A.’s,  I  mean,  they  are  the  ones  that—and  the  police
investigators  at  the  crime  scene—they  are  the  ones  that  have  the
need  to  try  to  gather  the  kind  of  information  that  will  help  again
reconstruct  the  event,  establish  elements  of  the  crime,  maybe  link
the  suspect  and  the  victim  together.  So  it  seems  to  me  that  is
where the need is going to be defined. And then whether or not you
can  turn  that  to  the  private  sector,  I  think  you  probably  could.  I
think  maybe  that  is  where  NIST  actually  is  kind  of  uniquely  posi-
tioned because they are involved with the private sector to a great
extent,  and  it  just  strikes  me  that  if  given  this  role  with  respect
to  the  forensic  activities,  as  these  new  needs  are  defined  and
emerge, they may recognize opportunities in the private sector that
can  be  brought  to  bear  on  those.  And  of  course,  just  as  with  DNA
technology, while the significance of the technology was recognized
early  on,  but  having  the  reagents,  the  testing  equipment,  all  the
supplies necessary for performance in the laboratory, these all had
to  be  communicated  with  the  private  sector  and  so  there  was,  you
know, a lot of interaction there at that time. The private sector was
eager  to  find  out  what  the  needs  were  because,  I  think,  they  too
recognized the potential for growth in that area.

Mr. BROUN. Thank you, Mr. Hicks.
I  would  like  to  ask  another  show  of  hands,  who  of  you  all  out  of
the  panel  have  read  and  studied  the  Constitution  of  the  United

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

States? Could I see hands? Okay. Four or five of you. I carry a copy
in my pocket and I believe in this document as it was intended by
our  Founding  Fathers.  Could  you  all  show  me  somewhere  in  this
document  where  we  should  develop  a  new  bureau  of  agency  of  fo-
rensic  medicine  or  forensic  science  here  in  the  United  States?  If
you all could show me that, I would appreciate it.

Ms.  HENDERSON.  Actually  Peter  would  probably  say  something
like we could look for a penumbra, right, or a shadow within some
of the Constitutional amendments that say that we—to protect peo-
ple’s  rights  that  we  would  be  able  to  have  something  like  this.
Peter?

Mr.  NEUFELD.  Congressman,  if  I  may,  I  also  wish  to  respond  to
your last question because I think you raised a very good question,
and  I  actually  do  believe  that  the  private  sector  can  play  a  huge
role  in  doing  a  lot  of  the  research  that  you  are  describing,  but  the
one overarching principle that came out of this report, and I think
there is no disagreement on this panel, is that whatever fixes need
to  happen  have  to  happen  upstream  of  a  courtroom,  that  histori-
cally defense lawyers, prosecutors and judges have not done a very
satisfying job of separating the wheat from the chaff when it comes
to good science and bad science in criminal cases. I would be more
than  happy  to  send  you  a  peer-reviewed  article  that  I  wrote  last
year on that specific subject, and what you will see is that even the
very famous Daubert decision that came down in 1993 is not really
used in criminal cases, very, very rarely, and that it is believed by
everybody  here  that  if  you  can  get  this  stuff  right  before  it  ever
gets  into  a  courtroom,  then  we  can  all  have  much  more  confidence
in what goes on, and you can’t simply leave it to the so-called cru-
cible of the courtroom to work it out.

Mr. BROUN. Mr. Neufeld, I appreciate that. My time is about out.
If the Chair would just permit me to make a statement, then I will
quit.

Chair WU. Absolutely.
Mr.  BROUN.  Back  to  my  question  about  the  Constitution,  unless
you look at a perverted sense of the Constitution, you will not find
in  that  document  anywhere  Constitutional  authority  to  develop  a
new  national  agency  or  department  of  forensic  science.  You  won’t
find  it.  But  we  are  operating  here  on  the  perverted  idea  in  Con-
gress,  the  courts  as  well  as  the  Administration  whether  it  is  Re-
publican  or  Democrat,  all  seem  to  operate  on  a  perverted  idea  of
what the Constitution is all about, and I find that very regrettable.
But  as  a  scientist  if  I  am  extremely  interested  in  finding  truth
whether it is in forensic medicine, forensic science, just even medi-
cine as I still practice or not, but I don’t think we are going to have
the intellectual freedom with a new government body because there
is  going  to  be  government  control  over  that  body,  and  I  encourage
you to think long and hard before continuing to promote a national
body.  NIST  does  a  great  job  of  setting  standards  and  I  think  we
have  other  opportunities  to  develop  truth  in  the  forensic  areas
without  developing  a  new  body,  and  we  frankly  don’t  have  the
money  now  to  develop  these  new  standards.  So  I  encourage  you
and  others  to  look  at—we  have  got  to  solve  the  economic  problem
in America and developing new bodies and new bureaus and other
things, maybe they are nice and maybe they are not Constitutional

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

but  we  would  want  to  do  that.  I  think  there  are  better  ways  than
trying  to  look  at  that,  and  let  us  find  those  solutions  because  I
don’t  want  anybody  sitting  in  jail  who  is  not  guilty  and  I  want  to
know the truth as a physician.

So I have other questions I will submit for you all to answer and

I appreciate you all’s time and I thank the Chair.

Chair WU. Thank you, Mr. Broun. I am sure that we will be able
to get back to you on a second round of questions if you would like,
and  I  would  like  to  thank  the  gentleman  from  Georgia  for  giving
me the opportunity to pull out my hip pocket copy of the Constitu-
tion.  The  argument  is  typically  that  article  1,  section  8  provides
various authorities. There is a specific authorizing provision in the
Constitution for NIST to provide a system of weights and measures
for the country but I just want to point out, because this issue has
come  up  in  my  Congressional  district  repeatedly,  usually  with  re-
spect to Social Security or Medicare about Constitutional authority.
I just want to point out that there doesn’t appear to be textual ref-
erence  to  NASA  or  to  the  Air  Force  in  the  Constitution  either  but
we  have  seen  fit  to  stretch  it  in  each  instance,  and  this  is  not  to
engage the gentleman in Constitutional debate at this point but we
perhaps could continue the conversation over lunch sometime.

Mr. BROUN. If the Chair would yield a moment?
Chair WU. I would be happy to yield.
Mr.  BROUN.  I  would  love  to  have  that  opportunity  to  have  lunch
with  you  and  discuss  that,  but  from  my  perspective,  we  are  oper-
ating governmentally in the Congress, pretty much throughout the
Congress  as  well  as  in  the  federal  court  system  as  well  as  in  the
Administration  on  a  perverted  idea  of  what  the  Constitution  is  all
about,  and  I  believe  in  the  original  intent  of  the  Constitution.  Na-
tional  defense  is  Constitutional  so  therefore  the  Air  Force  and
NASA  and  some  of  those  other  things  that  were  not  specifically
mentioned  fall  within  the  aegis  of  national  security  and  national
defense. NIST certainly is one of those things that I agree we need
to have the national standards, and that is the reason I would like
to  see  NIST  take  over  some  of  these  things  to  make  sure  that  the
science is correct, but here in this committee, throughout Congress,
we  hear  people  talk  about  the  climate  change  and  global  warming
that is absolutely certain manmade and there are many, many sci-
entists  across  the  world  who  say  that  is  absolutely  not  true  and
there  are  scientists  who  look  at  all  things,  in  my  medicine,  my
field,  and  others,  and  there  is  always  debate,  and  that  debate  is
good  in  the  scientific  community  because  that  is  what  peer  review
is  all  about,  and  I  think  it  would  be  critical  for  us  to  continue  in
forensic  science  back  to  this  issue  so  that  we  have  that  independ-
ence and have many entities looking at these various things wheth-
er  it  is  DNA  testing  or  bite  marks  or  other  entities  so  that  we  get
the truth and continue to seek that truth. Having one federal body
that is focused on this is I think counter to good scientific inquiry,
and  besides  being  un-Constitutional  in  my  opinion.  So  let  us  have
lunch and we will talk about that further. Thank you.

Chair WU. I thank the gentleman.
Mr. BROUN. I thank the Chair.
Chair WU. Reclaiming my time. While the gentleman from Geor-
gia  and  I  may  have  slightly  different  Constitutional  interpreta-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

tions,  I  think  we  share  a  concern  about  whether  the  creation  of  a
new  agency  at  this  point  in  time  is  the  appropriate  response,  and
I  would  like  to  get  to  that  after  we  return  to  mining  the  subject
of  the  core  concern  about  is  there  sufficient  science,  where  is  the
science behind forensic science, what difference does it make. I am
still  trying  to  understand  the  core  concern  here,  and  forgive  me  if
I am a little bit slow, but it appears to me that with DNA evidence
we  had  a  body  of  science  that  was  developed  independently  of  any
forensic  application  and  then  a  forensic  application  was  found  and
eventually  solidified,  but  DNA  is  something  that  we  have  been
working  on  since  the  1950s,  maybe  even  a  little  bit  before,  but
there is an independent body of work. What Mr. Hicks seems to in-
dicate is that a lot of the methodology developed in forensics stems
from investigative work and is experiential and a body of work that
developed  over  time  and  pieces  of  it  have  been—pieces  of  it  are
supported by research, other pieces remain perhaps more experien-
tial.  Am  I  beginning  to  understand  the  picture  here,  Mr.  Hicks?
Would you care to expand on that?

Mr.  HICKS.  Yes,  I  think  you  have  hit  it  right  on  the  head.  That
is exactly right. And as Peter mentioned earlier, I don’t know what
the  response  was  when  they  invited  those  practitioners  in  those
fields to come forward with information. I suspect that they didn’t.
I suspect part of it may have been an issue of trust and a question
about  where  is  this  going,  who  are  we  giving  it  to,  and  knowing
that  they  operate  in  a  very  adversarial  environment  of  the  court-
room  all  the  time.  But  the  other  is  that  it  may  just  not  have  been
in  sort  of  the  more  formal  scientific  forum  as  well.  And  that  is
where again I think if people who are trained and have the experi-
ence in that type of activity, if that could be brought to bear on the
existing  information—and  there  will  be  gaps,  I  am  sure,  identified
and holes identified and——

Chair  WU.  Can  we  try  to  bear  down  on  the  issue  of  what  dif-
ference  would  it  make?  Now,  Mr.  Neufeld  gave  a  very  graphic  ex-
ample  of  200  innocent  individuals  exonerated  by  DNA,  let  us  say,
who were convicted, subsequently exonerated, and out of those 200
perhaps 100 perpetrators who were, if you will, loose on the streets
because of the wrongful incarceration of the 200, that 100 real per-
petrators, if you will, were loose longer. I mean, that is one graphic
example of a difference that it would make. There seems to be dif-
ferent  levels  of  challenge  as  to  different  testing  methods  whether
it is ballistics or bite marks or hair or paint chip analysis. Can the
panel  further  address  for  me  examples  of  what  difference  it  might
or  might  not  make  to  the  judicial  process  if  we  were  to  apply
science  more  broadly  to  what  has  historically  been  a  collection  of
experiential data points?

Ms.  HENDERSON.  Mr.  Chair,  if  I  could  respond.  One  thing,  and
I  think  Peter  pointed  this  out  also,  we  have  to  remember  in  the
criminal  justice  system  only  two  to  four  percent  of  the  cases  ever
go to trial, so we want to make sure that—so we are not really able
to cross-examine and challenge many of these issues because things
are pled out, there are all kinds of other things that go on. I would
say  because  we  have  such  a  diverse  area  in  forensic  science,  like
Dr.  Downs,  pathology  is  not  really—I  don’t  think  there  are  really
challenges  to  that  as  much  although  there  are  some,  like  shaken

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

baby syndrome, and things like this come up as theoretical debates
and also are challenged in court. But then we have the pattern evi-
dence area and I think that is really when we look at the NAS re-
port,  they  are  looking  at  what  we  call  pattern  evidence.  We  are
looking  at  fingerprints,  we  are  looking  at  bite  marks,  we  are  look-
ing—see,  paint  and  things  like  that,  we  have  chemistry.  I  mean,
that—again,  there  is  not  as  many,  I  think,  attacks  on  toxicology,
on chemistry, drug chemistry. I mean, there are always new meth-
odologies that are developed.

Chair  WU.  Are  most  of  the  problems  focused  in  these  pattern

areas where we seem to have, if you will, a statistical problem?

Ms. HENDERSON. And you can’t—I would say one thing, that they
have  not—you  can’t  really  have  statistics  in  some  of  these  areas.
There  are  actually  in  tool  marks,  for  example—I  will  give  you  an
example. Somebody comes to pry open, you know, your sliding door
and  then  they  have  someone  come  from  the  crime  scene  to  say,
here,  we  know  that  this  is  the  pry  bar  that  we  just  found  in  this
person’s  car  to  pry  open  that  door.  There  is  a  debate  whether  you
count  striation  marks.  I  mean,  there  are  two  theories  of  this.  One
group says we don’t need to do that. The other people say—so with-
in—and  again,  that  is  like  science.  You  are  always  debating  in
science, coming up with new methodologies. So there are actually—
and  like  Pete  pointed  out  with  the  knife  patterns,  that  is  another
one.  They  have  all  kinds  of  pattern  evidence  with  tool  marks  but
it  is  highly  debated.  So  I  think  I  saw,  at  least  when  I  read  the
whole  report,  the  more  the  challenges  are  in  the  area  of  what  I
would  call  pattern  recognition  forensic  science,  but  not  in  some  of
what I would say forensic pathology, toxicology, drug chemistry and
areas  like  that,  and  I  don’t  think  that  is  really  where  the  con-
centration was in the report.

Chair WU. Help me understand that. Where there are things like
toxicology  reports  and  chemical  analysis  of  paint  chips,  do  you  all
agree  that  those  are  more  settled  procedures  and  less  doubt  about
them? Mr. Neufeld.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  I  agree  with  your  original  comment  that  the  big-
gest problems occur in those so-called matching disciplines, pattern
disciplines,  but  there  are  other  types  of  problems  in  the  way  that
they are actually implemented in the criminal justice system which
you should be made aware of, which are in the NAS report. For in-
stance,  since  most  cases  don’t  involve  DNA,  we  all  agree  on  that,
and  we  all  agree  that  most  cases  don’t  go  to  trial.  Most  cases  are
either dismissed or resolved by a plea of guilty and so therefore in
most  cases  the  people  who  are  the  principles,  the  lawyers  and  the
defendant  and  the  victim,  are  looking  at  a  lab  report,  a  piece  of
paper, and there are no national standards on what goes into a lab
report. And one of the things that the NAS report calls for is there
needs  to  be  national  standards  so  whoever  reports  the  report  can
figure out what happened.

Chair  WU.  So  even  where  there  is,  if  you  will,  more  science  as
in  chemistry,  there  are  certifications  issues  about  the  accuracy  of
the  lab  tests.  There  are  issues  about  procedure.  There  are  issues
about the format and the content of various reports.

Mr. NEUFELD. That is correct. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

Chair WU. And nobody disagrees with that. But is there still con-
sensus that there is a much bigger problem in the pattern recogni-
tion fields like ballistics, bite marks, fingerprints? Dr. Downs.

Dr.  DOWNS.  I  think  what  we  are  looking  at  is  a  couple  of  issues
that  overlap.  One  is  the  fundamental  scientific  testing,  the  repro-
ducible  number,  and  I  am  going  to  probably  get  my  good  friend,
Mr.  Neufeld,  upset,  but  he  refers  to  ‘‘DNA  exonerations.’’  To  my
knowledge, DNA has never exonerated anyone. It has been used for
that purpose but it is only a test result, and we have to place that
test  result  into  context.  DNA  has  never  convicted  anyone.  It  has
been used and interpreted for that purpose but what we are talking
about is the metric of actually performing a scientific test.

The  accreditation  and  certification  goes  to  the  scientist  practi-
tioner—that they are actually qualified to interpret that test result
and put it into the context. So I think that part of the report, that
you need to have both of those together simultaneously because the
reports  need  to  be  understood.  They  need  to  be  understandable.
Someone  needs  to  be  able  to  read  my  report  and  understand  why
I made a determination.

Chair  WU.  Well,  Dr.  Downs,  I  think  that  we  are  in  agreement
that if there is a sound methodology, one still has to have a sound
practitioner and have standards for the form of the report and the
content of the report.

Dr. DOWNS. Yes, sir.
Chair WU. So we are in agreement on that, and there is a certifi-
cation  issue  here  and  a  standard-setting  set  of  issues.  I  am  trying
to get back to, are there core issues with some of these technologies
that  we  use  that  have  a  deep  history  but  perhaps  have  not  been
analyzed in ways that we would consider supported by lab science?
Ms. Henderson?

Ms.  HENDERSON.  Yes.  Actually  this  brings  up  another  issue

which I wanted to touch on is education.
Chair WU. Can we finish this one first?
Ms.  HENDERSON.  Yes.  Well,  that  is  what  I  am  getting  at.  I  am
going  in  a  circular  fashion  right  now.  No,  actually  it  is  education
because  lawyers  for  a  long  time—these  things  weren’t  challenged
because  lawyers  did  not  have  science  backgrounds.  Only  5.3  per-
cent  of  law  students  have  any  education  in  physical  sciences.  So
now  that  people  are  getting,  I  would  say,  up  to  speed  in  whether
it is computer science or something else, now there are many more
challenges  that  are  being  made,  and  for  a  long  time  fingerprints
were never challenged, tool marks were never challenged. It was a
given  that  this  is  good  science.  But  then  when  people  started  ask-
ing well, where is the rigor, where is—and there is the very famous
case  that  took  place  in  Philadelphia  with  fingerprints.  It  was  the
first  time  that  somebody  in  federal  court  challenged  a  fingerprint,
and  this  was  in  a  bank  robbery  case,  and  all  of  a  sudden  people
said well, where is the data, we don’t have anything that supports
that  the  fingerprint  evidence  is  really  valid.  So  I  think  that  is
where we are looking, and these are many cases. I mean, if you go
to  my  website,  NCSTL.org,  we  have  cataloged  all  these  types  of
cases  that  say  here  is  where  the  challenges  are  and  that  is  again,
I  think—really  what  we  are  seeing  is  the  challenges  are  being
made  in  things  that,  as  John  said,  developed  through  law  enforce-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

ment but then didn’t have the rigor until the attorneys started get-
ting  educated,  and  they  are  still  not  that  well  educated,  I  have  to
say,  in  most  science,  other  than  Peter  Neufeld,  of  course.  But,  you
know,  that  is  one  of  the  things,  and  he  has  been  doing  this  for
years,  but  other  people  are  not  being  trained  in  that  particular
area. So I think the rigor needs to be imposed in many of, I would
say, traditionally accepted pattern evidence areas and that is what
the report says.

Chair WU. Thank you, Ms. Henderson.
Mr.  Hicks,  you  headed  up  the  FBI  crime  lab.  Have  we  just  been
taking on faith these fingerprint matches, these bite mark matches,
and  if  you  drill  down  to  really  focus  on:  is  there  evidence  that  a
match  is  a  match,  do  we  have  problems  when  we  actually  drill
down and start asking those questions?

Mr. HICKS. Well, of course, I am not an expert in all those areas,
you know, to that extent, but it is experientially based and I think
if  you  were  to  speak  with  someone  who  has  worked  in  that  field
for some period of time, they have confidence that they are able to
distinguish patterns. But again, there are so many uncertainties in
an  actual  forensic  evidence  case,  for  example,  fingerprints.  You
may not have a full, clear image. You may——

Chair WU. But, I mean, a full fingerprint is a full fingerprint, but
the  problem  is  you  are  frequently  working  with  something  a  lot
less than that.

Mr. HICKS. What you are faced with, right. And so that is where
the—as  Pete  mentioned  earlier,  about  the  quality  assurance  prac-
tices where you do want to be sure that you have some level of re-
dundancy in your analytical system. You have a confirmation proc-
ess maybe where somebody else looks at it and verifies, at the very
least  reviews,  the  work  done  to  agree  that  they  come  to  the  same
opinion. And can errors happen? I think they can as has been dem-
onstrated  and  undoubtedly  will  in  the  future.  Errors  even  happen
in  medicine  with  all  the  rigor  that  is  behind  that.  So  I  think  that
is  where  the  quality  control  process  and  the  accreditation  process
of  course  supports  that  to  be  sure  that  you  have  systems  in  place
that  help  to  detect  when  things  go  wrong  or  inconsistent,  you
know, with what the sort of established community standards.

I  think  if  you  were  to  go—I  mentioned  scientific  working  groups
earlier. I think if you go to the FBI website, for example, and then
look at some of their publications, Crime Laboratory Digest, for ex-
ample, is one of those publications, and you will find on there list-
ings  of  recommended  guidelines  for  fiber  identification,  for  exam-
ple,  fiber  matching,  and  it  will  go  to  the  level  of  what  should  be
included  in  the  report.  It  will  talk  about  the  kinds  of  tests  which
should  be  at  least  considered  and  applied,  although  not  all  tests
would apply in all circumstances, but at least it defines which tests
will  provide  certain  elements  of  information  that  might  help  to  re-
solve whatever question it is they have been put to.

Chair  WU.  Mr.  Hicks,  in  those  fields  where  the  FBI  does  have
guidelines,  in  your  professional  experience,  what  percentage  of
tests  submitted  in  those  fields  where  there  are  guidelines  do  you
think actually meet those guidelines?

Mr. HICKS. I am reluctant to even hazard a guess. I don’t know.
It  has  been—first,  with  the  FBI,  it  has  been  a  long  time  since  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

have  been  there.  Much  has  changed  in  the  last  10  or  15  years  at
the  FBI  as  in  all  laboratories—the  entire  community,  in  part  be-
cause of the DNA experience.

Chair WU. Yes, this is why we are spending a bit of time on this
because frequently when you focus down on an area, as a legislator
I  don’t  get  to  do  that  nearly  as  often  as  I  want  to,  what  is  there
is not what one fully expects and many of us strive for original in-
tent  or  for  truth  but  it  is  a  little  bit  slipperier  than  being  able  to
get it on the first pass. I guess even though I didn’t—I don’t think
I  have  ever  seen  the  TV  show.  I  perhaps  fell  in  the  same  trap  of
assuming that because folks said it was so, it must be so, and I am
beginning to wonder if it ain’t so and whether we should be asking
that question more consistently.

Mr.  HICKS.  Well,  I  think,  again,  it  is  a  question  of  being  in  the
forum  that  is  expected,  and  that  is  again  why  I  keep  getting  back
to NIST. I mean, they have the competencies to help make that as-
sessment, to look at that kind of information and working with the
laboratories  and  the  scientific  working  groups  of  experts  in  those
individual  fields,  people  that  are  at  least  practitioners  in  the  field
to draw together what information is there and put it to that kind
of scrutiny, and I suspect that there will be many areas where they
can  find  that  there  are  some  gaps  that  need  to  be  filled.  Some
areas  might  just  be  simply  a  matter  of  conducting—refining  the
scope  of  the  study  and  performing  the  study  in  a  slightly  different
way to get to the very specific questions being asked.

Chair WU. Well, I want to get to the other Members for another
round,  and  I  will  continue  this,  but  I  just  want  to  comment  that
it  disturbed  me  greatly  when  I  made  the  transition  from  a  science
background to law school and then it took me a while to figure out
how the paradigm had shifted because in science you kind of work
at something and you have competing hypotheses. Until you collect
the data you don’t draw a conclusion about which of the competing
hypotheses  one  should  proceed  upon.  With  law,  with  judicial  proc-
ess  or  the  legislative  process,  it  is  really  quite  different.  There  is
a deadline and there is a deadline for decision. There is procedural
fairness  but  one  has  to  reach  a  decision  by  the  deadline  and  you
make the best choice you can under the procedural rules and then
you  live  with  that  decision  until  something  else  comes  back  and
you  reverse  it.  It  was  very  unsettling  to  come  to  that  conclusion.
I am still not sure that I am fully comfortable with it but I am not
sure  that  there  is  any  way  to  proceed  in  our  society  without  those
deadlines. I am still going to come back to this topic before getting
to  a  few  crass  administrative  things  like  cost  and  transitional
issues.

Mr. Smith, you have been very patient. Thank you.
Mr. SMITH. Thank you. Actually I find this interesting and I ap-
preciate the expertise that you bring. That is, I think, why we have
these hearings and I am grateful for the opportunity to participate.
We  have  got  progress  of  science  and  we  have  got  a  criminal  jus-
tice  system.  Are  they  keeping  up  with  each  other?  I  mean,  Mr.
Neufeld, you cited over 200 cases and I certainly commend your or-
ganization  for  striving  for  a  better  way,  if  you  will.  If  we  used  to-
day’s system that is most often practiced, I mean each state would
probably  have  a  little  different  way  of  doing  things  but  if  we  ap-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

plied  today’s  practices  to  those  cases  over  the  last  several  years,  I
am not real certain with the timeline of all of those cases that you
mentioned,  but  have  we  made  progress?  How  are  we  doing,  say,
from the 40,000-foot level?

Mr.  NEUFELD.  You  have  made  progress  with  respect  to  those
cases  which  would  be  resolved  through  DNA  testing,  but  as—be-
cause  DNA  is  that  robust.  But  again,  as  everybody  on  this  panel
will  tell  you,  the  types  of  cases  which  lend  themselves  to  DNA  is
a  very  small  minority  of  what  goes  on  in  a  crime  laboratory  or
what  goes  on  in  the  broader  area  called  forensic  science.  Many  of
the  same  disciplines  that  gave  rise  to  the  wrongful  convictions  are
still  practiced  today  and  they  are  still  practiced  today  much  the
same way they were practiced five or ten or fifteen years ago. They
haven’t  changed,  and  that  is  one  of  the  reasons  why  there  is  con-
cern  for  a  new  initiative  because  others  before  have  failed  to  have
that  initiative  to  make  the  changes.  Okay.  People  knew,  for  in-
stance—and  I  am  not  going  to—John  Hicks  was  an  expert  in  hair
microscopy  which  the  Chair  asked  him  about,  that  is,  looking  at
hairs  under  a  microscope,  a  hair  from  a  crime  scene,  and  com-
paring with a hair or hairs from a suspect and seeing whether they
are  similar.  They  would  look  at,  you  know,  perhaps  a  dozen  or
more  variables,  and  I  will  defer  to  him  on  what  the  exact  number
is. But the problem is, they never had any empirical data as to how
common  or  rare  each  of  those  variables  were.  Nevertheless,  they
would  make  statements  in  courts  of  law  about  how  unusual  it  is
to  find  two  things  that  are  similar  or  common  without  any  data-
base, without any empirical data, and to a large extent the problem
with a lot of these so-called matching disciplines is they lack empir-
ical databases to allow people to create a statement about an asso-
ciation,  and  that  is  still  a  problem  today.  It  hasn’t  changed.  And
it  is  not  getting  any  better  in  the  courts  because  judges  don’t  deal
with  it  any  more  adequately  and  the  lawyers,  the  defense  lawyers
and  prosecutors,  don’t  deal  with  it  any  more  adequately  because  if
they  had  done  well  in  organic  chemistry  they  would  have  followed
Mr. Wu to medical school as opposed to me to law school. It is that
simple.

Chair WU. Mr. Hicks, do you want to respond?
Mr. SMITH. Go ahead.
Mr.  HICKS.  Well,  again,  with  hair  identification  you  are  looking
at  features  that  may  help  to  distinguish  one  person  from  another
but  always  in  the  reports  that  were  issued  there  was  a  disclaimer
more or less, a warning statement put in there, that this is not an
absolute means of identification, and so it should be viewed in that
light. There may have been circumstances where the hair had been
artificially  treated,  for  example,  repeatedly  where  it  would  add
some  level  of  uniqueness.  At  least  in  the  experience  of  the  exam-
iner  it  would  seem  to  be  something  that  they  had  rarely  observed
and that might be offered during the course of testimony there to—
but  I  am  not  aware  of  any  instance  where  there  was  testimony
given  in  a  hair  case,  maybe  Peter  knows  some,  but  some  instance
where it was given that this is an absolute match that nobody else
has.  It  was  always  considered—urged  that  it  be  considered  in  the
context  of  other  information.  And  so,  for  example,  in  some  cases,
it  might  have  been  a  fiber  case,  for  example,  if  you  find  a  blue

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

nylon  fiber  on  a  victim,  on  a  homicide  victim,  and  you  find  a  sus-
pect  that  has  a  blue  nylon  sweater.  That  may  be  some  association
but  of  course  there  are  many  sweaters  that  might  have  been  pro-
duced like that so that I think intuitively most people would recog-
nize  that  and  wouldn’t  have  difficulty  understanding  that  that  is
not an absolute association.

On  the  other  hand,  if  you  have  a  case  as  in  Georgia,  the  Wayne
Williams case some years ago, the Atlanta murders case, as it was
referred  to,  where  there  were  a  number  of  young  men  who  were
found  killed  and  there  were  many  different  fiber  types  that  were
found, 28 different fiber types, in fact, that were consistently found
on  the  homicide  victims  and  there  was  at  the  suspect  that  was
eventually  developed  sources  for  those  fiber  types  were  found  in
one  location.  Now,  was  it  an  absolute  identification?  I  don’t  think
so.  There  was  an  effort  to  try  to  develop  some  statistical  estimate
of  how  likely  it  might  be  that  type  of  circumstance  might  occur.
But  that  is  the  challenge  again.  In  forensics,  you  don’t  know  what
you  are  going  to  be  presented  with,  and  the  whole  idea  is  to  try
to  assess  and  reconstruct  what  you  are  observing  and  to  see  if  it
might help bear light on a particular investigation, particularly ei-
ther to corroborate or dispute eyewitness testimony that you might
have  or  other  facts  and  circumstances  that  you  have.  It  should  al-
ways  be  considered  in  the  context  of  the  whole  case,  and  I  think
that  is  what  you  had  gotten  to  earlier,  I  guess.  Of  course,  that  is
sort  of  the  legal  requirement  to  look  at  the  totality  of  things  and
assess  whether  or  not  you  can  come  and  make  your  best  decision
based on the information you have. In some respects, that is taking
place  to  some  extent  in  some  of  those  types  of  experiential  types
of practices in some forensic labs.

On the other hand, hair identification, the cases that Peter is re-
ferring  to  where  they  had  success  in  reversing  these  convictions,
those are convictions which occurred 15 or 20 years ago prior to the
advent of DNA technology typically. If you were looking at a foren-
sic  laboratory  today,  I  suspect  there  are  a  few  that  actually  end
with  the  microscopic  observation  of  features  of  the  hair.  Now  they
would typically use that only to identify hairs which might be good
candidates  for  DNA  analysis.  So  rather  than  analyze  20  different
hairs recovered in the debris from a crime scene, they will focus on
one or two that seem to be similar in appearance maybe to the hair
from  the  suspect  source  that  they  are  considering  but  then  they
would  isolate  those  hairs  that  looked  to  be  the  best  candidates  for
a  potential  DNA  match  and  then  pass  that  on  for  DNA  confirma-
tion.

Mr.  NEUFELD.  You  know  what?  Actually  it  proves  too  much  be-
cause  even  when  you  talk  about  a  combination  between  hair  and
mitochondrial DNA, you have the National Academy of Sciences ex-
plicitly reporting on page 5–26 of their report, but no studies have
been  performed,  referring  to  mitochondrial,  working  with  hair  mi-
croscopy  specifically  to  quantify  the  reliability  of  their  joint  use.
The  problem  is,  frankly  there  are  dozens  of  cases  that  we  have
where  people  were  wrongly  convicted  based  on  the  inappropriate
use  of  statistics  in  those  hair  microscopy  cases  and  sometimes  it
was  FBI  agents  themselves  who  actually  offered  these  statistics
completely  in  the  absence  of  any  empirical  database.  That  is  docu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

mented in transcripts. We can share them with the panel. It is not
at all controversial.

But  there  is  a  bigger  problem.  Even  if  you  don’t  do  as  we  did  in
the  case  which  I  submitted  to  the  panel,  say  giving  a  number  of
one  in  10,000,  even  if  you  say  that  something  is  more  likely  than
not  to  have  come  from  this  individual,  that  in  itself,  even  without
giving  a  number,  is  a  probabilistic  statement  and  you  can’t  give  a
probabilistic  statement  unless  you  have  some  empirical  data.  So  it
is not enough to say that we would have a disclaimer that we will
not  say  it  is  this  person  to  the  exclusion  of  the  rest  of  the  world,
but  when  you  give  any  statement  like  that,  it  most  likely  hairs  or
more  likely  than  not  hairs,  that  is  a  probabilistic  statement  and
you  can’t  make  those  kinds  of  statement  in  the  absence  of  a  sci-
entific empirical database, and they never had it.

Mr. SMITH. Ms. Henderson?
Ms.  HENDERSON.  Yes.  I  thought  Peter  might  cite  to  the—was  it
the  Williamson  case  that  was  in  Oklahoma,  I  believe,  or  Texas.
There  have  been  cases  where  they  have  said  something  was  a
match  with  hairs  and  fibers  and  they  said  you  cannot  do  that.  It
is  true,  as  John  says,  there  are  some,  you  know,  evaluations,  im-
provements  now  with  hair  and  fiber  evidence,  but  a  lot  of  labora-
tories  have  done  away  with  microscopy.  They  just  said  we  don’t
want  to  do  this  anymore,  instead  we  are  going  to  see  if  we  can  do
mitochondrial DNA testing, we will do that on the hairs but we are
not  going  to  go  ahead  and  just  say  it  is  microscopically  similar  be-
cause there is not the data.

Now,  one  thing  I  wanted  to  point  out  though,  when  you  asked
before  about  whether—how  reliable  certain  areas  were,  there  was
a  publication  in  the  Journal  of  Forensic  Sciences  on  proficiency
testing. They went back to 1978 and looked at—Joe Peterson is the
author  of  this  particular  article  and  he  has  done  an  update.  He
started  in  1978  and  looked  at  proficiency  testing  in  every  area  of
forensic  science  and  their  reliability,  and  I  have  to  say  hair  and
fiber  was  one  of  them.  You  might  as  well  as  have  flipped  a  coin.
In  fifty  percent  of  the  cases  they  made  misidentifications  and  so
that is I think something that—and I can provide that to the Com-
mittee if they would like to look at this particular study.

Chair WU. Ms. Henderson, can you explain that to me a little bit

further? I don’t know what you mean by proficiency testing.

Ms. HENDERSON. Okay.
Chair WU. And when you say 50 percent is misidentified, tell me

what this means.

Ms.  HENDERSON.  Okay.  Pete  can  probably  talk  more  about  pro-

ficiency testing because he does this in the laboratory.

Mr. MARONE. Sure.
Ms. HENDERSON. Go ahead, Pete.
Mr.  MARONE.  Proficiency  testing  is  a  quality  assurance  method,
if you will, that is designed to test, ascertain the competency of the
individual examiner. Each drug chemist every year, accredited lab-
oratories must go through a proficiency testing program. For exam-
ple, every drug chemist is given an unknown. They have to identify
what it is. That could either be from an external source or an inter-
nal  source  but  they  don’t  know  what  the  outcome  is.  And  it  is  the
same thing for trace evidence, for DNA folks. They will get a stain,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

identify the stain, tell us what the profile is, is there semen present
or  whatever.  And  so  what  it  literally  is,  it  is  a  test  of  the  com-
petency of both the individual and the operating process within the
laboratory.  DNA  requires  two  a  year.  Everybody  else  gets  one  a
year  in  every  discipline.  Part  of  the  proficiency  testing  process  is
to  ascertain  why  you  got  the  wrong  answer,  whatever  that  might
be.  In  a  lot  of  instances  it  is  something  minor  that  you  can  fix.  If
it  is  an  instance  where  you  find  out  the  person  really  has  issues,
that  individual  is  taken  off  of  work  until  the  problem  is  fixed,  and
at  that  same  time  you  go  back  and  look  at  other  work  that  that
person has done prior to that proficiency test to see if those issues
are——

Chair WU. Actually I misunderstood you. When you were talking
about  proficiency  testing  and  then  said  50  percent  of  test  results
were incorrect, I thought the implication was that 50 percent of the
results submitted as evidence were incorrect.

Ms. HENDERSON. No, this is looking at proficiency testing within
the laboratory, not necessarily that they made it to the courtroom,
if  I  wanted  to—and  again,  it  was  in  certain  areas.  Now,  again,
when  they  started  in  1978  and  looked  at  this  and  moved  forward,
we  have  put  in  place,  I  have  to  say  in  the  forensic  community,  a
lot more proficiency tests than were ever done before. We also have
put  into  place  of  course  ASCLAD/LAB  [American  Society  of  Crime
Laboratory  Directors—Laboratory  Accreditation  Board]  accredita-
tion,  which  then  requires  these  proficiency  tests.  Before  many  lab-
oratories  did  not  have  these  requirements,  and  I  know  Peter
Neufeld  will  probably  chime  in  on  this  at  some  point.  But  that  is
one  of  the  things  that  have  been  improved.  I  have  to  say,  things
have  improved  over  the  years,  although  I  can  say  it  is  human  na-
ture.  It  is  not  perfect.  I  mean,  these  are  human  beings  doing  lab-
oratory tests. But what they are trying to do—and that is why they
have  quality  assurance  groups  that  go  out  to  the  laboratories  and
identify  if  there  are  weaknesses  perhaps  in  the  system,  and  that
is  the  other  thing  that  they  are  trying  to  work  through  and  that
is something to encourage, I believe with more funding as well.

Chair WU. Here is an analogy from a different field. Ms. Hender-
son,  what  you  are  saying  is  that  this  is  like  having  sanitary  tests
for  restaurants  and  the  restaurants  fail  50  percent  of  the  tests  or
inspections  but  that  is  not  to  say  that  50  percent  of  the  customers
are necessarily eating unsanitary food?

Ms.  HENDERSON.  I  don’t  know  if  I  would  say  it  that  way.  I  have
to  say,  with  all  due  respect,  I  think  that  is  putting  words  in  my
mouth. I don’t think that is really—what I am saying is, in certain
areas reflected in the work by Dr. Peterson, he found that over the
years,  and  he  looked  at  20  or  more  years  of  proficiency  tests,  that
in certain areas, I won’t say all areas of forensic science, but in cer-
tain  areas  of  forensic  science  people  failed  proficiency  tests,  right,
and  that  was  in—the  hair  and  fiber  was  one  of  the  most,  I  would
say, telling areas of the proficiency test failures.

Chair WU. I am sorry, Ms. Henderson. You all are experts. That
is  why  you  are  here.  We  are  not.  That  is  why  we  are  here.  And
I  am  just  trying  to  understand  the  policy  implications  of  what  you
all are trying to tell us.

Ms. HENDERSON. Okay. I think Peter can address that.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

Mr.  NEUFELD.  Mr.  Wu,  there  is  a  fundamental  disconnect,  and
the  fundamental  disconnect  is  that  the  reason  you  use  proficiency
tests  is  there  is  no  way  to  know.  When  you  are  looking  at  a  piece
of  crime  scene  evidence  and  you  match  it  to  me,  did  you  get  the
right  answer  or  the  wrong  answer,  if  you  will,  because  you  don’t
have  a  control.  It  is  an  unknown.  And  so  proficiency  tests  are  a
substitute  for  that.  Is  that  clear  kind  of?  That  is  the  fundamental
difference. So for instance, when you——

Chair WU. That is clear. It is somewhat troubling but it is clear.
Mr.  NEUFELD.  Well,  it  is  very  troubling  and  so  one  of  the  things

that you would want from a national——

Chair WU. Mr. Hicks does not agree.
Mr. NEUFELD. One of the things you would want from a National
Institute  of  Forensic  Science,  for  instance,  would  be  to  come  up
with  a  program  of  proficiency  testing  because  there  are  four  types
of  proficiency  testing.  There  are  external,  there  are  internal,  there
are  open,  and  there  are  blind.  So  a  lot  of  the  proficiency  testing
that is done, for instance, is the kind where the individual analyst
knows it is a proficiency test and may or may not treat it the same
way that he or she would actual casework. So what you would like
to  do  ideally  is  to  make  the  proficiency  test  more  challenging  and
more  robust  and  be  able  to  sort  of  move  it  into  the  lab  system  so
the  proficiency  test  looks  no  different  than  an  actual  case.  So  you
get the laboratory and the personnel to treat it the same way they
would  a  regular  case.  It  is  expensive  to  do  that.  I  think  we  all
agree  with  that.  But  hopefully  if  you  had  this  NIFS,  okay,  they
could create national standards, they could create, if you will, a na-
tional proficiency test so the expense would not be on every labora-
tory and that kind of robust proficiency testing could happen more
consistently  throughout  the  country.  The  reason  you  want  to  do
it—one of the problems we had, for instance, you know, in some of
these  other  disciplines  is  you  can  assume  that  you  have  got  the
right person, but you don’t have the same kind of scientific control
that you have with the proficiency test to tell you for sure that you
have the right person.

Mr. SMITH. Full circle. Back to the creation of a new agency per-
haps.  Do  we  not  have  enough  of  a  grasp  of  where  we  need  to  go
within  the  current  agency  framework,  NIST  or  however  we  might
proceed without creating yet another new agency that I think could
end  up  being  a  bit  of  a  distraction  with  the  administrative  parts
of it rather than ramping up with current agency framework.

Ms. HENDERSON. I would like to go back to my immediate action
first.  I  think  let  us  take  existing  resources.  And  we  do  have—I
want to mention, we do have ASCLAD/LAB, which is the American
Society  of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors  Laboratory  Accreditation
Board,  which  also  has  testing  methods.  NIST  has  testing  methods
in place already and I think then we do the interim action. So first
let us start with what we have in existence. We don’t throw out the
baby  with  the  bathwater,  to  use  a  hackneyed  phrase  here,  but  go
ahead and say what do we have, and we have to corral the existing
resources and I think Ms. Edwards, when she said let us see what
is  out  there,  we  need  to  see  what  is  existing  in  terms  of  funding,
then let us see what federal resources we already have in terms of
testing  and  things  like  that.  Then  we  go  to  the  interim  action,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

which would be to evaluate strategic policy decisions and strategies
because  we  need  to  say  what  do  we  have  here  right  now,  and  I
think probably us in the forensic community would be able to prob-
ably pull all these things together and see what is out there. Then
do  the  interim  action.  Then  we  go  to  the  long-term  action.  I  think
it  has  to  be  a  three-step  plan.  I  think  that  is  a  much  better  way
to exercise this particularly and looking at policy and strategies.

Mr. SMITH. Thank you.
Chair WU. Thank you, Mr. Smith.
I ask the forbearance of the witnesses in repeatedly asking these
questions  related  to  the  role  of  science  and  forensics  and  why  it
makes  a  difference.  I  think  this  is  a  topic  to  which  we  will  return
at  some  future  date.  I  just  want  to  say  in  my  own  defense  or  ad-
mission  of  guilt  that  I  have  been  asking  why  does  nanotechnology
matter  for  the  last  ten  years  because  people  don’t  seem  to  have
good  explanations  about  why  it  should  be  important  just  because
it  is  small.  And  I  have  come  to  the  conclusion  that  it  is  important
and  it  is  worth  supporting.  I  have  come  to  the  conclusion  that  we
are on to something here and that it deserves more focus, but I still
quite  frankly  do  not—I  am  still  trying  to  understand  the  role  that
scientific rigor can play in being brought to bear on what has been
an  experiential  field  for  the  most  part.  Mr.  Neufeld  has  provided
some  graphic  examples  based  on  DNA  and  I  am  trying  to  under-
stand how it might affect the rest of what we do, whether it is con-
viction  rates  going  up  or  going  down,  and  our  certainty  about  pro-
viding a sound service. I think that Mr. Smith has asked some good
questions  about  what  would  happen  in  the  organizational  interim
in  trying  to  organize  a  new  agency  if  that  were  the  path  we  were
to choose.

I  want  to  focus  on  that  a  little  bit,  but  first  I  start  with  Mr.
Marone,  and  Mr.  Marone,  you  said  that  resources  are  a  real  prob-
lem,  but  when  asked  specifically  about  how  much  more  in  re-
sources,  you  begged  off  on  the  question,  and  I  want  to  press  you
a little bit on that because it is easy to come here and say we need
more,  and  we  are  in  the  line-drawing  business  about  how  much
more,  so  if  you  are  going  to  ask  for  more,  I  am  going  to  have  to
ask you how much more.

Mr. MARONE. Well, I didn’t beg off from the answer of what kind
of  resources,  how  much  resources.  I  begged  off  the  question  as  to
how  much  it  is  going  to  cost,  which  are  two  different  things,  one
could  argue.  But  for  example,  if  you  want  to  look  at  resources——
Chair WU. We deal with dollar funding here, so if you could help

us with that metric?

Mr.  MARONE.  Well,  I  can  tell  you  things  that  it  is  going  to  take.
For example, we need more people. How many people? We have to
assess that and find out where we are. But where does that begin?
We need a better entry source for our examiners. One of the things
that  we  are  looking  at  is  the  forensic  science  applicant  pool.  Who
do  we  want  them  to  be?  Do  we  want  them  to  be  hard  science  or
would  we  like  them  to  be  more  science  based  and  not  requiring  a
baccalaureate degree as in many instances now with fingerprint ex-
aminers,  firearms  examiners  and  so  forth.  So  we  need  to  start  at
that  level  just  like  Dr.  Downs  needs  to  start  with—if  you  need
more  people,  you  need  to  educate  more  people,  you  need  to  train

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

them  for  pathology.  You  know,  there  are  reasons  why  people  go
into other fields. We have got to make it more meaningful to them,
more  palatable  to  them  to  go  into  the  forensic  science  field,  to  go
into  public  service.  Forensic  science  has  no  scholarship  program,
for  example,  like  in  graduate  school  they  get  a  free  ride  to  go  get
a  Ph.D.  Okay.  There  is  no  such  thing  even  at  a  Master’s  level  in
forensic  science.  We  need  that  to  get  the  qualified  higher-caliber
students interested in forensic science. That is going to——

Chair WU. Mr. Marone, what I think we need from you to make
a  case  for  this  are  the  measurable  inputs  that  you  need.  The  fac-
tors  that  you  are  mentioning  are  all  important  policy  concerns  but
ultimately I think, you know, we have to decide what are we going
to  put  into  this,  what  are  the  dollars  and  cents,  what  are  the  un-
dergraduate  or  graduate  programs,  what  are  the  certification  pro-
grams,  what  are  the  standards  that  need  to  be  developed,  and  I
hate  to  be  so  pedestrian  about  this  but  I  think  that  is  what  we
need for action going forward. And I would like to ask you for help
with  that  if  we  are  going  to  take  meaningful  action  in  this  field.
Mr.  MARONE.  I  fully  understand.  That  is  one  of  the  things  that

as a community we have to be able to provide to you is——

Chair WU. Yes, I am asking you to provide it, and if you are say-
ing  you  can’t  provide  it  today,  I  am  saying  we  need  to  have  that
before  we  can  take  meaningful  action.  At  least  I  think  we  need  to
have that before we can responsibly take meaningful action.

Mr.  MARONE.  I  defer  to  anybody  else  on  the  panel  because  I
know  among  us  we  have  hammered  this  thing  around  a  lot  and  I
don’t know that we have come up with any definitive answer.

Dr.  DOWNS.  I  may  be  able  to  give  at  least  a  partial  answer  re-
gards  medical  examiners.  Recommendation  number  11  specifically
referred to the medical examiner community replacing lay coroners
with physicians, board-certified medical examiners.

Chair  WU.  And  Dr.  Downs,  I  wanted  to  ask  you  about  that  be-
cause in your written testimony you do make that recommendation,
and  if  you  look  at  the  graduation  rate  for  board-certified  forensic
pathologists,  which  is  also  in  your  written  testimony,  there  is  just
no  way  that  we  can  get  to  having  the  qualified  pathologists  that
you want with the graduation rate that we have.

Dr.  DOWNS.  Agreed.  It  is  staggering.  We  go  through  extensive
training, as you know. Then we go into the subspecialty of forensic
pathology,  which  I  did  in  order  to  cut  my  salary  in  half.  No  one
spoke  to  my  wisdom  in  doing  that,  but  the  reality  is,  we  go  into
forensic pathology for a different reason than perhaps other people
go  into  medicine.  It  is  a  public  service,  and  the  number  of  people
we  need—we  graduate  37  residents  in  forensic  pathology  a  year,
37.  We  have  400  medical  examiners  actively  practicing  full  time.
We  need  an  estimated  800.  The  cost  per  citizen,  somewhere  be-
tween $3 and $5 a head. So you can multiply that out. I get rough-
ly  $1  billion  to  $2  billion  just  to  have  an  operating  system.  That
doesn’t  get  into  the  infrastructure  of  how  many  offices  need  to  be
replaced and quite honestly need to be up to code for CDC [Centers
for Disease Control], safety and performance of an autopsy.

Chair WU. That is the medical examiner side of things, the med-

ical examiner/coroner side of things?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

Dr.  DOWNS.  Right,  and  if  we  actually  were  to  do  away  with  the
1,000-year-old  office  of  the  coroner,  there  are  3,000  counties  out
there  and  a  fair  number  of  them  are  served  by  coroners,  and  I
would  imagine  that  the  counties  would  have  something  to  say
about that issue. In some places——

Chair WU. Well, Dr. Downs, when an institution has survived for
1,000 years, there is usually a reason, and the paperless office has
been predicted for a long time but papyrus has been with us a long
time. There is a lot of paper up here.

Dr. DOWNS. Yes, sir.
Chair WU. So I think I get the drift of where you want to go and
we  ought  to  push  in  that  direction  but  implementing  from  here  to
there is the challenge.

Dr.  DOWNS.  If  we  could  enhance  the  investigation,  the  abilities
of  the  coroner  to  do  their  job,  I  think  that  is  a  good  place  to  start.
We aren’t going to get rid of the office of the coroner anytime soon,
as  you  pointed  out,  sir,  and  I  think  if  we  can  professionalize  the
office, we are way ahead of the game.

Chair  WU.  Ms.  Henderson,  you  make  recommendations  about
substantially increasing research. Do we have the infrastructure in
place to do the amount of research that you are recommending?

Ms. HENDERSON. Well, we do have in many universities now, be-
cause,  of  course,  forensic  science  has  increased  attention  so  there
are different programs that are out there that have Ph.D. students
but  we  can  also  go  to  other  institutions.  I  think  there  is—and
again,  if  we  want  to  look  at  hard  science,  and  that  is  one  of  the
areas to go to, let us go to biology departments, we will go to chem-
istry, because all of these things can be worked, not just in a foren-
sic science program, but also in hard science programs. So I think,
particularly  if  there  is  money  to  do  research—I  know  this  because
I  live  on  grant  money  myself—that  people  will  then  come  and  do
the  research,  again  working,  I  think,  in  conjunction  with  existing
laboratories to know what are the needs or with the medical exam-
iner’s offices.

Chair  WU.  What  I  am  hearing  is  a  mixed  answer.  There  are  ex-
isting  laboratories,  State  laboratories,  private  laboratories,  federal
laboratories. There is a university research base and——

Ms.  HENDERSON.  And  they  are  not  always  talking  to  each  other.

That is one of the problems.

Chair WU. And what I don’t hear you saying is that the capacity

is there. I don’t hear you saying the capacity isn’t there.

Ms. HENDERSON. Well, of course, I know that—I think the capac-
ity  is  there.  Of  course,  people  will  say  we  need  to  have  the  dollars
to  fund  it  and  then  I  will  have  to  get  back  to  you  with  how  much
money we would need to fund those types of research programs. As
I told you, when I was president of the academy, one of the things
we saw was, there was a lack of research dollars within the Foren-
sic  Sciences  Foundation,  which  is  a  group  that  actually  spun  off,
if  I  can  say  it  that  way,  from  the  American  Academy  of  Forensic
Sciences. So now what we are doing is, with this $300,000 plus, we
are  giving  stipends  basically  to  graduate  students  in  these  accred-
ited  forensic  science  programs  so  that  they  can  do  research  and
they  can  go  present  the  research  in  peer-review  settings.  So  there

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

has  been  a  movement  in  that  particular  area.  So  I  think  we  are
making many efforts in that particular area.

Chair WU. Would it be constructive to have departments of foren-
sic  science  or  a  new  organization  at  the  federal  level  to  handle  fo-
rensic  science  when  this  is  a  very  important  applied  field  but  it
brings  together  so  many,  if  you  will,  different  stovepipe  sections  of
science, whether it is metallurgy, whether it is mechanics, whether
it  is  biology,  organic  chemistry  or  DNA  and  biochemistry.  Would
this be a meaningful add to try to create this field, if you will?

Ms. HENDERSON. Well, we actually have—I have to say, and this
is  where  I  receive  some  of  my  grant  money  from  is  the  National
Institute  of  Justice.  They  have  a  science  and  technology  section
that,  you  know,  gives  grants  to  people  to  do  research.  The  Bureau
of Justice Assistance also has money. So there are existing institu-
tions  that  do  provide  money  for  people  to  do  significant  research,
and of course NIST has been doing research over the years as well.
In  fact,  they  testified  before  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences
group,  so  I  think  that—I  don’t  know  that  creating  another  entity
is  always  a  good  idea.  I  don’t  know  whether  there  could  be  better
coordination  between  entities.  That  perhaps  might  work.  And  I
don’t  know  if  you,  you  know,  can  actually  twist  enough  arms  from
federal  agencies  in  order  to  all  work  together  as  a  collaborative
venture.

Chair WU. Well, it seems to me that this is a field that is tailor-
made  for  our  research  university  structure  where  there  are  dis-
ciplines  from  across  many  different  fields  and  you  really  need  to
tap and access those fields in order to do good work.

Ms. HENDERSON. I would not disagree with that.
Chair WU. Mr. Neufeld.
Mr.  NEUFELD.  I  would  just,  you  know,  echo  the  words  of  rec-
ommendation  number  three  of  the  NAS  report  which  calls  for  the
creation  of  a  competitively  funded  peer-reviewed  research  program
that  would  be  at  this  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Science.  They
point  out  through  the  two  years  of  hearings  they  had  that  there
was a terrible paucity of federal funds available for meaningful re-
search in the forensic sciences, and certainly what you would want
to have is some coordinator, or quarterback, who could decide what
the  priorities  are,  and  even  if  there  are  pools  of  money  at  DOD  or
Homeland  Security  or  other  places,  at  least  the  quarterback  could
decide  maybe  we  can  tap  into  some  of  those  other  pools  of  money
but  at  least  there  will  be  strategic  decisions  made  by  somebody,
and  there  are  no  strategic  decisions  being  made  now  by  anybody.
When  the  NAS  had  their  hearings,  somebody  testified  in  fact  from
NIJ,  who  was  in  charge  of  their  science  and  technology  program
there  and  felt  that  NIJ  was  a  poor  place  for  locating  this  research
undertaking because of their own internal perceived conflicts of in-
terest  as  representing  the  different  law  enforcement  agencies  that
NIJ currently represents. Moreover, there is a historical problem at
NIJ  of  almost  all  their  research  money  being  earmarked,  terribly
earmarked  for  not  just  a  discipline  but  earmarked  that  it  would
take place at a particular institution, which is the antithesis of the
way  that  the  National  Science  Foundation  works.  It  is  the  antith-
esis  of  the  way  the  National  Institute  of  Health  works.  One  of  the
things  that  the  reports  recommends,  for  instance,  is  the  NIH

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

should have a research budget to help forensic pathology so to help
people  who  are  medical  examiners  get  research  done  in  the  areas
that  are  breaking  into  new  territory.  They  don’t  even  have  that,
okay.  But  if  there  is  a  quarterback  somewhere  who  is  going  to  be
looking out for the interests of all these people in the forensic com-
munity,  then  they  can  push  the  NIH  to  get  some  of  that  money.
Then  they  can  push  Defense  or  other  agencies  that  have  pools  of
money to bring it to bear where it is needed.

Chair WU. Well, Ms. Henderson, thank you for sharing your per-
spective  on  Australia,  that  it  has  taken  them  20  years  of  work  on
this.  I  expect  that  as  we  go  down  this  road,  it  will  not  be  a  short
one no matter what path we choose to take.

Last pass. Mr. Hicks, you seem to have a different opinion about
whether a new independent agency or quarterback or anything else
is  needed  and  I  wanted  to  give  you  and  anybody  else  who  wants
to  take  the  other  side  a  moment  to  more  fully  explore  whether  to
do  that  or  not.  What  do  you  see  as  the  downside  of  proceeding
down that path?

Mr. HICKS. I think just from the practical aspects of implementa-
tion,  and  you  have  already  articulated,  I  think,  a  lot  of  the  con-
cerns  about  trying  to  establish  that  large  an  agency.  And  even  in
conducting research, I think it is important that this be community
driven  so  that  someone  in  an  academic  setting  who  is  not  familiar
with  the  ongoing  operations  of  a  laboratory  and  the  kinds  of  ques-
tions that they need to address, there needs to be some connection
there  so  that  they  have  a  sense  of  directing  research  that  is  appli-
cable  to  the  questions  to  be  answered.  And  as  has  already  been
mentioned,  again,  there  have  been  other  federal  initiatives  here  to
try  to  support  problems  and  needs  in  the  forensic  community  such
as  backlog  DNA  testing  and  overall  quality  laboratory  improve-
ment.  These  may  be  vehicles  that  can  continue  to  be  brought  to
bear to help improve laboratory services. It seems to me where the
big  gap  is,  as  I  have  said  repeatedly  here,  is  that  in  looking  at
some of those currently practiced forensic techniques as to whether
or  not  they  meet  the  scientific  rigor  and  scrutiny  that  will  help  to
assure confidence in the courts and that is where again I think you
could direct activity instead of sort of open-ended research but you
could direct activity into looking specifically at some of those areas,
and  it  is  a  question  of  where  does  the  competency  lie  to  try  to  ad-
dress  that  right  now.  Do  you  have  to  build  a  new  organization  to
do  that  or  are  there  competencies  now  that  might  be  brought  to
bear on that question.

Chair  WU.  Does  any  advocate  for  a  new  organization  want  to
take a minute to address that? You all are good? Okay. Very good.
Thank  you  all  very  much  for  being  here  today.  The  record  will  re-
main open for additional statements and for questions and answers
on  the  record  that  Members  of  the  Committee  may  ask  of  each  of
the  witnesses.  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  beginning  this  path  at
this committee level to explore what we can do to improve the state
of  forensic  science  in  America  and  look  forward  to  working  with
you all going forward.

Thank you very much, and the hearing is adjourned.
[Whereupon, at 12:17 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(81)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

Responses by Peter M. Marone, Director, Virginia Department of Forensic Science

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chair David Wu
Q1. The NAS recommends that the Federal Government oversee education standards
and accreditation of forensic science programs in colleges and universities. What
is your opinion of this recommendation?

A1. One of the main points discussed throughout the report is standardization. The
Committee’s  recommendation  was  not  to  replace  the  existing  accrediting  body  with
a totally newly developed federal program, but to utilize the existing, already work-
ing program which can be reviewed to assure that it meets the needs. Then support
this  program  and  the  institutions  applying  to  it  for  accreditation.  The  example  for
accreditation  of  forensic  science  educational  programs  would  be  the  Forensic  Edu-
cation  Program  Accreditation  Commission  (FEPAC),  which  is  a  standing  committee
of  the  American  Academy  of  Forensic  Sciences.  While  this  Commission  has  been  in
existence for just five years, it has shown significant success in raising the scientific
rigor of the programs which it has already accredited. There is a quantum difference
between  overseeing  the  accrediting  body  and  creating  a  new  body  from  the  ground
up.  A  benefit  of  the  standardization  of  these  requirements  is  that  students  and
these  accredited  universities  could  receive  the  benefit  of  federal  support  in  the  na-
ture  of  scholarships  or  loans  for  tuition  (forgivable  at  a  rate  of  say,  20  percent  for
each year of service in a publicly funded crime laboratory).

For the existing undergraduate FEPAC accredited universities there are approxi-
mately 1,600 students. If the average cost for each student is $25,000 per year, the
cost to fully fund undergraduate education for the existing forensic programs would
be approximately $40,000,000.

For  the  existing  FEPAC  accredited  graduate  level  programs,  there  are  approxi-
mately  175  students.  If  the  average  cost  of  graduate  study  is  $30,000  per  year  for
each student, the cost to fully fund graduate education for the existing forensic pro-
grams is approximately $5,250,000.
Q2. What is the level of funds the Federal Government currently allocates to forensic
science research? What will the transitional issues be in changing from a mostly
experienced-based system to a rigorous scientific-based system?

A2. As noted in the report, in Chapter 2, pages 14 & 15, NIJ funding for the foren-
sic  sciences  in  2007  was  a  total  of  $6,590,702,  of  which  $4,048,563  was  directed  to
DNA  related  research  and  only  $2,542,139  was  directed  to  crime  scene  tools,  tech-
niques  and  technologies;  Impression  Evidence;  Facial  Recognition;  Iris  Recognition;
and  Automatic  Fingerprint  Matching.  The  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation  has
about  $33  million  allocated  for  research  purposes.  Currently,  I  have  no  idea  as  to
the  amount  of  forensic  research  funding  from  the  Department  of  Defense,  Depart-
ment  of  State  or  other  agencies.  However,  it  must  be  noted  that  other  agencies  are
not  developing  forensic  technology  intended  for  State  and  local  use.  It  could,  how-
ever, be commercialized but it is critical that Congress recognize that even if a R&D
program  for  technology  was  increased,  the  forensic  community  would  not  have  the
funding  to  purchase  the  new  equipment  or  to  maintain  it  if  they  were  able  to  pur-
chase  it.  Further,  these  programs  are  focused  on  the  advancement  of  existing  tech-
nologies not on validation.

Transitional issues should be considered first, research to validate the underlying
principles  of  the  disciplines  at  issue,  namely  friction  ridge  determination,  firearms
and toolmark analyses, and questioned document analyses. In addition to this would
be determination as to the application of statistical models that would allow for the
assessment of a statistical significance of the particular comparison.
Q3. What federal resources would be required to establish a National Institute of Fo-

rensic Science?

A3. I  don’t  believe  that  I  am  qualified  to  give  a  number  for  this  as  I  do  not  work
in the Federal Government. However, if one were created or if the existing structure
was  expanded,  then  funding  would  be  necessary  for  staffing  of  the  entity.  In  addi-
tion, there would be needed travel funds for numerous technical advisors necessary
to review, comment on and aid in implementation. They would then require a budg-
et of great significance to support the operational needs of the State and local foren-
sic community which I believe must be assessed through annual requirements anal-
ysis of that community.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith

Cost
Q1. What  would  the  recommendations  in  the  NAS  report  cost?  Specifically,  how
much funding do you think is required for the proposed forensics institute? How
much  is  necessary  to  fulfill  the  other  technical  recommendations,  such  as  basic
research, validation, and standards for accreditation and certification?
You  also  state  in  your  testimony  that  federal  funding  for  disciplines  outside  of
DNA  ‘‘falls  far  short  of  what  is  necessary.’’  Could  you  provide  an  estimate  of
how much is necessary—even a ballpark figure for us as we move forward?

A1. I do not believe I can provide to you a total cost to do this as I am not a federal
employee  so  I  am  unsure  of  what  it  costs  to  run  a  federal  agency.  I  have,  however,
put together the numbers I believe to be rough for accreditation which I have listed
below.  It  is  important  to  realize  that  this  does  not  include  daily  operations
of  labs,  such  as  additional  personnel  (which  have  been  estimated  by  some
to be as many as 10,000 examiner positions), nor the equipment needed not
only  to  support  the  new  individuals,  but  also  to  replace  and  upgrade  the
equipment  existing  in  laboratories  now,  nor  the  additional  laboratory
space for the additional personnel.
Accreditation  NOTE:  These  numbers  do  not  include  any  estimates  for  the
inclusion of Coroner or Medical Examiner offices.

From very preliminary surveys and numbers drawn from the number of police de-
partments and sheriff offices, it is estimated that there may be 11,000 entities that
fit into the category of forensic service providers.

To  train  one  individual  in  each  agency  to  prepare  for  accreditation  is  approxi-

mately $5,000 each or a total of $55,000,000.

It  requires  approximately  two  years  of  time  for  that  trained  individual  to  bring
the  agency  into  compliance  to  achieve  accreditation.  The  cost  of  two  years  (times
11,000 agencies) for this process is estimated at $900,000,000.

Cost  of  upgrading  of  facilities  to  meet  safety,  security,  etc.,  cannot  be  estimated

since these issues are variable.

totaling $110,000,000.

The  average  cost  of  an  accreditation  site  visit  is  approximately  $10,000  per  visit,

The  accreditation  cycle  is  five  years.  The  average  cost  of  an  annual  surveillance
visit is $1,000 per site, so the total cost for a five-year cycle would be approximately
$11,200,000 for the surveillance visits.

Currently, administrative cost of the program is approximately $150.00 per (what
would  be  a  certified  individual).  If  each  agency  has  an  average  of  10  individuals
working  as  forensic  service  providers,  (that’s  110,000),  the  total  is  16,500,000  per
year or $82,500,000 for a five-year cycle.
Certification NOTE: These numbers do not include any estimates for the in-
clusion of Coroner or Medical Examiner offices.

The cost of certification fees, travel to testing site, study materials, etc. is approxi-
mately  $1,000  per  individual  (times  the  110,000  estimated  above),  for  a  total  of
$110,000,000. The ongoing fees and annual fees will be less than this figure for the
succeeding four years, maybe $75,000,000 each year.

NIST Capabilities
Q2. Assume  for  a  moment  that  Congress  opts  not  to  create  a  new  forensics  institute
but  still  follows  through  on  the  technical  recommendations  in  the  NAS  report.
Which among those should be carried out by NIST versus other agencies or pri-
vate  sector  organizations?  (May  want  to  ask  for  more  detailed  answers  in  writ-
ing.)
To  put  this  question  another  way,  if  no  new  agency  is  created,  is  NIST  capable
of,  and  should  they:  a)  Establish  best  practices  for  scientists  and  laboratories?
b)  Establish  standards  for  accreditation  of  forensic  labs  and  certification  of  fo-
rensic  scientists?  c)  Develop  standard  operating  procedures  for  forensic  labs?  d)
Oversee education standards and accreditation of university forensic programs?
A2. Once  again,  the  intent  of  the  report  was  not  to  establish  new  provisions  from
scratch,  but  to  work  from  existing  programs.  NIST  can  aid  in  standardizing  of  the
protocols  and  best  practices  recommended  (but  not  mandatory)  as  outlined  by  the
various Scientific Working Groups. I have already answered b., c., and d. above.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

Crime Lab Accreditation
Q3. You  note  in  your  testimony  that  great  progress  has  been  made  with  respect  to
accreditation  of  public  crime  laboratories—in  2005  over  82  percent  of  labs  were
accredited. How do you think existing accreditation mechanisms should be dealt
with  in  light  of  your  recommendations  for  the  Federal  Government  to  develop
its  own  accreditation  standards?  How  might  government  intervention  impact
private sector organizations’ incentives to continue its accreditation work?

A3. Actually,  the  report  is  quite  clear.  Just  as  in  the  accreditation  of  academic  fo-
rensic  science  programs,  the  committee  specifically  stated  that  the  existing  accredi-
tation programs not be ‘‘reinvented’’ by the Federal Government. What we intended
was for the federal entity to review and assess whether an accrediting body (for test-
ing  laboratories)  met  the  international  standards  of  ISO/IEC  17025  and  therefore
would be able to conduct the assessments of compliance to those standards. During
that process, an accrediting body may have to adjust their requirements to meet the
ISO/IEC  17025  specifications.  This  action  is  to  assure  that  all  accreditations  would
meet  the  standards  required  and  therefore  comply  with  federal  requirements  for
funding.

‘‘On Friday, September 12, 2008 at an annual meeting of the General Assembly
of  the  InterAmerican  Accreditation  Cooperation  (IAAC),  held  in  Paraguay,
ASCLD/LAB  was  formally  accepted  as  a  signatory  to  the  IAAC  Multi-lateral
Recognition Arrangement. This action means that ASCLD/LAB, and specifically
the ASCLD/LAB–International accreditation program for testing laboratories, is
now  internationally  recognized  and  accepted  as  operating  in  conformance  with
ISO  and  IAAC  standards  and  practices.  ASCLD/LAB  is  the  first  Forensic
Science Accrediting Body in the United States to achieve this recognition.’’

Upon  acceptance  by  the  federal  entity,  the  ASCLD/LAB  International  Accredita-
tion  Program  would  continue  to  conduct  accreditations,  meeting  the  intent  of  the
committee report. This would be true of any accrediting body which meets or would
meet the requirements and is approved.

Prioritization of NAS Recommendations
Q4. Among the technical recommendations in the NAS report, what one or two stand

out to you as the highest priority, and why?

A4. I  believe  that  this  is  not  a  circumstance  where  A  needs  to  be  completed  before
proceeding  to  B  or  C.  Several  of  the  recommendations  can  be  implemented  concur-
rently. Certainly the research needed to validate the underlying principles for latent
print  comparison,  firearms  and  toolmark  examinations,  and  questioned  document
analysis  needs  to  begin  (Recommendation  3),  as  well  as  the  research  into  the  ef-
fects of observer bias (Recommendation 5). This will take some time. At the same
time,  the  preparation  for  implementing  and  requiring  accreditation  forensic  service
providers  (labs,  fingerprint  comparison  units,  crime  scene,  and  digital  evidence  sec-
tions) and certification of individuals can begin. This also will be a multi-year proc-
ess  for  educating  the  applicable  parties,  aiding  in  the  preparation,  application,  and
final accreditation and/or certification. (Recommendations 2, 6, 7, and 8).

Prioritization of Research Needs
Q5. Has the forensic science community attempted to prioritize research needs across
various  disciplines?  If  not,  in  your  opinion  what  areas  of  research  are  likely  to
contribute  the  greatest  benefits  to  the  legal  system  through  increased  funding?
A5. See  answer  to  number  4  above  concerning  research.  While  some  research  has
been  conducted  along  these  lines,  there  has  been  no  nationally  coordinated  process
to assure that the needs of the community have been addressed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Carol  E.  Henderson,  Director,  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science,
Technology  and  the  Law;  Professor  of  Law,  Stetson  University  College  of  Law;
Past President, The American Academy of Forensic Sciences

The  questions  posed  by  the  Committee  are  thoughtful  and  relevant.  However,

most cannot be answered accurately at this time because of a lack of data.

For example: there is no data on how many of the Nation’s approximately 17,000
law enforcement agencies are conducting pattern analysis investigations such as fin-
gerprint  and  tool  mark  comparisons  and  no  line  for  ‘‘Forensic  Science  Research’’  in
the budget of federal agencies.

Without a solid platform of information it is not possible to answer questions such
as  the  cost  of  establishing  a  NIFS,  the  cost  of  implementing  a  national  research
agenda  and  conducting  the  associated  research,  or  even  the  cost  of  moving  pattern
evidence  from  experiential  to  science-based.  The  same  applies  to  the  recommenda-
tion on transitioning control of forensic services from police to non-law enforcement
control.

While  I  have  tried  to  give  the  Committee  the  best  answers  to  their  questions,  I
strongly  caution—as  I  did  consistently  in  my  written  and  oral  testimony—that  sig-
nificant research is required to provide adequate data on which to base supportable
cases regarding implementation of most of the NAS recommendations.

Although much of the focus in this response has been on federal agencies, the ma-

jority of cases are processed by State and Local agencies.

A thoughtful, well-researched strategic plan to propel the forensic science commu-
nity  forward  so  that  we  all  serve  the  justice  system  in  the  manner  in  which  it  de-
serves is required.

The  first  step  should  be  to  require  an  independent  study  of  the  funding  and  re-
source  implications  of  the  report  recommendations,  and  to  produce  a  strategic  plan
for their implementation.

I  know  that  the  National  Clearinghouse  for  Science  Technology  and  the  Law,
which I direct, has the capability and experience in bringing together expert groups
to be able to deliver such a plan in a timely fashion.

Questions submitted by Chair David Wu
Q1. The Academy of Forensic Sciences (AAFS) has created an Education Committee
and  Accreditation  Board  to  review  the  quality  of  forensic  science  education  pro-
grams  and  current  accreditation  and  certification  programs.  What  have  been
your findings?

A1. The  AAFS  established  a  Forensic  Science  Education  Programs  Commission
(FEPAC) in 2004 to review education programs.

FEPAC accredits forensic science education programs that lead to a Bachelor’s or
Master’s  degree  in  forensic  science  or  in  a  natural  science  with  a  forensic  science
concentration.  All  programs  that  FEPAC  accredits  are  located  within  institutions
that are accredited by a regional accreditation organization.

The  review  function  of  FEPAC  is  to  assess  programs  against  standards,  and  ei-
ther  grant  or  not  grant  recognition.  There  are  currently  25  programs  that  have  ap-
plied for and received FEPAC accreditation. The AAFS has estimated that there are
148  forensic  science  programs  offered  by  colleges  or  universities  in  the  United
States.
Q2a. What is the level of funds the Federal Government currently allocates to foren-

sic science research?

A2a. There has been no study of all the funding resources covering all federal agen-
cies.  However,  the  following  describes  the  situation  as  best  as  can  be  determined.
The  only  on-going  source  of  general  research  funding  in  the  scientific  aspects  of

forensic science is the National Institute of Forensic Science (NIJ).

Funds for DNA research were $9.227M in 2008 (http://www.dna.gov/funding/re-
search-development/). Information about funding for non-DNA research is not read-
ily  available  as  they  are  allocated  on  a  year-to-year  basis  depending  on  the  level  of
funds available, including Congressionally-directed funds.

Not  all  of  the  available  discretionary  funding  is  allocated  to  forensic  science  re-

There is a National Academy Panel working on the topic of NIJ research funding,
with 
http://
www8.nationalacademies.org/cp/projectview.aspx?key=48868,  Project  Title  ‘‘Assess-

reporting 

expected 

early 

2010 

(see 

date 

of 

an 

search.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

ing  the  Research  Program  of  the  National  Institute  of  Justice’’;  Project  scope  in-
cludes  ‘‘1)  What  is  the  role  of  NIJ  in  supporting  and  sustaining  the  Nation’s  sci-
entific infrastructure of crime and criminal justice research . . ..’’

In  general,  only  eight  percent  of  requests  to  NIJ  are  supported.  Other  agencies
such  as  the  FBI,  BATF,  DHS  and  DOD  fund  forensic  research  on  an  ad  hoc  basis.
Q2b. What  will  the  transitional  issues  be  in  changing  from  a  mostly  experienced-

based system to a rigorous scientific-based system?

A2b. This  question  is  impossible  to  answer  without  extensive  research,  as  I  de-
scribed in my testimony to the House Subcommittee.

It  is  not  known  how  many  of  the  17,000  or  so  law  enforcement  agencies  in  the
U.S.  conduct  some  sort  of  forensic  science  testing,  such  as  latent  print  or  firearms
examinations.

Issues include: personnel qualifications; training and education, grandfathering or
waivers  for  non-science  practitioners  who  can  demonstrate  competency  (which  in
turn  begs  the  question  of  whether  there  is  a  need  to  transition);  national  quality
assurance  standards;  and  the  rights  of  states  to  implement  their  own  standards
independent of federal mandates.
Q3. What federal resources would be required to establish a National Institute of Fo-

rensic Science?

A3. Australia has a national institute of forensic science with a mandate similar to
that proposed for NIFS in the NAS report.

The  current  fiscal  year  budget  for  NIFS  Australia  is  $1.233M  Australian  (http:/
/www.anzpaa.org/pubs/ANZPAA%20Business%20Plan%202008-2009.pdf)  which  is
approximately $13.5M U.S. allowing for population and currency exchange rates.

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith

Prioritization of NAS Recommendations
Q1. Among the technical recommendations in the NAS report, what one or two stand

out to you as the highest priority, and why?

A1. There  is  no  national  prioritization  of  forensic  science  research  needs,  identifica-
tion  of  gaps  and  opportunities  in  anything  other  than  in  short-term,  ad  hoc  or  nar-
rowly focused ways.

Without a valid research program and strategy forensic science cannot develop the
sound  knowledge  base  needed  for  training,  education,  and  service  delivery  that  is
needed to serve the justice system.

Prioritization of Research Needs
Q2. Has the forensic science community attempted to prioritize research needs across
various  disciplines?  If  not,  in  your  opinion  what  areas  of  research  are  likely  to
contribute  the  greatest  benefits  to  the  legal  system  through  increased  funding?
A2. Many  forensic  tests-such  as  those  used  to  identify  the  source  of  tool  marks  or
bite  marks—need  to  have  additional,  rigorous,  scientific  research  to  prove  their  va-
lidity and reliability.

Proper and rigorous scientific studies must be performed and published, which are
tightly coupled to legal requirements that focus on accuracy, validity and reliability,
including  the  human  component  (understanding  human  performance,  bias,  and
human error).

Sources  of  error  and  limitations  of  each  discipline  and  associated  methods  have

to be identified.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  John  W.  Hicks,  Director,  Office  of  Forensic  Services,  New  York  State

Division of Criminal Justice Services (Ret.); Former Director, FBI Laboratory

Questions submitted by Chair David Wu
Q1. What is the level of funds the Federal Government currently allocates to forensic
science research? What will the transitional issues be in changing from a mostly
experience-based system to a rigorous scientific-based system?

A1. With regard to current funding levels for forensic science research, it is respect-
fully suggested that the federal budget may be the most accurate and reliable source
for this information. Traditionally, the National Institute of Justice is recognized as
the  primary  agency  supporting  forensic  science  research  by  academic  institutions
and  other  practitioners.  In  addition,  research  funding  is  typically  supported  for
agencies  which  operate  forensic  laboratories  such  as  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Inves-
tigation;  the  Drug  Enforcement  Administration;  the  Bureau  of  Alcohol,  Tobacco,
Firearms  and  Explosives;  the  United  States  Secret  Service;  the  U.S.  Postal  Inspec-
tion  Service;  and  Department  of  Defense  agencies.  Research  funds  usable  for  these
purposes may also be available within and through the National Institute of Stand-
ards and Technology.

With  regard  to  your  ‘‘transition’’  question  above,  I  think  it  is  important  to  recog-
nize  that  a  sound  scientific  basis  already  exists  for  much  of  the  work  performed  by
federal,  State,  and  local  forensic  laboratories—especially  work  performed  under  the
discipline  headings  of  forensic  DNA  analysis,  forensic  analysis  of  controlled  sub-
stances,  and  forensic  toxicology.  In  addition,  work  performed  in  other  disciplines  to
determine the chemical composition of materials recovered from a crime scene such
as explosives, paints, and polymers is carried out using proven and well-established
scientifically-based analytical methods. Many of these laboratories are accredited by
the  American  Society  of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors/  Laboratory  Accreditation
Board (ASCLD/LAB) under their ‘‘Legacy’’ or ‘‘International’’ programs of accredita-
tion.  Under  these  programs,  the  laboratories  must  demonstrate  that  test  methods
in  use  are  fully  documented  and  validated  in  order  to  maintain  their  accreditation
status.

As  indicated  in  the  recent  report  of  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  there  ap-
pears to be a need for independent review of methodologies employed in the ‘‘experi-
ence-based’’  forensic  disciplines  which  rely  in  large  part  on  pattern  recognition  and
comparison  techniques  such  as  those  employed  in  the  examination  of  fingerprints;
firearms  and  fired  ammunition  components;  toolmarks;  impression  evidence;  hand
writing;  and  crime-scene  reconstruction.  As  indicated  in  my  testimony  before  the
Subcommittee, I believe that data may exist that could be subjected to further stud-
ies  to  bolster  the  scientific  underpinnings  of  the  work  being  performed  and  provide
greater  assurance  for  the  courts  in  considering  forensic  evidence.  In  some  areas,  it
may be necessary to gather additional data for specific studies to address questions
that have arisen.

In  my  view,  the  most  efficient,  effective,  and  economical  way  to  accomplish  the
‘‘transitions’’ where such a need is indicated is through a coordinated effort by agen-
cies  already  engaged  in  forensic  science  research  under  the  general  guidance  of  a
national  advisory  board  comprised  of  forensic  science  practitioners,  research  sci-
entists and academicians. Established Scientific Working Groups for the various fo-
rensic disciplines would be engaged in this effort subject to the general guidance of
the  national  advisory  board.  The  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology
has  already  demonstrated  its  core  competencies  for  this  effort  and  should  be  given
a primary role in carrying out assessments of current methodologies and their sup-
porting data and in conducting detailed and rigorous scientific studies where a need
is indicated to further validate forensic methods. This process should be sufficiently
transparent  to  assure  the  courts  of  the  general  acceptance  and  scientific  validity  of
forensic techniques. It would be important to provide expanded resources to support
the  development  and  delivery  of  specialized  training  programs  not  only  for  forensic
laboratory personnel but also for the ‘‘client’’ groups that receive their work product
such as investigators, prosecutors, defense attorneys and judges. As indicated in my
testimony before the Subcommittee, the forensic DNA experience provides a helpful
and proven model in this regard.
Q2. What federal resources would be required to establish a National Institute of Fo-

rensic Science?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

A2. I  do  not  support  the  call  for  the  creation  of  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic
Science.  In  my  view,  a  separate  federal  agency  would  be  unnecessarily  duplicative
of  well-established  expertise,  forensic  services,  and  resources  now  in  existence  in
several federal agencies.

I  also  do  not  believe  it  is  politically  feasible  or  practical  to  incorporate  all  activi-
ties that might be characterized as ‘‘forensic’’ under a single entity as has been pro-
posed.  For  example,  death-investigation  services  as  provided  by  Medical  Examiners
and  Coroners  are  typically  and  with  rare  exception  conducted  independent  of  and
apart from forensic laboratory operations as are other specialty services such as ‘‘fo-
rensic’’ odontology (bite mark evidence), and Fire Marshall activities in determining
the cause and origin of a suspicious fire. In addition, it is not clear that non-govern-
mental forensic practitioners (so-called private experts) who provide services in civil
matters or for criminal defense purposes would be included under the scope and au-
thority of a National Forensic Science Institute as proposed.

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith

Prioritization of NAS Recommendations
Q1. Among the technical recommendations in the NAS report, what one or two stand

out to you as the highest priority, and why?

A1. In my opinion, elements found in NAS recommendations #1, #3 and #10 should
be given the highest priority.

As  set  forth  under  their  recommendations  #1  and  #3,  funding  should  be  directed
at  promoting  scholarly,  competitive  peer-reviewed  research  which  addresses  issues
of accuracy, reliability, and validity in forensic science disciplines. Funds should also
be directed at assessing the development and introduction of new technologies in fo-
rensic  investigations,  especially  technologies  that  improve  the  detection  and  dis-
crimination  potential  for  materials  typically  encountered  at  crime  scenes  and  auto-
mation technologies which can be applied to reduce evidence processing times.

Under  the  NAS  recommendation  #10,  funding  should  be  made  available  for  dis-
tribution  to  educational  institutions  and  other  appropriate  organizations  to  encour-
age the development and improvement of graduate education programs in the foren-
sic  sciences.  Funding  should  also  support  continuing  education  programs  for  law-
yers, judges, law enforcement personnel, practitioners and other groups that are in-
volved  in  the  collection  of  physical  evidence  or  groups  that  utilize  the  results  of  fo-
rensic analyses within the criminal justice system. Such groups might include those
involved in the medical treatment of victims of crimes.

Prioritization of Research Needs
Q2. Has the forensic science community attempted to prioritize research needs across
various  disciplines?  If  not,  in  your  opinion  what  areas  of  research  are  likely  to
contribute  the  greatest  benefits  to  the  legal  system  through  increased  funding?
A2. I  believe  that  steps  have  been  taken  within  individual  forensic  disciplines  to
identify  research  and  developmental  needs.  Typically  these  have  been  articulated
through  the  various  Scientific  Working  Groups.  As  expressed  in  my  written  state-
ment,  I  believe  a  national  advisory  board  comprised  of  representatives  from  the
criminal  justice  and  crime  laboratory  communities,  working  with  relevant  profes-
sional  organizations,  accrediting  bodies  and  individual  discipline  scientific  working
groups,  would  provide  the  best  perspective  for  assessing  and  assigning  these  prior-
ities. This activity would be supported by a closely coordinated effort among key fed-
eral agencies to include the National Institute of Standards and Technology, the Na-
tional Institute of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  James  C.  Upshaw  Downs,  Forensic  Pathologist/Consultant,  Coastal

Regional Medical Examiner, Georgia Bureau of Investigation

Questions submitted by Chair David Wu
Q1. What  do  you  feel  have  been  the  institutional  impediments  that  have  prevented
a national vision for the forensic sciences? What about our current infrastructure
proves resistant to change?

A1. Impediments to change in forensics exist on multiple levels.

Inertia
Lumping (one size-fits all solutions)
Accreditation& certification
Resources/facilities
Massive unfunded mandate
Personnel
Training/continuing education
Caseload
Adversarial jurisprudence
Lack of sufficient information acquisition and transfer

First  and  most  pervasive  is  inertia.  A  national  resignation  to  the  status  quo  is
defended with typical ‘‘easy’’ answers: insufficient resources, lack of jurisdiction, lack
of  incentive,  overwhelming  case  loads,  etc.  The  truth  is  that  there  is  no  ‘‘system’’
to  change.  The  present  U.S.  local,  county,  State,  and  federal  jurisdictions  have  dif-
ferent strategies for accomplishing the scientific analysis of evidence and the presen-
tation  of  same  into  the  courts.  Even  as  far  reaching  a  change  as  the  Daubert  deci-
sion by the Supreme Court of the United States is not a national evidentiary stand-
ard.  It  does  provide  guidelines  to  courts  under  the  federal  umbrella  but  is  not  di-
rectly  applicable  across  the  board.  Thus  the  legal  precedent  arguably  insisting  that
quality  forensic  work  is  a  federal  responsibility  and  essential  for  justice  is  little
more than a footnote in many areas. ‘‘Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice every-
where.’’ 1

The  reality  is  that,  as  was  pointed  out  by  the  NRC  report,  the  forensic  sciences
have no champion to provide that vision for change or a unified drive to implement
and follow through on what is sure to be a slow and trying process of updating. The
NRC Committee recognized a compelling to do things differently if we truly wanted
substantive  change.  Having  carefully  considered  the  issue  over  the  course  of  years
and  benefiting  from  numerous  presentations  by  practitioners  in  numerous  sub  dis-
ciplines,  the  diverse  NRC  Committee  made  this  challenge  their  first  priority.  The
response  to  this,  their  paramount  recommendation,  will  determine  just  how  in-
grained  the  mindset  of  inertia  is.  Merely  complaining  that  change  is  needed  does
nothing to effect such change.

The need for a high-level champion for the needs of forensics is obvious. The ques-
tion  then  becomes  where  such  best  to  locate  the  oversight.  Again,  the  committee
specifically  considered  numerous  possibilities  but  these  experts  best  advice  was  to
start anew.2 Failing that, it would seem most logical that since we are talking about
the application of science to justice, the existing natural fit would be within justice.
All  the  revisions  in  existing  practice  would  have  to  take  place  concurrently  with
continued  case  throughput.  In  many  areas,  crushing  backlogs  in  evidence  analysis
are albatrosses around a lab’s neck. Leadership to instill confidence in the personnel
involved  and  in  the  user  agencies  must  occur  in  advance  of  and  continue  simulta-
neously with implementation in order to achieve maximal success.

Although  in  practice  the  crime  lab  and  Medical  Examiner/Coroner  worlds  inter-
sect  routinely,  they  are  not  by  any  stretch  the  same.  As  a  former  State  crime  lab
director,  I  fell  qualified  to  address  certain  large  picture  issues  in  that  arena  but
would defer to a more experienced active crime laboratorian in discussion of details
and  certain  other  issues.  In  the  area  of  death  investigation,  the  recognition  of  the
important  difference  between  the  office  of  the  Medical  Examiner  and  that  of  the
Coroner  must  be  kept  in  mind.  Of  course,  there  is  no  national  death  investigation
system  at  all.  Every  one  of  the  50  states  and  all  ∼3,000  counties  operate  dif-
ferently—sometimes  dramatically  so.  Roughly  half  of  the  U.S.  population  is  served

1 Dr. Martin Luther King, Letter from Birmingham Jail.
2 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward.  National  Academies

Press. 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

by a forensic pathologist-based (read scientifically founded) investigation and half by
an  elected  coroner-based  (read  little  to  no  training  or  background  required)  oper-
ation. If we are to truly reform the medical practice of death investigation, it is es-
sential  to  not  only  recognize  the  inequity  inherent  in  such  a  structure  but  to  take
the step of doing something about it.

A  brief  digression  into  the  history  of  the  Anglo-based  office  of  Coroner  may  help
to  give  perspective.  References  to  a  Coroner,  charged  with  death  investigation,  can
be  found  as  early  as  tenth  century  England.  In  the  twelfth  century,  the  office  was
reinvented in order to balance the national debt, owing to the ransoming of Richard
the  Lionhearted  from  Austria.  The  office  was  staffed  by  a  nobleman  of  means  in
order to ensure that the then-corrupted office of Sheriff (viz. Sheriff of Nottingham)
was kept at bay. The office then remained largely unchanged over the ensuing cen-
turies  until  immigrating  to  the  colonies.  In  the  worst  present-day  cases,  the  office
of Coroner is elected and requires no requisite training in death investigation at all.
The  myth  of  a  general  physician  or  other  medical  personnel  somehow  being  better
qualified  seems  to  derive  from  the  belief  that  since  most  deaths  are  natural  and
since  a  general  physician  knows  about  natural  disease,  they  can  triage  the  cases
with the remainder being referred to a more skilled Forensic Pathologist. The inher-
ent flaw here is that it assumes that persons with natural disease have died a nat-
ural  death—the  Pygmalion  effect  in  the  extreme.  Stagnation  is  comfortable.  Since
the office of Coroner is generally elected and since ‘‘all politics is local’’3 it may well
continue  prove  to  be  difficult  to  eliminate  an  office  that  has  existed  for  over  a  mil-
lennium. In order to ensure public health, national security, and justice roles, a na-
tional  death  investigation  system  should  be  created  to  ensure  all  similar  cases  are
treated  the  same,  regardless  of  jurisdiction.  This  can  only  happen  with  a  dramatic
change  in  the  status  quo  and  with  a,  heretofore  abdicated,  federal  interest  in  the
process.  With  a  strategic  plan  to  correct  extant  jurisdictional  iniquities,  the  office
of  the  Coroner  can  be  absorbed  into  a  professional  medicolegal  death  investigation
system  wherein  the  local  (city,  county,  region,  or  State—depending  on  population
and needs) director is a board-certified Forensic Pathologist. The Coroner would be-
come a skilled paraprofessional tasked with referral of appropriate cases for evalua-
tion by the specialist.

All  of  the  changes  called  for  by  the  study  are  going  to  require  significant  funds
to  accomplish  the  goals  spelled  out.  Unfortunately,  especially  in  the  present  econ-
omy,  such  a  massive  unfunded  mandate  calling  on  locals  to  eliminate  a  system
largely recognized to be working will be a tough sell. The NIFS would be an impor-
tant component in getting nationwide compliance.

Another impediment is the seeming metastasis of the courtroom’s adversarial sys-
tem into the forensics laboratory. While there have clearly been some high visibility
failures,  the  fact  that  we  have  recognized  and  corrected  issues  in  the  past  speaks
to the fundamental fairness and confidence we should have in practitioners. Just as
other non-forensic sciences have weathered the storms of unethical practitioners and
faked  research,  so  has  the  forensics  world.  Regardless  of  specialty,  practitioners
should  have  no  agenda  in  conducting  their  analyses  other  than  finding  immutable
scientific  facts.  As  a  practical  matter  it  makes  sense  to  assign  forensic  laboratories
to  work  closely  with  justice-related  agencies.  The  reality  is  that  the  unquestioned
biggest  user  of  forensic  services  is  law  enforcement.  Although  unheralded  by  some,
these  results  are  oft  used  to  exclude  individuals  and  to  avoid  prosecutions.  Some
argue an inherent bias in such a relationship but as the NRC committee clearly rec-
ommended (is carefully edited out of the commentary by many) is that forensic labs
should  be  operationally  autonomous4 from  law  enforcement  agencies.  This  does  not
mean  removed  from  same.  In  point  of  fact,  too  great  an  independence  can  bring  its
own  very  real  problems.  Despite  media  popularity,  television  ratings  have  never
really  equated  with  budget  numbers.  Especially  in  trying  economic  times,  a  free
agent  crime  lab  or  Medical  Examiner/Coroner  may  find  it  difficult  to  compete  for
funding.

An important and little recognized issue is the marked differences between crime
laboratories  and  Medical  Examiner/Coroner  operations.  Further,  within  the  latter,
the differences between Medical Examiners and coroners range from vast to none—
in  short,  there  is  no  one-size-fits  all  answer,  off-the-shelf  answer.  Were  there,  the
NRC  committee  would  have  called  for  same.  Instead,  the  loud  and  clear  message
of the panel was ‘‘we need change, we need it now, it will be expensive, and we need
guidance.’’

3 U.S. Rep. Tip O’Neil by http://www.riverdeep.net/current/2000/10/103000¥politic.jhtml
4 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward.  National  Academies

Press. 2009.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

Accreditation  and  certification  should  go  a  long  way  to  ensuring  requisite  neu-
trality  and  checks  and  balances.  Practitioners  of  a  craft  are  in  a  much  better  posi-
tion  to  address  the  particular  scientific  expectations  and  needs  of  a  specific  dis-
cipline—one  would  not  want  a  Forensic  Pathologist  (unless,  perhaps  one  uniquely
skilled in that discipline) advising a trace evidence analyst how to conduct an assay
any  more  than  one  would  think  the  reverse  a  good  plan.  As  such,  lab  accreditation
should be spearheaded by groups such as the American Society of Crime Laboratory
Directors—Laboratory Accreditation Board to expand.

We  are  creating  an  artificial  distinction  in  the  forensic  sciences  in  the  over-em-
phasis  of  the  forensic  component  and  not  enough  on  the  science.  In  short,  science
is  science.  A  theory  is  developed,  experiments  conducted,  results  obtained,  and  an
interpretation  is  made.  The  difference  is  that  in  the  forensic  world,  the  test  results
and  opinions  related  thereto  are  often  used  in  court  proceedings  (although  often-
times  they  are  used  to  avoid  taking  a  matter  to  trial).  Skeptics  argue  that  this
raises the bar on these test results because in the courtroom, someone’s life, liberty,
and/or livelihood are at stake. What they fail to mention is that this is no different
from  scientific  endeavors  in  other  fora.  A  medical  test  may  determine  if  medication
is  given  and  if  that  medicine  will  save  or  take  a  life.  An  incorrect  engineering  test
can result in catastrophic design failure and untold loss of life.

Fundamentally,  if  we  are  to  trust  a  laboratorian,  we  have  to  bestow  that  trust.
The  qualifications  and  ethics  of  the  practitioner  must  be  assured  in  advance.  For
example,  in  the  medical  model,  clinical  pathology  labs  are  expected  to  receive  na-
tional accreditation—usually a prerequisite for reimbursement. The Clinical Labora-
tory  Improvement  Act  (CLIA)  some  two  decades  ago  sought  to  assure  the  public  of
such baseline confidences:5

The  Centers  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid  Services  (CMS)  regulates  all  laboratory
testing  (except  research)  performed  on  humans  in  the  U.S.  through  the  Clinical
Laboratory  Improvement  Amendments  (CLIA).  In  total,  CLIA  covers  approxi-
mately  200,000  laboratory  entities.  The  Division  of  Laboratory  Services,  within
the  Survey  and  Certification  Group,  under  the  Center  for  Medicaid  and  State
Operations  (CMSO)  has  the  responsibility  for  implementing  the  CLIA  Program.
The objective of the CLIA program is to ensure quality laboratory testing. Practi-
tioners  are  expected  to  achieve  individual  certification  in  their  respective  dis-
ciplines—again an important assurance of laboratory excellence.

The lab accreditation model, although not universal, is well-accepted in the crime
lab  world,  with  upwards  of  80  percent  of  publicly  funded  crime  labs  accredited.6 In
the  Medical  Examiner  world,  there  has  been  significantly  less  achievement  of  this
benchmark, with only ∼60 accredited sites.7 Coroner operations vary so dramatically
across the country that only a handful has achieved.8

Again  to  the  medical  model—in  many  areas,  the  Medical  Examiner’s  office  falls
under  a  medical  university.  Such  hospitals  are  tertiary  care  and  training  centers,
seeing  the  most  complicated  patients  while  training  tomorrow’s  physicians  how  to
treat them. Regrettably, in many cases, the outcome not surprisingly is bad. In such
cases  falling  under  Medical  Examiner  jurisdiction  (a  fairly  sizable  percentage),  the
medicolegal  autopsy  examination  is  conducted  by  employees  of  the  same  hospital
who  will  later  be  sued  for  malpractice  in  the  death  of  the  patient.  There  is  simply
no  reasonable  alternative,  as  the  paucity  of  Medical  Examiners  assures  no  other
qualified practitioners within a given area. As a result, some might question the ve-
racity  of  the  Pathologist’s  conclusions  due  to  the  ‘‘obvious  bias’’  in  such  cir-
cumstances.  With  sufficient  checks  and  balances  assured  by  accreditation,  certifi-
cation,  peer  review,  continuing  quality  improvement,  and  enforced  ethical  canons
such  issues  are  disposed  of  routinely  as  a  matter  of  course.  Challenges  come  when
some may not like the outcome of the report, as is to be expected. Certainly serious
allegations  of  wrong-doing  should  be  investigated  thoroughly,  completely,  and  im-
partially but no more so than in any other arena. The first step to ensure confidence
in  the  practice  of  forensic  sciences  is  to  require  the  accreditation  and  certification
which will mandate a system of checks and balances is in place.

The lack of available recent data regards the overall needs and status of the Na-
tion’s forensic services providers makes a compelling case for one of, if not the most,
important impediments. Annual practitioner needs assessments should be conducted
to  determine  what  those  actively  engaged  in  the  profession  need  in  terms  of  edu-

5 http://www.cms.hhs.gov/clia/
6 http://www.reuters.com/article/pressRelease/idUS238414+29-Jul-2008+PRN20080729
7http://thename.org/index.php?option=com¥content&task=view&id=67&Itemid=69
8 http://theiacme.com/iacme/accreditation.aspx

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

cation/training,  equipment,  facilities,  staffing,  research,  and  other  resources.  Such
information is simply unavailable at present.
Q2. What is the level of funds the Federal Government currently allocates to forensic
science research? What will the transitional issues be in changing from a mostly
experience-based system to a rigorous scientific-based system?

A2. Ascertaining  the  present  level  of  federal  funding  to  all  forensic  matters  is  be-
yond my ability, as it was beyond the NRC committee’s.9 Based on the 2009 budget,
some observations can be made. Total federal research includes, ‘‘. . . $151.1 billion
in  federal  R&D,  an  increase  of  $6.8  billion  or  4.7  percent  above  the  FY  2008  esti-
mate. As a result, every major R&D funding agency will receive an increase greater
than  the  expected  rate  of  inflation,  and  in  many  cases  the  final  FY  2009  numbers
are  larger  than  the  budget  request  submitted  by  the  previous  administration
. . ..’’ 10 In the fiscal year 2009 year, the Office of Justice Programs is appropriated
$156,000,000  for  DNA  related  and  forensic  programs  and  activities,  specifically  in-
clude  through  the  National  Institute  of  Justice  $151,000,000  for  DNA  analysis  and
capacity  enhancement  program;  $5,000,000  for  the  Post-Conviction  DNA  Testing
Program;  and  $25,000,000  for  Paul  Coverdell  Forensic  Science  Improvement
Grants.11 Thus  0.1  percent  of  the  total  federal  research  money  goes  to  ALL  the
forensics needs. By way of comparison, the budget includes $125,471,000 for the Na-
tional Center for Complimentary and Alternative Medicine and $134,344,000 for the
Center for Veterinary Medicine.12 There is absolutely no assurance that any of this
money  will  go  to  practitioner  or  end-user  driven  targeted  research  or  that  research
done in Defense or similar areas will be made available as deliverables to the locals
involved  in  forensic  practice.  In  general,  I  believe  a  budget  analyst  would  have  to
research the question in depth to be more precise than that.

In  my  specialty  of  medicolegal  death  investigation,  the  numbers  are  much  easier
to find. I believe the answer is basically none. The only funding stream open to Med-
ical Examiners is the $25,000,000 Coverdell grant program—but it must be remem-
bered  that  this  pot  is  distributed  across  the  board  to  all  states  via  formula  grants
and  a  small  portion  for  competitive  grants—none  of  which  are  designated  specifi-
cally  to  research.  Arguably,  some  programs  such  as  the  Violent  Death  Reporting
System  impact  the  Medical  Examiner/Coroner  world,  but  not  in  terms  of  research
directly  applicable  to  the  practice  of  the  craft.  The  Bureau  of  Justice  statistics  did
analyze  the  status  of  the  country’s  Medical  Examiners/coroners  for  the  first  time
ever  in  200513 but  again  this  fact-finding  assessment  is  hardly  useful  applied
science research.

Medical  Examiners  have  long  clamored  for  increased  funding  in  the  field.  True,
a proportion of the U.S. Medical Examiners are affiliated with Medical Schools and
may get small research stipends through such associations but these amount to ba-
sically  to  little  more  than  slightly  expanded  basic  service  provisions  (for  example
histology slides, chemical analyses, etc.). Serious questions such as the rates of and
differences in wound healing, injury mechanisms in shaken/impact syndrome cases,
and  radiologic-clinical-pathologic  correlation  abound.  The  low  fruit  is  remains  and
is easy to pick.

Personally  speaking,  I  have  never  received  federal  dollars  for  research  nor  am  I
familiar with any Medical Examiner who has received such monies. In fact, despite
being  actively  engaged  in  research  throughout  my  career,  I  have  only  received  a
one-time,  $1000  stipend  to  employ  a  medical  student  one  summer  to  compile  case
data for me. Everything else I have done, including ongoing very expensive CT and
MRI  studies  in  child  abuse  cases,  has  relied  exclusively  on  the  charity  of  others.
This  is  hardly  a  basis  on  which  to  build  a  system.  Consider  that  of  the  in  excess
of  $151  billion  in  federal  research  and  development,  millions  are  spent  on  medical
research alone14 and none on medicolegal death investigation. The potential for im-
provement here is obvious and the cost should be remarkably cheap.

As for transitional issues, movement to a more science-based system presumes the
system in question lacks a scientific basis. Medicolegal death investigation, properly
conducted,  is  headed  by  a  board-certified  physician  specializing  in  the  medical
science  of  forensic  pathology.  The  major  issue  in  transition  would  then  relate  to
bringing  lesser  systems  ‘‘up  to  code.’’  This  would  mean  redefining  the  role  of  lay

9 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward.  National  Academies

Press. 2009.

10 http://www.aaas.org/spp/rd/fy09.htm
11 H.R. 1105, One Hundred Eleventh Congress of the United States of America.
12 H.R. 1105, One Hundred Eleventh Congress of the United States of America.
13 http://www.ojp.gov/bjs/abstract/meco04.htm
14 H.R. 1105, One Hundred Eleventh Congress of the United States of America.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

Coroners  who  presently  serve  roughly  half  the  U.S.  population  and  ensuring  in  all
cases a qualified physician is not only available to but responsible for each local ju-
risdiction.

Issues would relate to the inadequate numbers of board certified Forensic patholo-
gists available to assume such a role. Given the present numbers of active full-time
practitioners (estimated at 400) we would have to double the number of newly-mint-
ed practitioners from the present of slightly less than 40 to ∼80. Recruiting and find-
ing  the  resources  for  doubling  the  population  in  question  then  become  related
issues.  Replacing  the  office  of  coroner,  as  called  for  by  the  NRC  Committee,  would
require several matters be dealt with. As the Coroner is an elected and/or constitu-
tional  office,  the  relevant  laws  would  have  to  be  changed.  Appropriate  new  law
would  need  to  be  enacted  (such  as  the  Model  Post  Mortem  Examinations  Law  pro-
posed by the National Association of Medical Examiners15 ). Acceptable interim pro-
cedures  and  practices  would  need  to  be  formulated.  Adequate  facilities,  resources,
and support would need to be put in place at the regional and/or local levels to han-
dle  a  dramatically  increased  workload  at  whichever  level  would  be  involved.  Addi-
tional  costs  for  storage,  transport,  and  processing  of  remains  would  be  incurred  re-
gardless  of  which  model  system  were  established.  The  eventual  fate  of  the  office  of
Coroner would need to be decided—either fading into the annals of antiquity or revi-
sion into a scientifically trained medicolegal lay investigator.

Arguably  some  other  forensic  disciplines  are  on  clearly  less  solid  footing.  In  the
vast majority of forensic sciences as a whole, the laboratorians’ efforts began as sci-
entific  endeavors  to  answer  specific  questions.  The  system  is  really  built  more  on
applied  science  answering  targeted  questions  than  systematic  research  as  many
other  applications  practice.  Some  issues  can  be  anticipated  to  be  similar  to  those
faced in medicolegal death investigation—facilities, resources, and personnel—while
maintaining  active  case  throughput.  Incumbent  with  such  a  dramatic  increase  in
staff  and  labs  would  require  sufficient  accreditation  and  certification  opportunities
to keep up with the increased dramatically demand for same, if the recommendation
to require accreditation and certification. Others areas of concern might include ac-
tual prioritization/conduction of research and translation from the theoretical to the
practical. Obviously, the oversight of such an undertaking would be important—who
will,  without  bias,  ensure  compliance  with  regulations  is  uniform  across  the  board.
The  NRC  assigned  the  duty  to  their  chief  recommendation,  the  National  Institute
of Forensic Sciences.

Acceptance  of  all  the  foregoing  is  assumed  by  those  directly  involved  at  various
levels in the affected systems. Given the track record, as relates to the existing sys-
tem, this may a pipe dream. Without strong, public, and broad support for the sug-
gested improvements, there is little reason to believe that the net result will be any-
thing but the same.

Another  issue  would  be  understanding  of  and  acceptance  of  the  new  system  by
users  of  the  services.  All  the  change  would  be  for  naught  if  the  adversarial  system
of the courtroom failed to accept them. There is precious little reason to believe that
the actual test results will dramatically differ from those presently achieved. Those
same present results that we know from years of experience are valid, although dis-
missed by some (to whom the data are unfavorable) as somehow flawed, will remain
valid. The interpretations of results, as presented in courts, will remain inclusionary
to some accused and exclusionary to those many who do not make it to trial. With-
out addressing the undue influence of the adversarial legal system on the reportage
of  scientific  testing,  there  can  be  little  hope  of  a  better  outcome.  The  bias  inherent
in  a  system  where  (almost  uniformly)  the  prosecution  must  use  an  accredited  lab
and a certified scientist because they are already employed for that specific purpose
and  therefore  the  prosecution  cannot  afford  to  solicit  multiple  persons  for  the  pur-
pose of proving a case the crime lab’s own scientist said there wasn’t one. Such ex-
travagance  is  not  a  wise  use  of  limited  tax  dollars.  The  defense  argues  it  must  use
the same crime lab already extant and when the result is not to their liking, argues
by insinuation that the analysis is somehow biased or flawed but such ad hominem
attack  amounts  to  nothing  more  than  empty  words.  Expert  shopping,  an  option
chiefly available to the defense which is free to use whatever engaged report(s) favor
their  position  while  conveniently  never  disclosing  the  many  more  support  the  pros-
ecution’s  case,  must  end.  Some  will  protest  loudly  that  such  a  fundamental  change
in  their  ability  to  seek  out  qualified  professionals  jeopardizes  their  ability  to  rep-
resent their position. Such an argument is easily overcome if all solicited expert re-
ports—on both sides—are automatically allowed, regardless of outcome. In my opin-
ion, this would be one of the most difficult issues to address if we are to effectively
modify our system.

15 http://thename.org/index.php?option=com¥content&task=view&id=97&Itemid=41

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

Q3. What federal resources would be required to establish a National Institute of Fo-

rensic Sciences?

A3. The NRC Committee said of the proposed NIFS:

‘‘The forensic science system, encompassing both research and practice, has seri-
ous  problems  that  can  only  be  addressed  by  a  national  commitment  to  overhaul
the  current  structure  that  supports  the  forensic  science  community  in  this  coun-
try.  This  can  only  be  done  with  effective  leadership  at  the  highest  levels  of  both
Federal and State governments, pursuant to national standards, and with a sig-
nificant infusion of federal funds.’’ 16

‘‘The forensic science enterprise needs strong governance to adopt and promote an
aggressive,  long-term  agenda  to  help  strengthen  the  forensic  science  disciplines.
Governance must be strong enough—and independent enough—to identify the limi-
tations  of  forensic  science  methodologies,  and  must  be  well  connected  with  the  Na-
tion’s scientific research base to effect meaningful advances in forensic science prac-
tices. The governance structure must be able to create appropriate incentives for ju-
risdictions to adopt and adhere to best practices and promulgate the necessary sanc-
tions to discourage bad practices.’’ 17

The resources existing within the Federal Government can be expected to include
the  Department  of  Justice;  the  National  Institute  of  Justice;  the  Federal  Bureau  of
Investigation, the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms; the Office of the Armed
Forces Medical Examiner; The National Institute of Standards and Technology; the
Department  of  Defense;  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services;  the  Drug
Enforcement  Administration;  the  National  Science  Foundation;  the  National  Acad-
emy of Sciences; the Institute of Medicine; the Library of Medicine; the Department
of Homeland Security; and other agencies.

The financial resources can be anticipated to be substantial. I have no experience
in  the  federal  funding  world  and  fell  uncomfortable  trying  to  predict  how  these  ex-
isting entities might use their resources towards the forensics effort.

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith

Prioritization of NAS Recommendation
Q1. Among the technical recommendations in the NAS report, what one or two stand

out to you as the highest priority, and why?

A1. Although the NRC committee charged with studying the issues advised against
separating  the  initiatives  or  emphasizing  one  to  the  exclusion  of  others,  the  reality
is that such a broad-reaching revision of such a far-reaching vision may not be eas-
ily  achieved  without  dividing  the  response.  Ideally  all  the  recommendations  should
proceed  simultaneously  on  their  own  intersecting  paths.  If  we  separate  the  compo-
nent  proposals  and  attempt  to  sort  by  category,  the  recommendations  can  be  sim-
plified to address: accreditation/certification, education/training, research, oversight,
and medicolegal death investigation.

Professionally,  I  am  keenly  aware  of  the  many  needs  of  the  Medical  Examiner/
Coroner system nationally, however, I believe the greater good is served in address-
ing  two  issues  which  would  arguably  have  the  most  impact  the  most  quickly—ac-
creditation/certification and research.

Accreditation of existing labs is a seeming daunting task given the lack of existing
investment  in  the  process.  The  good  news  is  that  this  should  be  much  easier  to
achieve  than  many  fear  because  a  sizable  percentage  of  State  crime  labs  already
have  accreditation.  Other  labs  are  typically  small  and  I  believe  lack  of  a  concerted
effort is likely the biggest sticking point in moving to full accreditation. I can speak
from the personal experience as the former director of a State crime lab system with
175 employees who oversaw a 10 lab operation spread across a broad geographic ter-
ritory go from zero to full accreditation in basically two years. There were naysayers
early  in  the  process,  especially  since  there  were  basically  no  new  State  funds  set
aside  for  the  effort.  This  can  only  be  overcome  by  achieving  buy-in  from  staff  first,
followed  by  users.  The  mantra  must  reflect  a  philosophy  that  ‘‘one  does  not  strive
for  mediocrity.’’  This  case  example  of  how  to  achieve  success  though  one’s  own  ef-
forts  reflected  well  of  an  excellent  staff  but  credit  for  the  financial  aspects  must  be
given to the National Institute of Justice, who, working through the National Foren-

16 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward.  National  Academies

Press. 2009.

17 Ibid.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

sic Science Technology Center and other partners within the Forensic Resource Net-
work  (Marshall  University)  showed  that  indeed  the  impossible  can  be  achieved  if
one  merely  sets  the  bar  high  enough  and  settles  for  no  less  than  the  best.  A  rel-
atively small financial investment continues to pay massive dividends. Top manage-
ment must aggressively pursue the goal if the mission is to succeed.

Employee  certification  is  a  slightly  more  difficult  matter  as  a  smaller  percentage
of  crime  lab  personnel  already  possess  the  requisite  background.  As  this  is  a  per-
sonal  achievement,  there  may  be  policy  requiring  revision  in  some  areas  to  allow
governmental  employers  to  require  and/or  fund  this  credentialing  process.  In  some
disciplines, there may need to be special provision made to ‘‘grandfather in’’ existing
scientific  personnel.  Another  obstacle  would  be  the  strain  the  volume  of  scientists
requiring certification would place on the existing system.

In  the  area  of  death  investigation,  the  present  status  of  accreditation  and  certifi-
cation are to a certain extent reversed for physicians and minimal to none for large
numbers  of  lay  coroners.  Some  85  percent  of  pathologists  active  in  the  field  have
Pathology boards and 75 percent sub-specialty certification.18 All have the requisite
physician  training.  Professional  practice  standards  have  been  promulgated.  Only  a
minority  of  existing  Medical  Examiner  facilities  have  achieved  accreditation.  Usu-
ally this shortcoming relates to insufficient resources, staff, or facilities. Regardless,
the root cause would need to be addressed. Lay coroners have only a handful of op-
erations  (eight  total19 )  achieving  any  formal  accreditation.  Formalized  recognition
of basic skills is available through the American Board of Medicolegal Death Inves-
tigation,20 however, this has been primarily achieved by lay investigators employed
by  Forensic  Pathologists.  If  the  coroners  were  to  achieve  the  necessary  training  to
obtain this credential, it should dramatically improve death investigation in the af-
fected jurisdictions—up to half the U.S. population.

overburden 

Both  certification  and  accreditation  would  ultimately  serve  to  provide  confidence
in  the  fairness  of  the  analyses  being  conducted  and  impartiality  and  qualification
of  the  analyst.  Structures  are  presently  in  place  for  both,  however,  the  stress  of
scale  may  well 
the
professionalization  of  the  practice  and  the  practitioner  in  the  achievement  of  these
goals  would  include  adoption  of  ethical  codes  and  continuous  quality  improvement
as part of the criteria for the standard.

existing  process.  Advantages 

The  other  issue  of  utmost  concern  would  be  validation  of  the  underlying  science.
As there are individuals presently incarcerated or awaiting trial, personal liberty is
at stake. Despite the foundation of all forensics in the underpinnings of science, the
focus  has  not  been  sufficiently  broad.  In  order  to  confirm  what  experience  tells  us
is valid and to restore full confidence by the users in the truth and accuracy of the
system,  sufficient  validation  should  be  aggressively  pursued  in  those  areas  most
often used and most often challenged.

the 

of 

Prioritization of Research Needs
Q2. Has the forensic science community attempted to prioritize research needs across
various  disciplines?  If  not,  in  your  opinion  what  areas  of  research  are  likely  to
contribute  the  greatest  benefits  to  the  legal  system  through  increased  funding?
A2. I  do  not  believe  there  has  been  anything  approaching  a  national  plan  on
forensics research. The field really originated by conducting targeted experiments to
answer case-specific questions. The tradition basically continues to the present day,
although  obviously  there  has  been  more  extensive  research  conducted  through  the
years.  Another  benefit  of  the  proposed  NIFS  would  be  to  ensure  such  a  strategy
were created and implemented.

Specifically  regards  the  research  likely  to  be  most  cost-effective  most  quickly
would  be  validation  of  pattern-type  forensic  disciplines  (fingerprint  analysis,  foot-
wear  impression  comparison,  firearms  examination,  document  analysis,  etc.).  An-
other  important  area  would  be  to  expand  preliminary  work  done  on  bias  and  see
the  extent  to  which  it  actually  could  impact  a  case.  It  is  imperative  such  research
on  bias  not  be  biased  itself—if  conducted  with  an  eye  to  ‘‘proving’’  bias  by  govern-
mental labs, a much more obvious potential bias (solicited contract forensic analysis)
might  be  overlooked,  creating  an  illusion  that  one  is  a  problem  while  the  other  is
not.  Individuals  involved  in  such  research  should  absolutely  have  no  real  or  per-
ceived bias which might adversely impact the outcome of the studies.

18 Executive Director, National Association of Medical Examiners.
19 http://theiacme.com/iacme/accreditation.aspx
20 http://medschool.slu.edu/abmdi/index.php

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

Responses  by  Peter  J.  Neufeld,  Co-Founder  and  Co-Director,  The  Innocence  Project

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Chair David Wu
Q1. What is the level of funds the Federal Government currently allocates to forensic

science research?

A1. The  Federal  Government  allocated  $106  million  to  DNA  related  forensics  pro-
grams in 2008 the bulk of which went to DNA backlog reduction. Non-DNA forensic
program  spending  by  the  Federal  Government  in  2008  has  not  yet  been  calculated,
but in 2007 that amount was $16.5 million.

Of the money spent on DNA, approximately $9 million was allocated for research.
Little  to  none  of  the  non-DNA  forensic  funding  is  spent  on  research;  the  Coverdell
Forensic Science Improvement Grant Program awards grants primarily to eliminate
backlogs and to train and employ forensic laboratory personnel.
Q2. What  will  the  transitional  issues  be  in  changing  from  a  mostly  experienced-

based system to a rigorous scientific-based system?

A2. In order to transition forensic sciences to a rigorous science-based system, basic
and  applied  research  on  the  validity  and  reliability  of  assays,  technologies,  and  de-
vices  will  need  to  be  conducted  by  an  independent,  science-focused  federal  agency.
After  this  research  is  completed,  standards  for  methodology,  reporting  procedures,
and court testimony will need to be developed and implemented so that all assump-
tions  made,  conclusions  reached,  and  inferences  drawn  by  forensic  science  expert
witnesses will be supported and confirmed by research.

For  forensic  practitioners,  the  greatest  transitional  issues  will  involve  continuing
education, training, and professional development so that they can meet certification
requirements  in  the  fields  in  which  they  conduct  examinations.  As  the  research
evolves in each discipline, so too will the guidance on how evidence is presented and
how the forensic practitioners can testify in court.

For public crime laboratories, the greatest transitional issues will involve accredi-
tation to the ISO 17025 level. While most publicly-funded crime laboratories are ac-
credited,  the  majority  of  crime  labs  are  not  accredited  to  this  more  rigorous  inter-
national  standard.  States  and  localities  will  also  need  to  be  encouraged  to  make
their crime laboratories independent of law enforcement agencies to ensure a work-
ing environment free of external pressures and bias.

Finally,  on  an  immediate  and  ongoing  basis,  significant  and  continuous  edu-
cational  programs  about  the  report’s  findings  regarding  non-DNA  forensic  assays,
devices, and technologies and their limitations needs to be conducted for judges and
criminal practitioners, and updated as the research progresses.
Q3. What federal resources would be required to establish a National Institute of Fo-

rensic Science?

A3. Many  of  the  ‘‘pieces’’  required  for  a  National  Institute  of  Forensic  Science
(NIFS)  exist  in  the  Federal  Government  today.  The  National  Science  Foundation
and the National Academy of Sciences have experience in competitive grant-making
and have existing relationships with research universities and bodies to whom such
grants  would  be  made.  Once  the  research  is  completed,  standard  setting  could  be
done by the National Institute of Standards and Technology. Lastly, the compliance
and  enforcement  needs  could  be  handled  internally  at  NIFS  and/or  in  cooperation
with other law enforcement entities. NIFS could be modeled after the lean and flexi-
ble  regulatory  body  that  administers  the  Clinical  Laboratory  Improvement  Amend-
ments  (CLIA)  at  the  Centers  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid  Services.  CLIA  oversees  all
clinical  laboratory  diagnostic  testing  in  the  United  States  and  employs  just  27  peo-
ple in their administrative office and 30 employees over 10 regional cities across the
Nation.

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith

Accreditation
Q1. Mr.  Neufeld,  you  emphasize  in  your  testimony  the  importance  of  laboratory  ac-
creditation  to  ensuring  quality  control,  and  Mr.  Marone  noted  that  the  over-
whelming  majority  of  crime  labs  used  by  prosecutors  are  now  accredited.  Does
the Innocence Project also make sure to support work only from accredited labs?
Why or why not?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

A1. The  National  Academy  of  Sciences’  (NAS)  report  on  Strengthening  Forensic
Science in the United States’ seventh recommendation1 is for the mandatory accredi-
tation of all crime laboratories and the certification of all practitioners.

It is critical, however, that the existing, voluntary accreditation standards are as-
sessed  for  strength  and  reliability.  The  largest  crime  laboratory  accreditation  orga-
nization  in  the  United  States,  the  American  Society  of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors
Laboratory Accreditation Board, accredit 362 laboratories (the majority of which are
publicly  funded).  However,  only  80  of  their  laboratories  are  accredited  under  their
‘‘international’’ program—the higher tier of crime lab accreditation that is most com-
pliant with the international standard, ISO/IEC 17025. That program notably omits
three  important  elements  that  are  present  in  its  lower  tier  accreditation  program:
(1) blind proficiency testing, (2) requirements for safety equipment and the physical
design of the lab, and (3) requirements for written objectives.

The NAS report also notes that, ‘‘[a]ccreditation is just one aspect of an organiza-
tion’s  quality  assurance  program,  which  also  should  include  proficiency  testing
where  relevant  . . ..  In  the  case  of  laboratories,  accreditation  does  not  mean  that
accredited  laboratories  do  not  make  mistakes,  nor  does  it  mean  that  a  laboratory
utilizes  best  practices  in  every  case,  but  rather,  it  means  that  the  laboratory  ad-
heres to an established set of standards of quality and relies on acceptable practices
within these requirements.2 . . . Accreditation cannot guarantee high quality—that
is,  it  cannot  guard  against  those  who  intentionally  disobey  or  ignore  require-
ments.’’ 3

In fact, past allegations of negligence or misconduct filed under the federal Cover-
dell  program  have  included  accredited  laboratories.  Consequently,  there  is  a  need
to  assess  the  strength  of  current  accreditation  standards  and  to  make  sure  make
sure  that  the  standards  reflect  best  practices  and  are  as  stringent  as  they  can  be.
Moreover,  for  the  solo  or  two  person  laboratory,  current  accreditation  requirements
may  be  unduly  burdensome.  It  is  certainly  possible  that  NIFS  would  make  the  ac-
creditation  requirements  more  rigorous  on  matters  that  affect  reliability  of  results
yet more accessible for the excellent but very small forensic laboratories.

The  Innocence  Project  typically  engages  accredited  laboratories  for  conducting
post-conviction  DNA  testing  in  their  cases.  At  times—particularly  when  more  ad-
vanced testing on minute samples is required—a two person laboratory that has not
applied for accreditation, Forensic Science Associates (FSA), has provided more reli-
able  results  than  the  accredited  laboratories.  Indeed,  Mr.  Marone  is  personally  fa-
miliar  with  the  extraordinary  high  quality  work  accomplished  by  FSA.  In  the  Earl
Washington DNA exoneration, the initial post-conviction DNA typing was conducted
by  Virginia’s  ASCLD–LAB  accredited  State  forensic  laboratory.  Subsequent  testing
was  conducted  by  FSA.  Not  only  did  the  FSA  results  contradict  the  Virginia  State
lab  results  but  FSA  concluded  that  the  State  lab  had  reached  an  erroneous  conclu-
sion. When the then director of the State lab refused to conduct a meaningful inves-
tigation of what went wrong or even acknowledge that an error had been made, the
Governor  asked  ASCLD–LAB  to  intervene  and  conduct  an  external  investigation.
ASCLD–LAB’s report, which I attach to this document, confirmed that FSA’s results
were  both  correct  and  reliable  and  that  the  accredited  Virginia  laboratory  had  in-
deed  made  a  serious  error.  Nevertheless,  within  days  of  that  report,  ASCLD–LAB
re-accredited  the  Virginia  State  lab,  without  so  much  as  a  comment  on  the  impact
of its own highly critical external investigation in the Earl Washington case.

Admission of Evidence
Q2. Mr. Neufeld, you state in your testimony that ‘‘it is absolutely clear—and essen-
tial—that  the  validity  of  forensic  techniques  be  established  ‘upstream’  of  the
court,  before  any  particular  piece  of  evidence  is  considered  in  the  adjudicative
process.’’  Based  on  the  NAS  report  findings  then,  are  you  calling  for  courts  to
deny  admission  of  forensic  evidence  from  all  disciplines  except  DNA  analysis?
If  so,  do  you  think  that  will  improve  the  justice  system’s  ability  to  convict  the
guilty and protect the innocent?

A2. It  is  not  the  job  of  judges  and  lawyers  to  become  scientific  experts,  and  hardly
a  responsibility  we  can  place  on  the  shoulders  of  a  jury.  This  is  the  reason  why
clarifying  the  specific  reliability  of  all  such  evidence  and  the  parameters  for  testi-
fying on such evidence are so critical to the administration of justice. When forensic

1 Strengthening  Forensic  Science  in  the  United  States:  A  Path  Forward,  Committee  on  Identi-
fying  the  Needs  of  the  Forensic  Science  Community,  The  National  Academies  Press  (2009),  p.
7–18.

2 Ibid., p. 7–2.
3 Ibid., p. 7–3.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

evidence  enters  the  courtroom,  it  should  be  sound  and  not  used  beyond  its  dem-
onstrated  scientific  limits.  The  NAS  report  states  ‘‘with  the  exception  of  nuclear
DNA  analysis,  however,  no  forensic  method  has  been  rigorously  shown  to  have  the
capacity to consistently, and with a high degree of certainty, demonstrate a connec-
tion between evidence and a specific individual or source.’’ 4

The Report divides forensic disciplines into laboratory-based and experience-based
disciplines.  Laboratory-based  disciplines  such  as  ‘‘DNA  analysis,  serology,  forensic
pathology,  toxicology,  chemical  analysis,  and  digital  and  multimedia  forensics—are
built on solid bases of theory and research.5 The level of scientific development and
evaluation varies substantially among the forensic science disciplines.’’ 6 Some expe-
rience-based  disciplines  (fingerprint  analyses)  have  had  the  support  of  more  dedi-
cated research in the past compared to other experience-based disciplines (lip print,
ear print comparisons7 ). Secondly, experience-based disciplines suffer from the same
problem—‘‘A  body  of  research  is  required  to  establish  the  limits  and  measures  of
performance  and  to  address  the  impact  of  sources  of  variability  and  potential  bias.
Such  research  is  sorely  needed,  but  it  seems  to  be  lacking  in  most  of  the  forensic
disciplines that rely on subjective assessments of matching characteristics.’’ 8

This strongly suggests that non-DNA forensic evidence should not be used to indi-
vidualize  in  the  courtroom,  and  the  entire  criminal  justice  system  would  be  well
served  by  respecting  this  fact  as  soon  as  possible.  This  is  not,  however,  to  say  that
non-DNA  forensic  evidence  has  no  place  in  the  courtroom,  nor  to  say  that  there
should be a rule or rules immediately imposed upon courts to ban all such evidence.
The  report  offers  no  judgment  about  closed  or  pending  cases  and  instead  offers  for-
ward looking recommendations for the future of forensic science. We agree with the
report. Indeed, each case, post-conviction or pending, must be considered on its own
merits.

Prioritization of NAS Recommendations
Q3. Among the technical recommendations in the NAS report, what one or two stand

out to you as the highest priority, and why?

A3. Aside  from  the  NAS  report’s  primary  recommendation  to  create  a  National  In-
stitute  of  Forensic  Science,  the  two  priority  recommendations  for  the  forensic  com-
munity  should  be  funding  research  (Recommendation  #3  and  #5)  and  developing
standards  from  that  research  (Recommendation  #6).  In  competitively  funding  peer-
reviewed research to establish validity and reliability of the non-laboratory-based fo-
rensic  disciplines,  Congress  would  be  applying  and  requiring  the  same  scientific
principles  and  processes  for  validation  that  had  been  utilized  so  successfully  for  fo-
rensic DNA. Once the research has been satisfactorily completed and the technique,
method or assay validated, then standards must be developed so that reliable proce-
dures and practices can be provided to the forensic examiners in a shovel-ready for-
mat.

Prioritization of Research Needs
Q4. Has the forensic science community attempted to prioritize research needs across
various  disciplines?  If  not,  in  your  opinion,  what  areas  of  research  are  likely  to
contribute  the  greatest  benefits  to  the  legal  system  through  increased  funding?
A4. In  terms  of  prioritizing  research,  I  can’t  speak  for  the  forensic  science  commu-
nity. To date, the non-DNA forensic science community has had to use virtually all
of  the  funding  it  receives  for  addressing  backlog  issues  and  funding  laboratory
needs.  In  the  past,  there  has  been  little  time  and  virtually  no  money  available  for
research  efforts.  Previous  needs  assessments,  The  U.S.  Department  of  Justice  re-
port,  Forensic  Sciences:  Review  of  Status  and  Needs  (February  1999  and  the  Amer-
ican  Society  of  Crime  Laboratory  Directors’  180–Day  Study  Report:  Status  and
Needs  of  United  States  Crime  Laboratories  (May  2004)  did  not  prioritize  the  re-
search  needs  in  the  forensic  sciences  intended  to  spur  the  change  in  practice  that
the NAS report deems essential to justice. It is the Innocence Project’s position that
areas  of  research  should  be  prioritized  by  areas  of  greatest  needs.  We  look  forward
to working with Congress to find a way to assess this prioritization.

4 Ibid., p. S–5.
5 Ibid., p. 5–1.
6 Ibid., p. S–5.
7 Ibid., p. S–6.
8 Ibid., p. S–6.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

119

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(127)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 14:26 Jun 13, 2009 Jkt 047720 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\DWORK\T&I09\031009\47720 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

